Authors
Serdar Yegulalp
Number of Reviews
166

Title
Review for Your Three Minutes Are Up (1973)
Back in the Seventies there was a spate of films, now horribly dated, about
"square" suburban guys getting yanked away from their desks and being asked
to experience life.  Part of the reason said movies have generally not aged
well is because they took themselves too seriously.  Yesterday's rebel has
become today's pain in the ass.
"Your Three Minutes Are Up" works because it understands that difference,
and also because it has no pretentions about its characters: they're doomed,
not because they're rebels, but because they're trying to get more than they
really deserve, and it blows up in their faces.
Beau Bridges is the workaday drone, a low-key man named Charlie who's about
to get married.  His wife is wound up and anxious, and only seems to be
interested in him as far as when he'll be able to go with her to get
furniture for their new house.  Charlie's buddy Mike (Ron Liebman) is a
swinger who's lost his job and is scamming every credit card he has to keep
his lifestyle moving forward.  Both men have one thing in common: they can't
utter a truthful word about anything.  Mike's a liar because it serves him
well; Charlie can't speak his mind about anything because he's barely got
one.
After getting thrown out of the unemployment office on his ear -- and gets
his car repossessed -- Mike calls Charlie at work and asks him to come drive
him to the airport.  By degrees, and then in an avalanche of events, Mike
cuts Charlie loose from his routine and shows him how to rip the system.  In
an early scene, Mike steals a whole roll of BLue Chip stamps and fills
several books with them, then brings Charlie to the redemption center and
helps him pick out a selection of (hideously tacky) wedding gifts.  It's
funny and painful at the same time.
In a film filled with good things, the very best thing by far is Ron
Liebman's performance.  He's been in tons of movies both good and bad, and
in this one he's amazing to watch: he fills the screen with the image of a
guy who's been lying for so long that the only way to keep afloat is to spin
even bigger whoppers.  A scene that involves him telling off a credit card
company representative starts off as a cliche, and then turns into a tour de
force thanks to the way Liebman delivers his lines. "Because I'm a nice guy,
I'm going to take YOUR bill and put it at the TOP of this pile," he blares
into the phone, "but if I get one more call from you I'm going to put it at
the BOTTOM, where it will simply have to WAIT ITS TURN!  Okay?  A PLEASURE
talkin' to ya."  Beau Bridges is more subdued as his buddy, but effective:
he's always smiling at the most inappropriate moments, like a coping
mechanism gone haywire.
The most striking thing about the movie is its tone.  It's a comedy, but it
has deeply serious undertones -- something which the very beginning of the
movie (which I will not describe) underscores hard.  Everything we see winds
up becoming poignant and sad because of it, and makes it work all the more.
One of the best sequences involves an insurance scam, but by the time the
victors walk away with their cash, it's hollow: we've seen enough to know
that everyone in their world is on the take, and they employ desperate
rationalizations to justify what they did.
"Three Minutes" isn't on video; it's one of those movies that you usually
have to set your VCR to catch when it comes on the late show.  It's well
worth the effort to track it down -- this is a very good, meaningful film
that somehow never got wider distribution or a video release, one of the
best "self-discovery" films of the Seventies that manages to avoid being
trite or pretentious.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
After seeing "Bulworth", I remarked to a friend that a movie like this, in
today's political climate, was probably inevitable.  At some point we were
almost guaranteed a satire about a machine politician who snaps and does a
Putney Swope on his constituents.  Well, we got it -- and it's to Warren
Beatty's credit that he managed to pull it off as well as he did.  It is
easily one of the best movies this country has produced in years.
Beatty stars (in a movie he directed, produced and wrote as well) as the
titular character, a California senator who has reached total burnout.  He
sits in his office playing back his own TV commercials, like the zombified
rock star in "Pink Floyd the Wall".  He can't bring himself to mouth the
same phoney glad-handling junk any more.  Worse, he's lost tons of money in
the stock market, and so has decided to set up a contract on his life and
have himself killed.
The threat of death for some people is liberating, however, and Bulworth
finds that he no longer feels pressured to tailor himself to his public. He
shows up at an inner-city church, and when asked by one of the members of
the congregation why he hasn't done anything for the black community, he
responds in the only sane way left to him: "Well, that's easy: it's because
you haven't contributed any money to my campaign."  The audience roars
derisively; Bulworth giggles.  For the first time in his life he feels like
he's done something right.
That's when the film cuts completely loose.  Bulworth winds up getting
tangled up with a crew of giggly [black] women, gets loaded in a rap club,
and shows up at his next public speech disheveled and unwashed. Rather than
hide or stall, he seizes the stage and delivers an impromptu rap song about
how the government does a better job of providing medical coverage than the
big corporations do, but we're propagandized into believing it's not true:
"Say the magic word: SOCIALISM!" he bellows into the mike.  He's transformed
into DJ Bulworth, bringing a whacked-out mixture of social commentary and
insider know-how into the public eye.
This is very funny, of course, but it's also shocking how confrontatory and
genuinely uncomfortable it is, too.  In a period where movies are doing just
about anything to get our attention and shock us, it's sort of refreshing to
see a movie that does this through social issues instead of bodily
functions.  "Bulworth" covers an amazing amount of ground for a two-hour
movie: there's material on inner-city blight and the way constitutents are
chosen and the politics of campaigning and TV and truth-as-a-commodity and
much more.
Maybe too much more.  The movie's biggest asset is also its biggest
liability: there's just too much material here to cover effectively in a
two-hour movie, and it's held together with a plot that is too obviously a
plot.  And there's an ending which feels unsatisfactory and hurried.  It's
not a perfect film, but on the other hand, what film that works like this,
in so risk-taking a fashion, could be?  "Bulworth" is not about its plot but
about its insights and discoveries, and in that sense is indispensible.
It's daring and invigorative.  And it also made me laugh louder and longer
than almost any other film in recent memory.

Title
Review for Double Team (1997)
CAPSULE: Trippy, hyperspeed action machine from Hong Kong's accomplished
Tsui Hark. Van Damme and Rodman have nice chemistry, the stunts are
eyepopping, and stuff gets blowed up real good; what more do you want?
I admit I was all set to loathe DOUBLE TEAM; it reeked of cheapjack
timing-oriented marketing (stick Dennis Rodman in a movie, quick, while he's
hot, and do something about Jean-Claude Van Damme's flagging career while
we're at it!). Surprise -- DOUBLE TEAM transcends its dumb roots and turns
out to be a mess of fun. Bring some friends, get some pretzels, and have a
blast.
Van Damme is Jack Quinn, an ex-agent who is brought back in for "one last
mission" -- you'd think any spy worth his shoe phone would run like hell
when he hears those words. But Van Damme's character has a pregnant wife
who's also a sculptor, and some unpleasant pressure gets used to get him to
come through on this mission. He's been assigned to take down an old enemy,
a terrorist named Stavros (Mickey Rourke, looking oddly subdued), who may be
back up to his old tricks.
In the first showdown between Quinn and Stavros, the movie wears its
ambitions proudly on its sleeve: nonstop action. An amusement park, a
hospital, a private "retired spy"'s retreat, most of Rome, various houses,
planes, cars and other modes of transport, and the Coliseum (!) all become
arenas for some of the most bone-rattling shoot-outs and punch-outs filmed.
They are better seen than described and are reason enough to see the film:
one jaw-dropping scene has Van Damme taking on a man who uses a switchblade
with his *feet*. (Van Damme is a good, dextrous athlete and fighter, but he
is often upstaged.)
There are other nice touches. Stavros and Quinn both want the same thing: to
retire in peace with their families. That ambition ties them together in
various ways, and also humanizes them a bit. One of the things about HK
action movies is that there's always some form of human element, and that's
carried over into this movie as well. It gives weight to scenes that would
otherwise be forgettable. Also good is Dennis Rodman, playing a weapons
dealer named Yaz -- a character who sticks out like a fistful of broken
fingers and who is funny just standing there. Rodman is natural on screen;
he's fun to watch, especially when slinging bad guys like basketballs, and
deserves to get a movie of his own, based on what's seen here: a
lightweight, fast-moving entertainment that showcases all of its pieces
excellently.

Title
Review for Evil Dead II (1987)
CAPSULE: The funniest horror movie ever made; a melange of Dario Argento and
Wile E. Coyote.
EVIL DEAD 2: DEAD BY DAWN is the result of an unstable fusion of Warner
Bros. cartoon slapstick and _giallo_ horror-movie conventions. It's a flick
with the mind of a splatter film and the heart of a Mack Sennett two-reeler.
In plain, non-fanboy language, it's a ton of disgusting fun. Example: A
monster of the undead rises from the cellar, only to have its head smashed
in the trapdoor. Its eyeball pops out and flies into the mouth of one of the
three screaming girls in the movie. GULP.
The plot, what there is of it, is simple to the point of irrelevancy. A
young man and his girlfriend head out to an abandoned cabin for a romantic
interlude, and unwittingly unleash the evil undead. The girl dies horribly
and the man (square-jawed Bruce Campbell) lives -- but as what? Horrendous
mutations strike him like epileptic fits. The dead rise out of their graves
and inflict ghastly punishments and tortures on him. His own hand rebels
against him (and the punishment he exacts on it is howlingly painful).
The majority of the movie is one long, roaring blast of slime, guts, special
effects and ear-drilling sound effects, but it's put together in a way that
gets more than a fair amount of good laughs. EVIL DEAD 2 is most likely
*the* item that started the whole trend of sly, self-referential horror
movies (culminating, of course, in the brilliantly nasty SCREAM), although
it's a lot more freakish and far-out.

Title
Review for Jiu er shen diao xia lu zhi chi xin chang jian (1992)
CAPSULE: Weird, wild, giddy Andy Lau HK something-or-other that breaks every
rule it can lay its hands on.
SAVIOR OF THE SOUL is one weird movie. I say that as praise. It freely mixes
a love story, AIRPLANE!-style slapstick, HK mega-action paradigms, and God
knows what else into a movie that moves so fast it feels twice as long as it
really is, and ends way too soon.
Andy Lau stars as a lithe and high-spirited young assassin -- one in a cadre
of three: his ladylove (who does very wicked things with knives), and his
brother. The two of them are vying for the girl's affections, of course. The
girl herself is, however, the target of a vicious and ruthless assassin:
years ago, the girl blinded the assassin's master and put out one of his own
eyes, and after an eye-popping jailbreak, sets out after the girl to even
the score.
The plot gets complicated by leaps and bounds, but never loses its grip on
us. A whole galaxy of oddball characters gets slotted in: the enigmatic Pet
Lady, who lives in a gigantic castle with her female servants/soldiers; the
girl's sister, who develops a crush on Lau's character; the weird
onnagata-esque "mama" of the assassin trio, who can't even iron her laundry
without screwing up.
One of the endearing things about HK movies, especially movies as outrageous
and fantastic as this, is how easily it spans all of the available
territory. A Western movie that tried to get away with mixing and matching
genres and styles as freely as this one did would feel bathetic; here,
because we're so obviously being given a story of the fantastic, we let our
imagination have free reign, and the whole thing works.
One of the bad guy assassin's most dangerous weapons, for instance, is a
bizarre gas which, when inhaled, allows you to *run through your opponent*
and transfer the gas to him. (If he doesn't get magical treatment in
twenty-four hours, the poor sucker becomes your slave.) Instead of just
using this as a cheap one-shot gimmick, the movie builds on it, making it
into a device on which a fair amount of the plot -- and relationships --
turns. The whole movie works like that, always at right angles to itself,
always breaking new ground with itself, and always fun.
Three and a half out of four Deadly Angels.

Title
Review for Enjeru dasuto (1994)
CAPSULE: A quasi-SILENCE OF THE LAMBS thriller from one of Japan's most
remarkable new directors, although his evident talent doesn't make this
movie really work.
I so badly wanted ANGEL DUST to be more than the sum of its parts. This is a
maddeningly slow, oddly unsatisfying movie that contains many individually
spellbinding things -- good performances, a hypnotic score and many
mesmerizing images -- but doesn't have a story that can redeem it.
The plot: Every day at six P.M. sharp, in the heart of Tokyo, a young woman
dies on the subway, the victim of a pattern killer whose motives are
obscure. One of the detectives assigned to the case is a young woman whose
former lover, a psychologist who helped deprogram former cult members, may
be somehow entangled in the killings. There are a number of twists and
revelations, none of which I'll reveal here, but I can safely say that the
plot is not exactly designed to keep the audience guessing.
The movie makes much of specific things that never really add up or go
anywhere: deprogramming, cult psychology, the dynamics between patient and
therapist, former lovers, and so on. None of these elements are really
*used* -- they're just added to the heap, and we're expected to take them
and run with them. I'm always annoyed by this strategy, which seems to imply
that any director with enough of a brain to just *mention* these things in a
movie is worth applauding.
ANGEL DUST is agonizingly leisurely in its pacing. At first this helped set
up a mood, which I always appreciate when done right, but the movie slowly
turns into nothing *but* mood. If shortened by about half an hour, it would
have been even more effective (and that's still being generous); as it
stands, it's ponderous and unrewarding. There are whole stretches of the
movie where there is so little happening that I wondered if the movie had
become permanently derailed. Then comes a quick burst of powerful visuals.
Then another slow spot. The pattern repeats. This technique quickly wears
out its welcome.
The single eeriest thing about the movie is the way it presaged the Aum
Shinri Kyo subway murders, but not in a way that grants any real insight
into the subject. What a letdown, because ANGEL DUST was directed by Sogo
Ishii, one of Japan's foremost avant-garde directors. His talent is
unmistakeable in this film -- it's probably amazing in a theater -- but he
was at the mercy of an inferior script this time around. It's hard to speak
really well of a movie when the strongest reaction it provokes is, "What the
hell was *that* all about?"

Title
Review for Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer (1986)
Henry, Portrait of a Serial Killer (1990)
A movie review by Serdar Yegulalp
Copyright 1997 by Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Bleak and point-blank -- just the way it should be. Makes its case
with cold-blooded precision and intelligence.
"Serial killer chic" is a relatively new entry to the cultural vocabulary,
and one of the more stomach-turning ones. I've never found someone
automatically admirable or even interesting because they killed creatively
or in great numbers, and because of that I had apprehensions about seeing
HENRY. I wasn't sure I wanted to see the story of multiple murderer Henry
Lee Lucas portrayed as some kind of nihilistic hero/antihero.
Thankfully, that's not the way HENRY works. The director, John McNaughton,
took a small budget and a gallery of actor friends and created a chilling
and intelligent piece of work. It doesn't provide cheap-jack explanations
for Henry's behavior: it shows him up for what he is, an unrepentant and
un-idolizable man who killed when the mood struck him.
At the film's opening, Henry's friend Ottis Toole has a sister, who comes by
to stay while she tries to find work in Chicago. In a viciously riveting
scene, he admits matter-of-factly to having murdered his own mother, and she
covers his hand with hers. They are damned together from that moment on.
Henry and Ottis eventually begin to kill for fun. The movie is especially
good at showing how they seem to have drifted casually into it: there's a
scene where the two go to buy a new TV. The pawnbroker they talk to goads
Henry with ugly words, and Henry responds by stabbing the man to death with
a soldering iron. No preface -- it smashes into us as suddenly as it does
the broker.
In a scene which many damned the movie for, unseen, they steal a video
camera and film the murder of a whole household, playing it back over and
over again for their own enjoyment. The movie itself, however, does not
glorify the killings, but shows instead that Henry feels no joy at his work,
only irritation.
HENRY succeeds thanks to excellent writing and direction as well as acting.
Michael Rooker is credible as Henry from the first frame, just standing
there, and the rest of the cast works by being unaffected and casual as
well. The producers had originally comissioned a slasher film from
McNaughton, but he decided to give them something more memorable, and
consequently the film nearly didn't see release.
The film does not glorify or justify -- it just shows us, with unflinching
coldness, what Henry was. I'm hard pressed to see how anyone can see this
and consider Henry any kind of "victim" or "hero". Then again, probably, so
would Henry.

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
There really is a Sister Helen Prejean, and she really did befriend not just
one but several Death Row inmates, serving as their spiritual advisors before
they were gassed or electrocuted.  The book "Dead Man Walking", from which
this astonishing movie is drawn, goes into far deeper detail about the
politics and inherent ugliness of Death Row, but the movie preserves the
deepest spirit of the book: to bear witness to and to bring humanity to a
troubling subject.
And what a film this is.  This is not a simple-minded piece of propaganda --
although the film is avowedly against the death penalty, it does not bore us
with speechifying.  It simply presents the case of two people -- one, a nun
who works in inner-city neighborhoods (Prejean, played radiantly by Susan
Sarandon), and the other, a death-row inmate named Matthew Poncelet (Sean
Penn) who unrepentantly aided in the murder of a lovers'-lane couple. 
(Poncelet is a fictionalized combination of several characters, but this does
not distract from the storytelling in any way.)
As the movie opens, Poncelet writes to Prejean and asks here to visit. 
Nothing more than that.  Prejean takes this in the spirit in which it was
offered, and goes to see this fellow without pretense.        With his hair
Brylcreemed back in an Elvis pompidour and his wiry facial hair, Poncelet
looks like he's some odd mixture of gigolo and back-alley dweller.  But he's
clearly scared and nervous, and he admits to Prejean that he is frightened of
dying, and wants to do whatever he can to avoid the chair.  Prejean agrees to
help him file his appeals, and draws quiet little parallels between them that
get under Poncelet's skin.
What follows from this is by turns brutally sad and achingly beautiful.
Poncelet has spent his whole life squirming on the hook, avoiding
responsibility, and one of the things Prejean does is help catalyze the
latent guilt inside of him.  Not by lecturing him, although she does do that
every so often, but simply by confronting him with his own humanity, and
hers.  At one point Poncelet makes something like a pass at her (she's
moderately attractive, and he is a prisoner, afer all), and she simply looks
at him and murmurs: "Here you are with death breathing on your neck and
you're playing your little man- on-the-make games."  He seems ashamed, like a
schoolboy who has been caught sneaking a puff in the boy's room (even the way
he smokes is guilt-ridden, come to think of it).  Then again, in many ways,
he *is* a boy, and a good deal of his stance comes from trying to "take
things like a man" -- all macho bluff, without any of the real humility and
sensitivity that maturity requires.
The film also toys with the possibility that Poncelet is not entirely guilty,
that he was ramrodded through the system as a scapegoat while a confederate
in the crime (who may have done the actual trigger-pulling) was given a life
sentence.  But by the time we learn the truth about this, it's irrelevant. 
The question is not Poncelet's guilt in the eyes of the law, but his sense of
dignity.  Murderer or no, Prejean argues, he is human, and what we are doing
in this cold and calculated way is every bit as hateful and vile as what he
did in his drunkenness and shallow stupidity.
Prejean's attitude about Poncelet is put all the more brutally to the test
when she goes to the parents of the victims and haltingly tries to help them
as well.  At first they angrily spurn her offerings.  One couple horribly
misinterprets her help as a sign that she's "changed sides" (although in
Prejean's mind, the only "sides" are life and death).  But one of the fathers
lets her into his heart, and realizes that it hurts worse to suffer alone no
matter what.
The final half-hour of the film has the midnight execution deadline looming,
and brings Poncelet back into contact with his family.  His mother appears
briefly at a parole board hearing earlier in the movie, a thin and pathetic
figure, and breaks down sobbing before she can even speak of her son at all.
Poncelet's brothers sit with him in the visiting room and act like they're
unruly schoolboys at detention, while their mother sighs and shakes her head,
and we get a hint of what was lacking all along.
And then there is death itself.  This is not one of those movies where there
is some fancy courtroom theatrics that brings down a last-minute reprieve.
Poncelet and Prejean stare down death in the face together, and in the end
there is redemption, but not in the form of Poncelet praising Christ, either:
there's real redemption, with the victim's families standing there behind a
glass partition while Poncelet bares his soul.
Penn and Sarandon disappear completely into their characters; there isn't a
moment I was less than convinced of their performances.  The supporting cast
(with R. Lee Ermey as one of the fathers and Robert Prosky as a death-row
lawyer) is also excellent, and the director is none other than Sarandon's
longtime companion Tim Robbins.  This film shows him to be gifted and
perceptive in ways that most Hollywood films are incapable of being, because
they are handicapped by the sense that you *need* to have the 11th-hour
reversal of fortune, etc.  Here, Robbins simply wades into the story, and does
amazing justice to it.
When people are interested in finding movies that are uplifting or
"spiritual", this is one of the first films I mention.        I hope they see what
I mean.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Towards the end of "8MM", a detective named Tom Welles (Nicholas Cage) comes
face-to-face with a small group of men who have produced a snuff film -- the
filmed record of the murder of a girl, for money.  "Why?" he asks them, which
is all any sane man would say.  To which they answer: "Because we could."
Unlike so many other movies about human depravity, "8MM" confronts
unflinchingly the possibility of absolute evil in the world.  Instead of
being one of those by-the-numbers jobs about a Nice Guy who gets pushed into
being a one-man army of vengeance while the audience cheers, it makes the
"hero" into a figure almost as tragic as the men he's trying to convince
himself to punish.
In the abstract, "8MM" is a thriller.  Welles is a highly-pedigreed PI who is
hired by a wealthy widower.  He's a family man; the work that he does hardly
seems to touch his real life, and his biggest vice is that he smokes and tries
to lie about it to his wife.  When he takes the case, all he thinks about is
how it'll pay for his daughter's college tuition.
The case doesn't even seem all that disturbing to begin with.  The widower
presents Welles with a reel of 8mm film that was among her late husband's
possessions -- the aforementioned snuff reel.  Welles isn't convinced it's
authentic; he recites the police litany about snuff films being urban legends.
But she's paying, and he needs the dough, so off he goes.
The first half-hour of the film is dogged detective work, which we see in
detail.  Welles fixates on the girl in the film and decides to treat this as
a missing-persons case.  He eventually identifies the girl -- she'd been
reported missing quite a while back -- and poses as a government agent to
speak to her mother (Amy Morton).  The scenes between Welles and the mother
are some of the best moments in the movie.  She has been saving birthday
gifts for her daughter, stacked up on the endtable, in the event she comes
home, but Welles cannot tell her what he fears to be the truth.
Welles eventually finds himself in Hollywood, tracking the girl through any
number of sleazy dives.  He hooks up with a porno-store salesman named Max
California (Joaquim Phoenix), who becomes his Virgil to Welles's Dante in the
hell of underground porn.  The film observes with cold-eyed horror as they
push their way into ugly, dank clubs littered with people who seem only human
by volition, and spend appalling amounts of money for what are allegedly
films of Filipino women being raped, tortured and slaughtered.        But in one of
the story's best reversals, they find the same girl in several of the
"murder" movies.  More fakery.        Another dead end.
Welles keeps digging.  He finds a low-rent porno-movie producer, Eddie Poole
(the greasy James Gandolfini), who apparently knows more than he's letting on,
and from him Welles learns about Dino Velvet (Peter Stormare), a director of
high-art S&M porn productions.  Welles theorizes that a regular of Velvet's
movies, Machine (Chris Bauer), a leather-masked slab of muscle, may be the
murderer in the snuff film, and tries to set up a trap for all of them.
What happens next I will not reveal, of course, but the movie knows better
than to simply roll the credits when the last bad guy has been shot dead. 
Instead, we are pushed closer and closer to the real horror -- the
understanding that there are people who are simply evil.  Not "sick", not
insane, but evil by choice, because they know nothing stands in their way. 
Welles, confronted with all this, collapses.  There is a scene where he has
the chance to take revenge, but cannot, and instead picks up the phone and
tries to get someone to talk him into doing it.
Many critics hated "8MM" for WHAT it showed -- the fact that it was about
sleazy, ugly subjects.  I think to criticize a film like "8MM" for what it
shows, and to ignore the fact that HOW it shows it is enlightening and
revealing, is to completely miss the point.  If there are in fact people like
Dino Velvet, and Machine -- and Tom Welles -- then perhaps we only fool
ourselves by blaming the bearer of the bad news.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Homicide (1991)
CAPSULE: One of David Mamet's most underrated and unseen movies; a
blunt-nosed and memorable story about a man waking up to the sound of his
own soul.
The criminally underrated HOMICIDE is one of David Mamet's best movies. It
is not as clever or devious as HOUSE OF GAMES or THE SPANISH PRISONER, but
it strikes markedly different notes than either of those films. Among many
other things, it's also one of the few recent movies that deals
intelligently with the notion of ethnic identity and the subordination of
same -- and the consequences of that subordination.
HOMICIDE features a cop, Bobby Gold (Joe Mantegna), who has tried to keep a
great deal about himself on the back burner. He is a Jew, but he has
developed a whole arsenal of reasons for closeting that part of himself
away. Case in point: when another officer calls him a "kike", he flinches
and cocks his fist, but we get the feeling that he's doing it more out of a
sense of obligation. Someone calls you fighting words, you fight. HOMICIDE
is not about the fight per se, but about the motives.
The plot centers around a candy-store murder. An old woman, the proprietrix,
was shot dead in a robbery, and her son, a doctor, more or less drafts Gold
into investigating the killing. The doctor assumes that Gold will give a
damn by dint of his own Jewishness, but he doesn't. Or, more accurately, he
tries not to, and has it blow up in his face. This is interwoven with
another case that Gold is trying to work on -- a drug dealer on the run --
and, like Gold, we don't realize that he can't resolve either case without
getting a few issues about himself straightened out. 
The dialogue is vintage Mamet: fast, sharp, spattered with invectives and
expletives, but always at the service of the story and the characters.
There's one scene that perfectly dramatizes how ugly dialogue can be made to
serve the larger purposes of a movie: Gold is on the phone, ranting about
the fact that he's been yanked off the drug bust and put on this pathetic
candy-store shooting. Out of his mouth emerge words that he would consider
vile coming from anyone else, and it isn't until he's shown up later on that
he realizes what he has done.
Mamet fills the production with a gallery of actors he's familiar with and
lets them do their stuff, like jazz musicians who are in a tight ensemble
together: William H. Macy, long one of my favorite actors; Mantegna; J.J.
Barry, Ving Rhames. They all work, and they all convince us that there's a
lot more going on here than is only hinted at on the surface. Especially in
the case of Bobby Gold, who is a classic case of a man trying very hard not
to know who he is. Then one fine day, he catches up with himself.
syegul@cablehouse.dyn.ml.org                 EFNet IRC: GinRei / ICQ: 934998
http://cablehouse.dyn.ml.org/serdar                another worldly device...
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
CAPSULE: Much ado about something, but what? Terry Gilliam's latest
offering builds and builds towards some kind of incredible payoff, and
gives us much to look at and adsorb along the way, but only burps instead
of exploding.
Terry Gilliam is a rare bird: possibly gifted by genius, but at the same
time hampered by far too much *near*-genius for his own good. TWELVE
MONKEYS is a good example of this, a film of near-genius that has many
moments of greatness but never quite finishes what it starts.
In one of his best performances, Bruce Willis is a member of a hive-like
commune of criminals who live far underground in a future world that's been
decimated by a mysterious disease. The scientists who run the place (all of
whom look like mutant versions of the War Room staff in DR. STRANGELOVE)
want to send Willis's character back in time to gather clues about how the
disease was propagated. Willis's character also remembers something from
his own childhood, a death in an airport at around the time of the
outbreak, that he is itching to resolve. He is a lonely, longing fellow,
one whom it turns out to be far easier to feel empathy for than we
initially think.
Willis appears in Baltimore, 1990, and meets several intriguing characters.
When thrown into an asylum, he meets Brad Pitt (in another excellent acting
job), a certifiably insane fellow with more ideas than his head can
possibly do justice to. He also meets Madeline Stowe, a doctor who takes a
very strange and persistent interest in Cole. Beyond that, I'd be loathe to
reveal any more -- and in fact, it'd be difficult to do so without
extensive notes. The script becomes incredibly thorny and complicated at
times, but Gilliam is an expert at making those convolutions seem clear and
self-explanatory, especially in a nightmare flashback that changes every
time we see it.
What makes the movie unsatisfying are two things. One, Gilliam's lack of
on-screen restraint is legendary. He seems compelled to include things that
aren't really thematically essential -- or at least he doesn't make their
thematical need visible -- such as the extended insane-asylum sequences. I
got the feeling they wound up in the script because Gilliam is a sucker for
insane asylum sequences and the attendant over-acting. And two, the movie
has a totally closed-ended ending -- meaning that everything gets tied up
so completely that we sit there wondering, "Was that it?"
That, indeed, seems to have been it. If that's the point, then the setup
was leading us astray. And while the movie is enjoyable to watch and never
insulting or confusing, it doesn't quite fulfill its promise.

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
CAPSULE: Huh huh huh. Heh hmh hmh. If you're not already snickering at the
prospects, this probably isn't the movie for you, but there are many, many
laugh-out-loud moments.
First, a confession: Beavis and Butt-head, those neo-Chaucerian Harlequins
of MTV, make me laugh. They're absolutely on target. We've seen their kind
before, in the backs of every classroom we've ever had to waste our lives
in, behind convenience stores and maybe even in our own homes. (Jeez, I
hope not.)
"Beavis and Butt-head Do America" takes the basic premises of the
censor-infuriating TV series, stretches them to movie-size, lights the
fuse, and gets the heck out of there, leaving us to enjoy the blast wave as
it slams our tuchis to the ground. It's not the funniest movie ever made,
but it's amusing for most of the time and there are moments where I laughed
harder than anything in recent memory. (One of the best jokes involves a
running gag about cavity searches -- just so you know what to expect.)
The plot, what little there is of it, is a gag on which to hang an endless
series of complications -- most of them centering around the Dimwit Duo's
infallible stupidity. The movie opens with their TV being stolen, and the
way this is introduced to the audience and then the protags (dare we call
them that?) is a little masterpiece of timing.
The two hit the streets to find their TV, and in the process get embroiled
in a very strange plot to go kill someone for money. The way in which their
instructions are misinterpreted gets one good laugh after another --
leading to a great mini-punchline when the woman who is to be killed offers
them even more money to go back and kill their employer. (I am treading
carefully here to avoid ruining anything.) From there they get embroiled in
an even weirder plot that centers around a stolen chemical weapon sewn into
the seat of Beavis's pants. And so on.
I had (and won, I think) an argument with someone after the movie when they
said it was stupid. No, I said -- it's ABOUT stupidity. That's why it's
funny: it points out things about them that a less-ambitious movie would
never get it in its head to attempt. It's not enough that Beavis and
Butt-head are about as repulsive to women as a pair of cold corpses. It's
that they try to use stale pick-up lines, and can't even get them straight,
or tell dirty jokes and botch the punchlines. In short, it's about an
attitude. If Beavis and Butt-head do nothing for you but try your patience,
you'll probably get more yuks elsewhere, but my only criterion for whether
a comedy works is: Did it make me laugh? Sure, I did.

Title
Review for Mortal Kombat (1995)
CAPSULE: Just plain fun -- no more, no less. Check your brain, and don't
think futzing with a D-pad is going to change the storyline.
I didn't want to see this film. As enamored as I am of video-game culture, I
still went in with gritted teeth. "Okay," I snarled, making it sound like a
dare, "entertain me."
MK is as silly and ephemeral as any trendsploitation movie has ever been
(when do we get the MAGIC: THE GATHERING flick, for instance?), but it's one
of the best made -- certainly one of the best-looking -- and a ton of
lowbrow fun. I've got high standards for most movies, but I can still be a
pushover for a good, silly picture: high production values, yards of action,
nothing that would make the movie seem rancidly exploitive or cynical. MK
fits all three categories nicely.
Based somewhat loosely on the video game that made video games a bad juju
with parents all over again, MORTAL KOMBAT takes three heroes and pits them
against impossible odds -- evil magic, vicious martial-arts masters, demons
with four arms, and everything else the makeup and FX people could plaster
together or digitally synthesize. Do they win? Are movie-theater floor
sticky in summertime? Well... devil's in the details, y'know, so feel free
to read on.
Mortal Kombat, as we learn, is a cosmic karateka that takes place between
our world and some outlying dimension you don't want to get stuck in after
the last bar closes. The best of the best come to fight, and if "we"
(meaning Earth) wins, the world doesn't get overrun by evil for another
generation. Our three heroes, Liu Kang, Sonya and Johnny Cage, all come into
the contest with considerable trepidations and a little emotional baggage of
their own. Their nemesis is the cold-hearted Shang Tsung (played with tasty
nastiness by Cary Hiroyuki-Tagawa, who always gets roles like this), and
their mentor is the god of thunder, Raiden (also hammed up happily by none
other than Christopher Lambert, the best bad actor around).
The movie isn't a masterpiece of story or intellect -- but it does something
few movies of this type do well: it grabs you from the start and keeps you
solidly entertained all the way through. Almost every scene begins and ends
with a spectacularly choreographed fight, and the photography is stylish and
fast-moving. This is the kind of movie where you want to take home the
stills and hang them on your wall.
What else makes the movie work? A sly sense of self-referential humor, which
thankfully isn't overdone. (Watch, for instance, the way the battle between
Johnny Cage and Skorpion ends, and pay careful attention to the very last
shot. It's a howler.) Lambert has great fun as Raiden, and everyone involved
seems to be enjoying themselves. Which, when you think about it, isn't
something you can base on any one thing; it's everything.
I recently saw a movie with similar ambitions -- the uninvolving CRYING
FREEMAN -- and walked out disappointed. Why? Nobody seemed to be really
enjoying themselves. It all looked like one giant slog. MK may not be the
best movie ever made, but it's a gas, and few enough movies are good on just
that level.

Title
Review for "Blue Seed" (1995)
CAPSULE: A mixture of POLTERGEIST, ALIEN, THE X-FILES and
CLUELESS. Obviously, an item at odds with itself.
BLUE SEED is an anime that feels as if it's suffering from multiple
personality disorder. Equal parts of POLTERGEIST, ALIEN and of course
the ubiquitous X-FILES have gone into this story of a team of experts
recruited to stop supernatural incursions (by force if neccesary) in
modern-day Tokyo. What brings the whole thing crashing down in on
itself is a tone and tenor to the material that feels lifted from
something with the featherweight plotting and writing of
CLUELESS. Even stranger is that the whole thing is the product of Yuzo
Takada, who gave us the searing and excellent 3X3 EYES series.
Much of the story focuses on Moumiji Fujimiya, a young girl who's
become the target of a hideous monstrosity called the Kushinada. (It's
relatively easy to get the tricky Japanese names down pat when they're
repeated ad nauseam.) Apparently Moumiji has honorable blood in her
veins, and her death would mean a great deal to this
creature. However, there's someone also vying for her death: Mamoru
Kusanagi, who's been implanted with a kind of symbiotic organism
called the "blue seed", which gives him fantastic power (at the
expense of his humanity). This is all potentially interesting, but the
story doesn't go much of anywhere with it.
The story quickly sets itself up into neatly encapsulated half-hour
set-ups. The biggest significant event, which is gotten over with
relatively quickly, is Moumiji's own implantation with one of the Blue
Seeds (more or less by accident), which gives her an sixth-sense sort
of edge over the monsters she faces off with.  But the setups and
resolutions are so quick and tacky that they don't develop the story
in more than unsatisfactory little nibbles. There's not enough sense
of real carry-over from one segment to the next, and the characters
are developed with fairly obvious, broad strokes. One of them, for
instance -- Koume, the "weapons specialist" (i.e., hotheaded woman
with a gun) wins Moumiji's friendship in an episode that we remember
more for its manipulativeness than anything else.
BLUE SEED's biggest problem is its overall tone. At core, this is much
darker material than I think the filmmakers had the nerve to
admit. There's a a great deal of effort by them to lighten the story
-- dumb panty gags, for instance -- that it's ultimately
counterproductive. BLUE SEED seems to have been made with the mind of
a horror film and the heart of a sitcom. It's not a good compromise.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
CAPSULE: Where are you tonight, Leni Rienfenstal?
STARSHIP TROOPERS is an expensive, hateful and unenjoyable piece of violent
pornography -- and bad pornography, at that. It is not good cinema, not good
storytelling, and not even stupid fun: it's so cynically, calculatedly
bone-headed that even the least demanding members of the audience I was with
were alternately bored and revulsed. It's one of the worst movies I've seen
in a long time.
Why am I calling this movie pornography? Pornography, in the abstract, is
anything which is calculated to appeal to the baser instincts. I remember
reading a review of FULL METAL JACKET which described the climact moment at
the end of the movie, where Private Joker has to shoot the downed VC sniper,
as "a near-pornographic eternity". I didn't agree with that assessment, but
I could see what was being implied: the reviewer felt as if the audience was
being incited to stand up and pump their fists and shout "DO 'er, man, DO
'er!"
That sentiment is echoed ad nauseam throughout STARSHIP TROOPERS. It's
*literally* like a giant recruitment film that has gone berserk. It tries
frantically to enlist our emotions but it winds up only being dull or
sickening.
The film takes place in our future, when Earth has come under attack by some
alien species that doesn't appear to have intelligence. To counterattack,
humankind does the single stupidest thing imaginable: instead of nuke the
planet from orbit, which they're clearly capable of, they send down grunts
with M-16 rifles. This isn't Heinlein, it's a bad WWII movie, one where all
the most obvious points of satire are ever poked and prodded in combat
scenes that are noisy, repetitive, and ultimately tiresome. (One scene has a
journalist on a battlefield, filimg soldiers being slaughtered, and ends
with groaning predictability: said cameraman gets skewered, too.)
The soldiers and their commanders are consistently idiotic. They do not
possess a germ of tactical intelligence or even common sense. They don't
even behave like soldiers in a bad *movie*, and therefore we don't care
about them. We hated the Tom Berenger character in PLATOON, but he
*mattered*, and therefore we were curious to learn about his fate. Here, we
don't even hate the bugs -- what's there to hate? Hating them would be like
cursing a hurricaine. If there's anything really hateful there, the movie
doesn't know how to give it to us.
The screenwriter (Ed Neumeier -- perhaps a better appelation would be
"screen typist") and director (the increasingly talent-impaired Paul
Verhoeven) have not found any way to make the characters or the story serve
each other. One of the subplots concerns a woman pilot who's great at
getting out of tight situations, and does it again and again and again. Once
or twice is fine. By the fifth or sixth time, it's worn out its welcome.
There's never any sense that these people are really thinking their way out
of anything, or really being tested to show their mettle.
Also, the movie is irritatingly selective with how effective the bugs are to
Earthling weaponry. If a bug has one of the humans screaming in its grasp,
then five guys can stand around it and blast away on full auto without doing
a damned thing. But if one human gets cornered, he lays waste to whole
platoons of bugs with one clip. Uh-huh.
The very worst feature of the movie is its repulsive quasi-fascist flavor. 
I say "quasi-" because while the movie uses many of the trappings of fascism
ot eroticize its action -- the gear, the uniforms, etc. -- the movie doesn't
have the nerve (or the brains) to be genuinely fascist, or intelligent about
the subject. The bumpers between scenes, which are apparently intended to
parody wartime recruitment propaganda ARE propaganda -- just so clumsy and
oafish that they wind up making the bugs look relatively innocuous in
comparison. Like the rest of the movie.
There's more, I suppose, but it's not worth it. The acting is bland, neither
arsenic nor gravy; the music disposable; the camerawork turgid. The
heartbreaking thing is that it makes INDEPENDENCE DAY look like a
masterpiece.

Title
Review for Adventures of Priscilla, Queen of the Desert, The (1994)
CAPSULE: Far better than the unfunny TO WONG FOO..., PRISCILLA combines a
Damon Runyan-ized version of the drag life with some really heartfelt
moments.
"The Sixty-Four Thousand Dollar Question," drawls transsexual Bernadette
(Terence Stamp), in response to the simple query: "Why? Why do you do it?"
What, indeed, would possess anyone to dress up in outlandish costumes and
lip-synch to Abba and CeCe Peniston? PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT,
doesn't really have an Answer, but it has an aggregate of little bits of
understanding that sorta kinda add up to an entertaining story.
Bernadette and her two cohorts (Hugo Weaving and Guy Pierce) have a drag
stage show in Sydney. Hugo's character's wife runs a casino in Alice
Springs, and they're desperate for cash -- they need some kind of
attraction. With the kind of headstrong fortitude that's rarely seen
anywhere except in the movies, they throw themselves into a customized bus
and set out through the desert.
The movie then turns into a kind of outback-meets-drag version of EASY
RIDER, but with a lot more predictability. The first time they stop off in
town, they get off the bus wearing the loudest outfits they can muster, and
try to order a drink, and get into a drinking contest with a butch barmaid.
Even odder is a stopover with a mechanic and her deranged mail-order bride,
although where that scene ends, the movie takes some interesting new
detours. Unfortunately, a good deal of what comes in between is filler --
the breakdown in the desert, the warm reception by a gang of aborigines,
etc.
The mechanic, Bob (Bill Hunter) is one of the more sympathetic people in
the movie, and he winds up sticking around and putting the antics of the
others into context. Not only that, but he starts serving as a real foil
for Bernadetter, an intelligent person who is obviously getting fed up with
the limited substance of her life. Also interesting is Hugo's character --
his wife and child are far more comfortable with the idea of his way of
life than he is, and it takes him a long time to get used to that.
PRISCILLA is loopy and funny in places, but the real substance of the movie
lies in Terence Stamp's character -- a credible person trapped in some very
oddball circumstances. And once that hits home, a lot of the rest of the
movie seems a little superfluous. PRISCILLA is not a bad movie, but not an
exceptionally good one, either. I suspect the definitive movie about drag
really has yet to come along.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
"The Matrix" is a movie that one goes into for a special-effects ride, and
comes away from with a story.  In today's Hollywood, that's something to
write home about.  It dazzles, it entertains, and it even provokes a bit --
it's got at its core some remarkably soulful themes, including the question:
who among us are heroes, but those that simply stand up when the moment
arises?
The movie features Neo (Keanu Reeves), a computer enthusiast whose day job
may be in danger because he spends too many of his nights hunched over his
computer, illegally swapping files with other criminal digerati.  Some of
them are a little more high-flown than others: Apparently a near-godlike
superhacker named Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne) has been urgently trying to
get in touch with him. He eventually does so -- through a cell phone that
arrives by Federal Express (!) -- but Neo doesn't understand why Morpheus is
so fixated on him. Eventually Neo and Morpheus do meet, and...
And at this point I hesitate to say any more about the plot, because one of
the movie's grandest pleasures does not deserve to be ruined through a
review, but if you wish to know more, read on.        Neo's world of skyscrapers
and computers literally doesn't exist -- it's a digitized fiction fed to him
by direct neural input.  He and the entire rest of the human race are living
like pickled plums in vats of organic goo, kept sane through the illusion of
reality while their brainpower and bodily energies are "harvested" by...
well, things that certainly aren't human.
The plot warps onwards.  Morpheus and his band of hackers break Neo out of
his prison and show him the real world.  More than that, they also give him
the tools to fight their war back inside the Matrix -- the name for the
computer-controlled illusion that the rest of the human race is still living
inside.  Morpheus is convinced that Neo has power over the Matrix that no
other human being has, but Neo is less quick to believe.  Sure, he's
fascinated by his potential (there's a hilarious scene where he gets
"downloaded" various martial arts), but also unnerved by it.  After all, A),
if what came before wasn't real, how is *this* any more real?  And B), who's
to say that what they say about me is true, regardless?  "The Matrix" does a
nice job of confronting these ideas.
What "The Matrix" does best, however, is entertain, and I regret not spelling
this out sooner.  This is, simply put, one of the most visually transcendent
movies ever made.  When we see Neo and his gang engaged in a gun battle, it's
not just another action sequence: it's a metaphor for what's going on in the
hero's minds.  And in a way, a reflection of what we would all like to do, in
a way: reincarnate ourselves as superhuman fighting machines on a war to save
humanity from mental slavery.  That's what makes it more than just an action
film -- its action furthers a larger agenda.
The evil of the Matrix is emodied in the forms of the Agents -- AIs that take
on human form (and look, predictably, like MIBs).  The most deliciously 
sinister of the bunch, Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving), seems like a mouthpiece
for the Matrix in general -- he's not just coldly disconnected or indifferent
to humanity, the way the Borg in "Star Trek" were, but outright disgusted by
it.  Smith has a great scene with Morpheus where he spells out his revulsion
in terms that only an AI could love.
What I liked best about "The Matrix" was how it satisfied so many levels of
the audience's attention at once.  It's the only successful cross-pollination
of John Woo gunplay, techno-wizardry, Phil K. Dick-like meditations on the
nature of reality and destiny and wall-crunching, ass-kicking martial arts I
know of. Such is the nature of cinematic innovation in 1999.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
Here we've got a really rare bird: a film so stupid it can't even make fun of
itself properly. You know a culture is in trouble when even its trash doesn't
stick to your mind.
SPICE WORLD may not be the worst big-name movie ever made -- I'm divided at
this point between SPECIES II and MONEY TRAIN, with NORTH in the running --
but it's not even a good crummy movie. It's just crummy. I kept begging for a
moment of some halfway genuine wit -- a mistake, a sneeze, a sense that they
just grabbed something and ran with it instead of staying with the script. No
such luck. That script, by the way, plays out like something they scratched
onto a soggy cocktail napkin at a producer's party.
Comparing this movie to A HARD DAY'S NIGHT would be a sinful mistake.  A HARD
DAY'S NIGHT was conceived as a quick exploitation package to cash in on the
Beatles' popularity, but two things happened: one, the Beatles stuck around
and became more important than anyone could have guessed; two, the movie was
brilliant. Neither exception applies to this film. We get performance
segments which are flimsy and witless, padded with revue-type material that
doesn't garner a single chuckle, and fistfuls of stuff shoveled in that dates
the movie horribly (like a dumb X-FILES gag, complete with halogen
flashlights). The Girls are also disturbingly untalented (again, unlike the
Beatles) -- there's five of them bleating away up there, and collectively
they don't even add up to ONE good singer.
Who are these girls, anyway? Despite their variegated appearances and
hairstyles, they're one indistinguishable pulpy blob. What frightens me the
most is that like so many other junk-food culture artifacts aimed at the
younger set -- the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles or the Power Rangers -- there
aren't any real individuals in the group. There's just this kind of
amorphous, composite personality that they pass around between them, like the
three crones in Greek legend who all shared one eye. I hate reading a great
deal into pop-culture phenomena, but if the Spice Girls send a message of any
kind, it's twofold: that it's better to subordinate your personality to a
premanufactured group identity, and that trash not only sells, but
aggressively seeks its own level. Santayana once bemoaned America's love
affair with trash, and he noted that it wasn't the trash that bothered him,
but the love.
he film's most telling moment: Immediately after a performance, someone tells
the Girls, "That was perfect -- without actually being any good." Imagine
that. A moment of genuine insight, in the middle of this movie. Maybe there
is a God.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
CAPSULE: Side-splitting comedy that follows its own merciless logic almost
through to the end... but not without providing a good deal of genuine
laughs.
Most comedies these days have one flaw. They're not funny. They think
they're funny, but they are devoid of anything really penetrating or
dastardly. Occasionally a good funny movie sneaks past the deadening
Hollywood preconceptions of humor and we get a real gem: RUTHLESS PEOPLE,
for instance, which established a microcosm of a setup and played it out to
the bitter end.
LIAR LIAR is built the same way and is just about as funny. This is one of
the few movies I've seen where I was laughing consistently almost all the
way through: instead of a couple of set-pieces that inspired a laugh (think
of the dismal FATAL INSTINCT), the whole movie works like clockwork.
Jim Carrey playes a high-powered lawyer, to whom lying is as natural as
breathing. There is one thing he takes seriously, though: his son, and we
can sense the affection that they have for each other right away. But his
wife is divorced and seeing another man, and now it looks like they may move
away together. The son goes with them, of course.
The movie sets up this early material with good timing and a remarkable
balance of Jim Carrey's over-the-top persona with reality. Then the plot
springs into action: after being snubbed (not deliberately) by his father at
his birthday, the kid makes a wish as he blows out the birthday candles:
that for just one day, Dad can't lie. He gets the wish.
What happens next is sidesplitting. Everything turns into a confrontation:
when cornered by a bum for some change, he shouts, "No! I'm not giving you
any money because I know you'll spend it on booze! All I want to do is to
get to the office without having to step over the debris of our decaying
society!" He can't even get into an elevator without earning a black eye.
And what's worse, he's now gotten himself into an expensive divorce
settlement that requires him to twist the truth like abstract wire
sculpture.
Carrey, who I used to find unfunny, has gotten better at his schtick, even
if it's a limited one. He uses it to great effect in this movie. There is a
scene where he tries to test his ability to lie and nearly demolishes his
office in the process (there's a grin breaking out across my face right now,
just remembering the scene). He can't even WRITE the lie; his fingers
twitch, his body buckles like someone in the throes of cyanide poisoning,
and when he tries to talk it's like he's speaking in tongues. Equally funny
is a scene where he beats himself to a pulp (don't ask why), tries to drink
water to keep from having outbursts in the courtroom (it fails, with
semi-predictable results), and winds up biting the bullet when he gets
called into the boardroom to have everyone ask what they think of them. This
scene alone may force people to stop the tape for minutes on end.
The movie sustains its laughs and also its flashes of insight until almost
the end. A shame, too, because the movie insists on having a big, ridiculous
climax that involves Carrey's character flagging down a plane using a set of
motorized stairs, then breaking his leg, etc. A simple reconciliation would
do the trick. Why is this stupid pent-up climax always obligatory? It's not
even part of the movie's real agenda. Thankfully, LIAR LIAR survives it, and
so does Carrey. Maybe they were being merciful, on reflection. If I'd
laughed any more, I might have needed an iron lung.

Title
Review for Ikiru (1952)
CAPSULE: One of the best dramas ever made, a movie about life and death,
and the Big Question of both of them.
"This is an X-ray of the stomach of the man in this movie," intones a voice
at the start of Akira Kurosawa's IKIRU, one of the best dramas ever made.
The voice is flat, mechanical, maybe even a little officious. "He has
cancer. He's dying, but he doesn't know it yet. As a matter of fact, he's
hardly even aware that he's alive."
The man in question is a middle-level Tokyo-city bureaucrat named Kanji
Watanabe, and is played by one of the most remarkable actors in the
Japanese studio system aside from Toshiro Mifune: Takashi Shimura. If
you've seen other Kurosawa movies, you've almost certainly seen him at some
point, playing gentle, almost grandfatherly types. In IKIRU he manages to
make himself look anonymous, Everyman-ish, and it works. From the minute we
see him, we simply accept him as being the dull little man we need to see
him as. His performance is so understated, it works subliminally.
Watanabe, as the introduction makes plain, has stomach cancer, and he
learns the truth of his condition in a scene of almost unbelievable
emotional intensity. While waiting for the doctor, he is confronted by
another patient, who describes in sarcastic and cynical language just how
the cancer patients get dealt with. He describes and anticipates all of
Watanabe's symptoms dead-on. The camera has the other patient in the
background, almost talking to himself, with Shimura almost up against the
lens -- staring and staring, like a rabbit trapped in a car's headlights
before it's crushed.
Watanabe does not handle the news well: his first impulse is to get drunk,
and he does this with a companion in a series of scenes that play like he's
wandering through the circles of Hell. But as he sinks into his misery, we
see more and more about how he's come to be like this. His son sees him as
a cipher. His co-workers never saw him as a human being (his office
nickname was "The Mummy"). And when a spirited younger co-worked quits and
takes a far lower-paying job in a factory to simply stay sane and not die
of boredom, he follows her in an almost puppyish attempt to perhaps acquire
some of her energy.
Slowly, Watanabe puts together a plan to fight back against death, by
pushing through a project to build a playground that has been
systematically turned down by one arm of the city bureaucracy after
another. He finds a purpose, and in that purpose reinvigorates himself long
enough to see the job through. There is one scene, frightening in its
power, where he has run afoul of a yakuza, and only smiles knowingly when
the other man threatens him with a knife. He has already stared death down
and won.
The movie's final stretch is unusually constructed: it takes place after
Watanabe's death, at his wake. His do-nothing co-workers arrive, quarrel
over what was going on in Watanabe's life when he died, learn the truth,
and then pledge to change... but in an emotionally overwhelming conclusion,
we find that nothing is ever that easy. Some people have found the ending
unsatisfying, but on a second viewing of the movie, I realized it was the
only ending that made sense. By having the rest of the office betray
Watanabe's memory, we are invited to proselytize in their place.
IKIRU is a sad movie, but it earns every moment. It is not a "tear-jerker";
it doesn't attempt to manipulate us unfairly. It just presents us with a
case of a man faced with a giant and unanswerable question: How should we
live? More importantly, how should we live in the shadow of death? IKIRU
confronts this question, certainly the largest and most difficult question
any of us would have to wrestle with, and comes away with an answer -- not
bromides, not placation, and not cant, but an exhortation. Roger Ebert has
said that if there was ever any one movie that he felt could truly induce
its viewers to make a change in their lives, this would be it, and I agree.
Akira Kurosawa seemed determined to make one movie in every genre before he
died, and in IKIRU he made one of the most emotionally affecting and
enduring dramas ever. This is a bold and direct movie about life as well as
death, something that very few works of fiction are ever able to approach
without descending into preachiness or sentiment.

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
STAR WARS did for the movies what Elvis Presley did for popular music:
broadened its scope, intensified its appeal, caused a shattering impact on
public consciousness. For every American under thirty and a good many over
thirty, STAR WARS stood as *the* cultural landmark (aside from maybe "Star
Trek" and Madonna) in its time.
What is most astonishing, twenty years later, is that STAR WARS has not
aged one bit. It has the same romantic sweep and unabashed audience-rocking
joy that made it stand out like a boulder amongst grains of sand. Audiences
in the Seventies were getting fed up with anti-heroes and unpleasantness
for its own sake; they still had a thirst for heroes, for a real sense of
good guys 'n bad guys. STAR WARS slaked that thirst, but by playing
straight and sweet rather than stupid.
Aside from being possibly the ultimate movie experience -- emotional and
visceral -- this time, STAR WARS surprised me with how subtle a good deal
of it is, something I attribute to seeing the movie after what feels like a
whole other lifetime of experience. Many of the movie's best moments are
sub-verbal and even subliminal. When Ben (Obi-Wan) Kenobi (the inimitable
Alec Guinness, in a role he at first refused to take) presents Luke
Skywalker (Mark Hammill) with his father's lightsaber, Luke turns it on
without even being told how. Such is destiny. And when Ben perks up at the
mention of the name Obi-Wan, and Luke asks him "Is he dead?", Ben looks
sidelong and says, "Oh, he's not dead. Not yet," in a way that forebodes
everything and nothing.
Han Solo (Harrison Ford, looking impossibly young) is another character
who's easy to misread as a stereotype. Look carefully at the scene between
him and Luke before the attack on the Death Star. Han does not sound like
he's convinced of his own greed; he sounds angry and recriminative, and his
parting line to Luke -- "May the Force be with you" -- tells us that his
thoughts and his actions, and his heart, are very deeply divided indeed.
The relationship with Leia (Carrie Fisher) is divded between bickering and
backslapping, but it's the germ of the developments to come between them in
THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK. (Another thing that comes to mind on watching the
movie is how well it fits in as part of a larger whole. We learn just
enough to know there is a larger story, and sidelong references get spun
out into a great deal more in the succeeding movies.)
There has been a good deal, both good and bad, written about the way the
movie has been reworked. For the most part, the changes are positive --
they didn't change anything that wasn't broken to begin with, so to speak.
I will not ruin any surprises (of which there are more than a few), but I
will say that the best scenes, the ones that worked as is, are all still
the same: The lightsaber duel. The chess game. The 'droid scrapheap. All of
these touches were technology in the service of a carefully deployed story.
In a couple of places, there have been changes to more thoroughly evoke an
atmopshere (the changes to Mos Eiseley are jawdropping and nicely done), or
to replace an effect which didn't work as well the first time (the ships
leaving from the rebel base to attack the Death Star).
In many cases, they left in things that were just pure craftsmanship. The
now-primitive computer animation used to render the Death Star attack
plans, for instance, were considered state-of-the-art then, and were more
or less designed by hand. They were a labor of love for those who created
them, and updating them would have been pointless; hence, they have been
left intact. Also untouched: a good deal of the modelwork, which was
groundbreaking then and still terrifically exciting now, probably because
we *care* about what's happening to these people. It's not just another
sound-and-light show.
This is the real reason this movie commands such joyful respect. In a way
which is still unique and unmatched, George Lucas put together a high-tech
fireside to tell us a hell of a story. And it is still a hell of a story.

Title
Review for Alien Nation (1988)
CAPSULE: Tired and thin attempt at genre-mixing: Aliens Are Among Us meets
Crime Story. Cliches abound.
ALIEN NATION starts with one great idea and then drowns it in an ocean of
stupidity. It starts off with a none-too-thinly disguised allegory about --
literally -- legal and illegal aliens. A spaceship comes to Earth, holding
100,000 roughly humanoid aliens who have been created by some other species
for hard labor. They're intelligent and gifted, and they slowly get absorbed
into Amercan society (I'm assuming American society, but the movie focuses
on SoCal). All of this has great promise, and the first five minutes of the
movie hum with untapped possibilites. Then the plot got under way, and my
hopes died.
Why does this happen, almost without fail? I've seen countless movies that
have the germ of a good idea but not a whit of how to deploy it properly,
and I'm sad to include ALIEN NATION on that list. It's not a cheap movie; it
was financed by Gale Anne Hurd, who put her money into ALIENS and a number
of other movies of similar ilk. Just that somewhere along the line there was
a terrible failure of imagination, and the whole thing turned into a TV cop
show.
The plot features a cop -- James Caan -- and his new alien partner (Mandy
Patinkin). Caan lost his last partner to an alien grocery-store robber, so
of course he's hesitant. Eventually, he chokes back his revulsion and
decides to use the other man to get revenge, sort of. This involves getting
close to another alien, played by Terence Stamp, who simply mixes and
matches all the typical Movie Drug Lord cliches. Once we were into the usual
chases and shoot-outs, I lost all interest. There were attempts to get it
back -- like having the aliens get stoned on sour milk, or giving them goofy
names no thanks to Immigration -- but none of it elicited more than a
snicker.
All the problems can be traced to the script. There's nothing wrong with the
movie technically -- it looks convincing enough, especially in the opening
moments. But no one took a good, hard look at it and said, this isn't
enough. We've all seen enough cop shows and drug-lord revenge thrillers.
Gussying yet another one up in the guise of SF doesn't help anyone.
FOOTNOTE: The strangest thing about ALIEN NATION is the TV series that was
spun off from it, where they actually sat down and took the time to explore
the ramifications of what they'd set up. The show's well-done and worth
watching. The movie doesn't have a clue. This may be the first time the
spinoff has more going for it than the source material.
syegul@cablehouse.dyn.ml.org                 EFNet IRC: GinRei / ICQ: 934998
http://cablehouse.dyn.ml.org/serdar                another worldly device...
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth

Title
Review for Boxing Helena (1993)
BOXING HELENA is a real act of nerve.  It takes the two very worst kinds of
movies -- the Pretentious Art Bore and the Ludicrous Cheat -- and
synthesizes them.  Which is not what the filmmakers were thinking, of
course, but there you are.
The movie is the product of Jennifer Lynch, who has the distinction of being
director David Lynch's daughter.  On the basis of the evidence, talent
skipped a generation in the Lynch dynasty.  The movie is painfully like a
bad Lynch movie -- or better to say, like a bad imitation that didn't have
the initative to at least be a parody.  It also speaks well for Kim
Basinger, who sued to be let out of the production, and has since gone on to
redeem herself in the majestic L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, among other things.
Julian Sands stars as Dr. Nick Cavanaugh.  We know he's a cold-hearted snot
because he walks away from his dad's coffin before it's lowered all the way
into the ground.  He is a surgeon who specializes in putting arms and legs
back on, and based on what little we know about the movie, we can also guess
(correctly) that he has a thing for yanking 'em off as well.  Sands plays
Cavanaugh as the kind of oaf who has women "accidentally" set fire to his
clothing at parties.
Nick grows obsessed with a woman named Helena (Sherilyn Fenn), an
insufferably irritating person.  In an attempt to make her sexy and
mysterious, the filmmakers stoop to ripping off LA DOLCE VITA and have her
bathe in the fountain at a party.  Yes.  When she gets hit by a truck and
loses her legs -- in what has to be the single most unconvincing auto
accident ever put on film, short of Ned Beatty's in the horrible SHADOWS IN
THE STORM -- Nick kidnaps her and keeps her as a kind of human statue. Just
to make sure the point is hammered brutally home, we constantly get insert
shots of the armless Venus DeMilo sculpture.  And shots of a bird in a cage.
Yes.
Is there a good story lurking anywhere in this?  Maybe.  Part of the problem
lies in the fact that obsession alone does not make a character interesting.
Neither Nick nor Helena are the kind of people that would be worth five
minutes at a lunch counter, and so no matter what weird paces they get put
through, no one's going to care.  Movies about obsessions that the viewers
do not share are hard to make, unless you make it satirical (as did CRASH)
or at least try to convey something of what the obsession means personally
(as did LOLITA).
And then there's the idiotic cheat of an ending, which borrows from Emilio
Estevez's execreable WISDOM. Which, if you don't know what that refers to,
you're encouraged to find out.

Title
Review for Cannonball Run, The (1981)
It's hard to think of a worse movie than "The Cannonball Run".        No, really.
I've tried.  I spent a solid hour with friends (and a good deal of beer)
trying to find a worse movie, but it's slim pickings.  This is the sort of
film that's so terminally wretched that it's not even worth making fun of.
"The Cannonball Run" is actually a remake, in a sense, of the much-funnier
and more spirited "Gumball Rally."  That movie was a goofy piece of all-star
nonsense about an illegal coast-to-coast auto marathon.  "Cannonball Run"
takes the same basic idea, beats it to death, and props up the corpse in the
driver's seat of a racecar.
The one most responsible for this mess appears to be Hal Needham, who made his
when the two "Smokey and the Bandit" movies popped out of nowhere and
capitalized on the whole trucker/CB/bandit/good-ol'-boy mythology.  The
original "Bandit" movie was sly and funny, but in this movie Needham (who was
originally a stunt coordinator) has given up on anything remotely resembling a
story and just gives us a bunch of assembly-line cameos.  Dom DeLuise and Burt
Reynolds are not so much stars, you see, as cameos who get more screen time.
DeLuise and Reyonds are not the only ones who get to embarrass themselves
criminally.  For instance, Roger Moore plays a guy who thinks he's James Bond
--  or maybe he just plays James Bond, period; a movie this shallow doesn't
have enough brains to entertain anything nearly as witty as the first option.
Jackie Chan (in one of his first American roles) doesn't get to do anything
other than make goofy faces.  And as for Sammy Davis Jr., Jamie Farr and
Farrah Fawcett -- they're all a blur, without even the depth of a character
in a "Saturday Night Live" sketch.  Por ejemplo: Farr's character, "The
Sheik", has the germ of a funny idea in there somewhere, but the movie
doesn't have him do much of anything other than throw money out his car
window and shout "This is for you and the dust!"
Still... in a weird way, I sort of miss movies this utterly empty-headed.
Today comedies try so hard to load up on "satirical" barbs or cross-referenced
in-jokes that they often cease to be funny.  Movies like "The Cannonball Run"
expired around the same time as knock-knock jokes and fake plastic vomit --
although I leave to you whether that's a mercy or not.
Final consumer note: Outtakes at end of film are funnier than anything that
precedes them.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
CAPSULE: See it. Screamingly, painfully funny, perfectly observed and acted
gem about the cruelties of being at the bottom of the social heap in
school. Todd Solondz's extremely promising first movie doesn't just cut
deep; it bites.
Everyone needs someone to hate. We all remember the hated ones in junior
high school: the kids with too-big glasses, the nerds, the fat kids, the
stammerers, the terminally shy, the scrawny. Dawn Wiener (played perfectly
by Heather Matarazzo) is like an acrostic of all of the above. She's a
smart but hopelessly unopoular girl in seventh grade, with all the odds
stacked against her. The other kids slam her with epithets like
"wiener-dog" and "lesbo". Her locker is the only one with graffiti on it.
The teachers always punish her instead of her tormentors.
WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE is about Dawn's torment, but it's not so much
depressing an enragingly funny. It finds the blackest imaginable humor in
its story and nurses it thoroughly. Remember being lectured by the
principal while over his shoulder, through the office window, your enemies
are giving you the finger? Or trying to return a spitball to the class
bully and hitting a teacher in the face instead? Or delivering a speech in
front of the whole school, only to be drowned out by everyone's teasing?
Things are no better for Dawn at home. Her younger sister is a ballerina, a
darling of the family. Her smarter older brother just gets what he can out
of the family (his unilateral piece of advice is to do what'll look good on
your college resume). Her parents are hypocritical in the way they treat
their children. Dawn's short-shrifted constantly, with both sweet and harsh
words. At dinner we get lines like, "Dawn, you don't leave this table until
you tell your sister that you love her!" Dawn refuses. Cut to Dawn, still
at the dinner table hours later.
Dawn has a younger friend she later abandons, a frail little kid who the
other boys call a "fag". Like all other kids that age, Dawn is impossibly
curious about sex, and manages to ask all the (hilariously) wrong
questions. She forms a crush on the lead singer of a band that her brother
assembles (another cynical move on his part to get something for his
college resume), but he's years older and has ambitions about being Jim
Morrison. He might as well be from Saturn. Even worse, she becomes an
object of torment/affection for the predatory Brandon (Brendan Sexton,
Jr.).
One of the best scenes in the movie has Brandon calling up Dawn and
threatening to rape her. Dawn at first resists, but then decides to try
going along with it. She's that desperate for human contact. What happens
next is difficult to describe, but I was holding my breath during the whole
thing, because I have never seen a movie pull off a scene so hazardous and
dead-on real.
DOLLHOUSE could have fallen apart in half a hundred ways, but both Solontz
and the actors involved are exactly right in the notes they hit. Heather as
Dawn is the best of the bunch, because she has the tough job of trying to
make Dawn likeable even when she's sullen and fed up with being victimized,
and taking revenge on random passers-by in unpleasant little ways. It all
works.
I laughed a lot during DOLLHOUSE, both because it was funny and because it
was incredibly painful. We laugh, that we may not cry. After the credits, I
realized I had summoned back up the names and faces of a whole roll-call's
worth of tormentors during the film -- kids whose sole reason for life
seemed to be found in tormenting me. WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE brought all
that anger flooding back to the surface, when survival meant getting the
hell out of the school and getting home before your enemies showed up.
I had one regular junior high school tormentor, whose name I don't even
recall now. But I do remember arranging things so that I could just grab my
knapsack and run out of the front of the building as fast as possible, to
avoid getting the stuffing beat out of my by him. The man he became is, I
hope, a totally different person, but do I ever remember the bully.

Title
Review for Street Fighter (1994)
CAPSULE: If MORTAL KOMBAT is at the high end of the video-games-to-movies
spectrum....
Well, at least they tried. Alas, STREET FIGHTER is still a lousy movie,
period. They were trying to make at least an enjoyably lousy movie, but they
haven't even managed to do that. Video games often make bad movies, but at
their best they can make enjoyably pulpy ones like MORTAL KOMBAT. At their
worst, you get SUPER MARIO BROTHERS. Or this.
Capcom's video game, which revitalized a sagging coin-op video game market
and created a trend for many other games to follow, had a few firsts: it
featured a diverse and intriguing cast of characters to choose from, and it
also featured a number of strong and visually arresting female characters
(Chun Li and Cammy), who did more than hang around and wait to get saved. I
agree: It all sounds like the recipe for an engaging movie. This isn't it.
It has the heart of a made-for-TV film and the mind of one of those
thimble-deep comic-book tie-ins that got packaged with video game cartridges
when I was younger.
The movie takes the basic character templates from the game and casts them
in a thin plot that takes heavy cues from the Gulf War. General Bison (Raul
Julia, excellent) is your usual power-mad dictator who's kidnapped a bunch
of Allied Nations soldiers and is holding them hostage for a cool twenty
billion. Leading the AN attack to recover them is Colonel Guile (Jean-Claude
Van Damme), who also has a personal score to settle with the self-styled
General.
There are other folks who are equally set on revenge: journalist Chun-li
Zhang (Ming-Na Wen, the next-best thing in the movie) and her crew (E. Honda
[Peter Navy Tuiasosopo] and Balrog [Grand L. Bush]). What up, guys? I
thought Chun-li was with INTERPOL -- but never mind. The movie plays fast
and loose with the Street Fighter "mythology", which is OK, I guess, as long
as the results are at least passably entertaining. And they are.
Occasionally, there are some great moments -- watch what happens when
Chun-li first does her thing -- but they don't add up to a great movie.
The actors do what they can with the material, which is sometimes witty and
sometimes labored. Jean-Claude Van Damme isn't bad (how good can he be?),
just tacky, and Raul Julia is a lot of fun -- but costumes and makeup cannot
hide his obvious gauntness. This was his last theatrical movie --
depressing, especially since the movie was dedicated to him. I liked Wen's
Chun-li -- she looks and moves like the real article, and provides a hint of
where this movie really could have gone.
What went wrong here? There's a lot to look at. The set and costume
designers went out of their way to make the movie look interesting. The
fights -- some of them clearly modeled on the game's own action, of course
-- are acceptably put together. But there's nothing to push the movie over
the top and make it really special, instead of just something you knew they
were gonna try eventually. It has all the hallmarks of a road already
traveled, instead of something where they took risks with the goofy material
and made it into something wild and unique. It's too routine, too
predictable, too careful, and too safe.
POSTSCRIPT: There is a 1993 Hong Kong movie version of Street Fighter that's
worth tracking down. It stars Jacky Cheung as Guile, Chingmy Yau as Chun-li
and Simon Yam and Andy Lau. It's nowhere nearly as well-produced, but it is
ten thousand times more anarchic and entertaining than this one could ever
be.
POSTSCRIPT II: An animated feature-length version of the game also exists,
as well as a TV series. The series is nicely done; the feature-length anime
is not.

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
Look no further than A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY for evidence of the decline of
two institutions: "Saturdy Night Live", which hasn't managed to be funny in
over a decade and a half, and American comedies in general.  ROXBURY is so
wan, so thin and juiceless, that it barely classifies as a movie.  It also
commits the cardinal comic sin: it's not funny.
ROXBURY gives us the Butabi brothers, Steve and Doug (Will Ferrell and
Chris Kattan), who are in themselves clones of an earlier SNL routine, the
"Wild and Crazy Guys".  The post-high-school Butabis are still stuck in
their parents' house, work for dad's flower shop, and head out when the sun
goes down in futile attempts to get into upscale nightclubs and score with
the ladies.  After countless rejections (in a movie like this, anything
that happens so much as twice feels "countless"), they get lucky and wind
up weaselling their way into the ultrahip Roxbury as part of the entourage
of a TV star (Richard Grieco).  All along the way we get a barrage of
hit-and-miss gags -- the best of which have already been played to death in
the trailer.
It's a little distressing how the movie manages to play host to many
different pieces of action without making any of them funny, or even
interesting.  F'rinstance, Father Butabi (Dan Hedaya, they guy who looks
like Harry Dean Stanton's weaselly brother) and Mom (Loni Anderson, of all
people), are barely milked for a single joke.  Their function is to stand
there and look bewildered.  A neighboring businessman's daughter, Emily
(Molly Shannon), gets a mad crush on Steve -- as part of a larger plan to
manipulate them into mergingin their businesses as well as their bodies --
but they dimness of the boys is so absolute that we hardly care they're
being suckered.  What fun is that?
Lacking a story, or even a real moment of comic invention, the ROXBURY
creators threw everything else they could think of at the screen, and hoped
some of it would stick.  Fights, weddings, Wayne-and-Garth antics, and on
and on.  For some reason I was reminded of the equally lamentable TOMMY BOY,
which featured SNL alumns Chris Farley and David Spade, landlocked in a
script that was equally barren of entertainment, and equally overstuffed
with things to attract, but not keep, our attention,

Title
Review for Happy Gilmore (1996)
HAPPY GILMORE is one of those movies that you assume was intended as a
comedy, but you don't laugh.  It's one of the most disquieting films I've
seen -- not because of what it showed, really, but because it assumed that
everything it showed would automatically be found funny by its audience.
Take, for instance, the title character, as played by Adam Sandler.  Sandler
is one of the most charmless people to ever step in front of a camera.  Like
so many other "comic" actors today, he assumes that if people laugh when
someone raises their voice to a roar, people will REALLY fall apart laughing
if he raises it to a pavement-splintering bellow.  More is not better.
Happy Gilmore is a kid with a hockey fetish and what some counselors would
probably call "an anger control issue".  He can't play hockey to save his
life, and this enrages him.  Constantly.  Then he discovers, quite by
accident, that his bad hockey playing translates into great golf playing,
and soon he's taking part in a tournament that promises to help pay for his
grandmother's back taxes.
How interesting is any of this?  Not very.  It's only made worse by the fact
that the one gag in the movie is Happy's temper tantrums.  If this were a
serious movie, it would be something along the lines of COBB: about a
dangerous sociopath who is only redeemed by the fact that he can channel his
aggression into a socially acceptable form.  Here, it's a lame clothesline
to hang a bunch of extremely uncomfortable scenes masquerading as comedy.
Here's the thing: Take these psycho-behavior scenes out of this movie, like
the one where Happy smashes a beer bottle and goes after his golf rival, and
you'd have the pieces for a completely different story -- maybe one of those
Paul Schrader films, like TAXI DRIVER or ROLLING THUNDER, about tormented
loners who take out their anger on the world around them.  But instead the
same ingredients are used to make a comedy, and the result is ugly and
unsavory.
Why is any of this supposed to be funny?  After the credits rolled, that was
the only thing that stayed with me.  That and Adam Sandler's shrill and
unlikeable screen persona, who on the basis of this film I won't be
interested in seeing ever again.

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
CAPSULE: The first American production by John Woo to equal or rival
his Hong Kong work.
Most people I know sit in the movies and tick off whole lists of blown
opportunities. They sit there and go, "You know, if only he had gone
back and told that guy off, then the movie would have been *really*
interesting." Most movies are anthologies of ideas that
near-miss. Happily, FACE/OFF is not one of those movies.
Calling FACE/OFF an "action thriller" is like calling a Maserati a
"commuter vehicle". You have the function -- maybe -- but not the
form. FACE/OFF wraps a muscular action plot in a story of remarkable
emotional resonance, one in which *no* mental stone gets unturned.
Consider the premise. An antiterrorist expert named Sean Archer (John
Travolta) is obsessed with capturing his number one quarry, a mad-dog
manic named Castor Troy (Nicholas Cage). Violence ensues, in which
Castor is thrown into a coma. All too late, he learns that Castor has
planted a bio-chemical bomb somewhere in L.A., and that only Castor's
equally unhinged brother Pollux knows where it is. After a good deal
of failure, Sean finally buckles and allows a bizarre plan to be
enacted: his face and Castor's are surgically swapped, and he is sent
to sweet-talk Pollux into revealing the location of the bomb.
Yes, this is neat. Preposterous as all hell, but neat. What's even
neater is the twists that develop later on, when Archer is betrayed
and forced to live with Castor's face and body. In the process, both
he (and his enemy, about whom the less said the better) make many
unnerving discoveries about each other's lives, and their own. How do
you behave when the young son of the man you have wanted dead for so
long tries to embrace you?
This whole level of emotional context shoots under the skin of
FACE/OFF and raises it above being just a technically clever effects
show. It's about personalities and attitudes as much as it's about
plots, guns, and Mexican stand-offs, of which John Woo is perpetually
fond. Although in his movies, they're always used as means to an end
-- they further a deeper story. FACE/OFF is right in that grand
tradition.
The acting is fascinating and creepy. Both Travolta and Cage swap
voices, faces, and even work to exchange mannerisms. Look carefully at
the cafeteria brawl scene, where Cage (playing Travolta's character)
screams out "I'm Castor Troy!" and uses violence as a way of trying to
check his real anger and self-loating. Or the creepy scene where
Travolta (playing Cage's character) tells his daughter how to deal
with a guy who won't say no. Most movies don't have the fiendishness
to try this kind of stuff out. FACE/OFF wears it like a good suit of
clothes.

Title
Review for Replacement Killers, The (1998)
CAPSULE: Perversely entertaining Hong Kong action with the God of Gamblers
himself, Chow Yun-Fat. Mira Sorvino ain't bad either, but the main
attraction is the movie's glossy look.
Chow Yun-Fat commands the screen the way very few actors do, no matter where
they're from. See him in the dozens of other movies he's done for the Hong
Kong studios (and hang yourself if you haven't seen him in John Woo's
masterpieces THE KILLER and HARD-BOILED). He is one of the few cult-movie
figures who lives up to and beyond the hype. In THE REPLACEMENT KILLERS, he
strides onscreen as if just coming in from another HK production without
losing a beat.
HK fan that I am, I held my breath in anticipation of this movie for quite
some time. THE REPLACEMENT KILLERS was designed to be Chow's big U.S. debut
vehicle, but it also serves as the debut for director Antoine Fuqua (whose
only previous directorial job was the "Gangster's Paradise" video for
Coolio). Both director and actor have veteran confidence in this movie,
which helps to buoy it all up out of the routine and into the realm of the
special.
The plot is not the main attraction. Chow plays a hitman who crumbles when
faced with the prospect of having to ice a policeman, and decides to flee
the country. To that end, he enlists Mira Sorvino's character -- a tattooed
forgery artist who lives in an apartment that looks like a close cousin to
the one J.F. Sebastian inhabited in BLADE RUNNER. Then bad guys with tons of
firepower come gunning for both of them, and they have to hit the road.
Fuqua knows his HK action staples. The movie is saturated with highly
choreographed violence. The whole movie glows and glitters: shattering
glass, guns blazing, false-color shots from *inside* a gun as a round is
chambered. Sparks shoot as high-tension lines give when bodies fall on them.
Metal crumples as cars slam into each other, reflecting the moody
green-and-yellow lighting in an underground parking garage. Sunglasses
glint. Put simply, if you don't like movies where these things all figure in
abundance, stay home. If you do, buy three copies. You'll wear them all out
soon enough.
Chow and Sorvino's characters do not like each other very much -- it's hard
to like someone who seems to be responsible for getting your place
torched -- but they form a mutual respect which is credible on-screen, and
work together to get themselves out of trouble. There's also a good
supporting role by Michael Rooker (remember him from HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A
SERIAL KILLER?) as a cop who tries to put everything together from the
outside, and  yet another wonderfully stolid bad-guy role courtesy of Jurgen
Prochnow.
THE REPLACEMENT KILLERS is all surface, but it's a wonderful surface to look
at. Good show all around. Now let's see Chow -- and Fuqua -- in something a
little more substantial. I *know* Chow can handle it.

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
CAPSULE: "Quirky" sums up this neat little movie about a gallery of
disparate characters whose lives collide over the course of 48 hours in Los
Angeles. The proper meaning of "Tarantino-esque".
If you tried to map out the coincidences that took place in your real life,
you'd have material which would strain the plausibility of most
mystery-readers. 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY contains one insane coincidence after
another, but that's okay, for two reasons. One, it contains a wealth of
intriguing and intelligently-written characters, and two, it's *about*
coincidences as much as it *contains* coincidences. It's "Tarantino-esque"
in the right sense of the word: it extends on the kinds of things Quentin
Tarantino introduced into a movie without becoming redundant or insulting.
Without spoiling anything, let me try to list as many of the people as
possible in this movie, as well as how they start off. We have an estranged
husband and wife, who have two hitmen walk in on them. We have an art dealer
and his secretary, who are later taken hostage at gunpoint by one of the
hitmen -- who really, REALLY hates dogs. We have the other hitman's icy
Nordic girlfriend, who has a way of being able to tell you you're screwed
simply by smiling at you. We have two vice cops who stumble into a murder
scene and get a lot more than they bargained for. We have a washed-up,
suicidal television director and the nurse he meets in a cemetary when he
tries to give her his... yes, his dog. And even *there* I think I've missed
a few.
The movie works by subtly defeating our expectations about what movies
normally do. In one scene, we switch from one conversation to another in
mid-sentence -- without even the rhythm of the shots changing. Slowly the
threads of the movie converge -- in a way that only makes sense at the end,
and even then it's completely off the wall -- but by that time the movie has
declared its territory: it's about characters, not plots.
This movie grows on you. I thought it would be too self-consciously arty for
my taste. It comes on more like a good friend whom you suddenly discover has
a thing for sleight-of-hand and card tricks, and surprises you in more ways
than you might think.

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
CAPSULE: Jackie Chan teams up with his old buddy Sammo Hung to give us
another zero-calorie fight-fest. Gloriously foolish fun.
My wife had this to say about MR. NICE GUY: "As entertainment, it's great.
As a movie, it sucks." I was forced to agree: the plot was an afterthought,
the acting was hopeless, the script a throwaway. But it showcased Jackie
Chan's raucous physical comedy -- "martial arts" is the wrong word for it --
and was therefore more than worth it. It isn't the all-out roar of joy that
RUMBLE IN THE BRONX and especially SUPERCOP were, but it's still great fun.
Most movies that feature martial-arts action are about the giving and
receiving of violent pain. Jackie has a slightly goofier agenda, and is all
the better for it -- even if he's in a paper-thin story.
The plot (what a word!): Jackie is a TV chef living in Australia who
specializes in on-screen acrobatics with his food. One day he collides with
a journalist who's just filmed a drug deal that ended in violence, and
there's a mix-up of tapes. This of course puts him right in the path of an
endless stream of punks, henchmen, cigar-smoking baddies, and cops. That's
about it-- but ther are a host of tiny little departures, like his
girlfriend (Miki Lee) and his female assistant, who have a howlingly funny
scene that, due to language barriers, cannot be repeated here. Some things
you gotta see to believe.
Jackie's stuntwork needs a new vocabulary to describe it: it's like play, or
maybe a kind of dance. One scene has Jackie getting into a fight in
traffic -- on top of a flood of Pepsi cans. Another scene involves an
unfinished building and a whole maze of doors opening into empty rooms and
corridors. Hung (who directed) plays it like an homage to the Road Runner
and Wile E. Coyote cartoons. (Hung also films things a little more loosely
and fluidly than Staney Tong did: we get a lot of Steadicam work, lots of
things going on in different sectors of the screen.) Another, even more
mind-boggling scene, involves Jackie being forced to fight with henchmen
holding his limbs back with bungee cords. (Yes, he manages to get the upper
hand with that one as well. Don't ask how.)
The final scene gives us the Grand Guignol (sans blood) ending that a movie
like this deserves. Here's a hint: in the first five minutes, we see a giant
earth-moving vehicle used to bury someone. Seeing a thing like that in a
movie like this is (to quote Roger Ebert) like Camille coughing in the first
reel and not dying in the last: it *has* to make an encore. I was right.
Only this time, Jackie was driving.

Title
Review for Amant, L' (1991)
CAPSULE: A test case for why there will be no follow-up to LAST TANGO IN
PARIS.
THE LOVER is a deeply confused movie that does not know what it wants to
do, and what it does do, it doesn't understand. We don't see what's
critical to the story, and everything we do see feels like it's from
another, more interesting movie. It's a superficially pretty film that, if
made by an American director, might have just been rendered as soft-core
porn and left at that, gaining the benefit of unpretentiousness.
Marguerite Duras wrote the allegedly autobiographical novel from which the
movie is drawn, but it might as well have been Xaviera Hollander, from the
total lack of depth of character that the movie displays. The story is
simple, the stuff of anonymous highbrow porn: Two strangers who make a pact
not to know too much about each other, separated by barriers of culture and
class, have piles of sex.
The woman of the two is played by Jane March, a young French girl living in
Indochina. The man is Tony Leung, a rich Chinese fellow who is almost twice
as old as she is. Their meeting is rendered in the same kind of non-verbal
way as in (better) movies like DAMAGE: they see each other, and somehow,
they are thunderstruck. They rent a room in the Chinese quarter and, like I
said before, have piles of sex.
What's infuriating about the movie is that it does not confront any of this
on its own terms. LAST TANGO IN PARIS and DAMAGE had the nerve to do that;
so did Fassbinder's searing ALI: FEAR EATS THE SOUL. THE LOVER winds up
splitting into two schizophrenic halves. In one, the young girl hates
school, has to deal with her priggish parents, has a semi-sexual
relationship with another (female) classmate, etc. In the other, the two
lovers have piles of sex. If I sound like I'm being repetitious, then
perhaps you're getting the point. The movie quickly settles into a pattern:
sex, strained dialogue, the girl's hateful life, more sex. Soon we're
checking to see if our watches have stopped.
Worse, the first half of the movie is far more fierce and interesting than
the second half. I wanted to know more about her classmate, with whom she
has several spellbinding scenes. I wanted to see more about how she dealt
with her mother and father. And -- but I hate to say this because it's
asking too much from a movie like this -- I wanted to know about what these
two lovers were really thinking, feeling, trying to find out about each
other when they rented that little room. The movie has no ideas about
erotic attraction between people, just prettiness: it's a vapid
intellectual's version of a PENTHOUSE centerspread.
The movie's conclusion is enraging, because it does not have one. It simply
terminates the main story, and then tacks on a prefab conclusion that ALSO
terminates prematurely. This is a movie about deep human enigmas that's
made by total babes in the woods.

Title
Review for Topo, El (1971)
CAPSULE: Very strange, very pretentious, but absorbing and compelling
nonetheless. The movie that put Alejandro Jodorowsky on the cult-movie map,
now available once again as a Japanese laserdisc import.
Hordes of cripples come flooding down the mountainside in search of
vengeance. A wise man of the desert is buried under a deluge of white
rabbits. A vicious generalissimo is castrated and commits suicide out of
shame. A mad priest exhorts his followers to play Russian roulette as a sign
of their devotion.
Describing EL TOPO, one of the weirdest and most deliberately pretentious
movies ever made, is a fool's errand. Summarizing the plot doesn't help; in
the end you're inclined to flap your arms and say, "Just see the movie." EL
TOPO was, and is, as much an experience as it was a movie, especially when
it first came out in 1971 and created a storm of cultishness and
controversy. Now once again available legitimately as a Japanese laserdisc,
albeit at the viciously high price of $90-$110, it should be at least seen
once by anyone with a taste for the bizarre.
In the abstract, EL TOPO plays something like a Western as written and
directed by Jim Morrison; in fact, director Alejandro Jodorowsky has cited
Morrison as being a favorite of his. The main character is a nameless
gunslinger, who comes out of the desert to fight evil and prove himself
worthy of the love of a woman he rescues from the hands of cruel and
perverse bandits. He faces several outlandish obstacles and tests, but in
the end, his hands close on thin air, and everything he has worked for
evaporates. He is reborn as a kind of holy fool, and then works to help a
family of cripples and dwarves escape the confines of their cavelike prison
and rejoin the outside world. 
I mentioned EL TOPO was pretentious. This isn't neccesarily a bad thing. EL
TOPO is, if nothing, ambitious as hell in its attempts to be pretentious. In
a way, it's a welcome relief from movies where there's clearly nothing on
the director's mind. So much is on the minds of the people who made EL TOPO,
that it's amazing anything like a story has come out of it. EL TOPO is
loaded with so many striking and powerful images that the story almost
becomes irrelevant. Some of the editing and photography is truly remarkable;
I can see how music-video directors could have taken many cues from this
movie. There is never a moment when there's not something interesting
happening on-screen, even if we don't understand it completely.
EL TOPO is a hard movie to recommend, because it cheerfully defies just
about every convention of moviemaking. It doesn't tell a logical story, but
it does tell an emotionally interesting one. It doesn't subscribe to typical
conventions of plotting or character. It's "different" in the broadest sense
of the term, and anyone who is determined to see something different --
something so far outside the realm of movies as we know them that they have
to start from scratch -- will be curious. But everyone's reactions are
certain to be wildly different. If nothing else, EL TOPO is a great way to
start a long conversation -- or end one.

Title
Review for Less Than Zero (1987)
CAPSULE: Bret Easton Ellis's flash-in-the-pan novel becomes a weak and
sentimental movie. Casting of Robert Downey, Jr. is an asset, though.
I read LESS THAN ZERO when it was first published, and several other times
since. Each time I've come back to it, it seems to contain that much less.
It wasn't that profound a book to begin with, and what little insight it did
have (Los Angeles is a terrible place for anyone to try to be a moral
person, for one) has not survived the transition to the big screen. LESS
THAN ZERO, the motion picture, is even less absorbing than the book that
spawned it. It's just not a good movie, despite the presence of three good
actors (Andrew McCarthy, Jami Gertz, and Robert Downey, Jr.) who are given
potentially interesting roles to play.
McCarthyis a young L.A. denizen, Clay, who goes off to an Ivy League
university. His girlfriend and best friend (Gertz, as "Blair", and Downey)
enter into a kind of relationship of the damned, and then a panic-stricken
Blair calls Clay at Christmastime. Maybe he can help straighten his friend
out. Maybe not.
Downey has drifted into the coke-and-decadence orbit that many people fall
into for no particular reason. In Downey's case, it's boredom, more than
anything else. He's got pretty much everything he could ask for -- he's more
or less been given a recording studio by his father -- but none of it is
enough. He has never learned how to really enjoy any of it, and so of course
he's thousands of dollars in debt to a drug dealer (James Spader, also
good). All of this is played out against a glossy, 90210-ish backdrop of
pool parties, rock clubs, coke binges, and so on.
It's funny how many individually good things there are in the movie -- and
sad how they never quite add up, probably because the movie's agenda is too
cut and dried. Instead of getting a story about lives in decay, we get a
simpleminded parable about the dangers of cocaine; it's on the level of an
ABC AFTERSCHOOL SPECIAL. The worst thing about LESS THAN ZERO is how, like a
bad gangsta rap video, it winds up glorifying what it's supposed to be
attacking -- partly because it doesn't know how to be angry enough about its
subject, I think. It winds up being more like a resigned sigh.
And yet in the middle of this movie there are some very good performances.
Jami Gertz takes what could have been a one-note role and populates it with
small tics and mannerisms that make it real and substantive. Spader, as the
drug dealer, sounds like a human being, not a stupid Hollywood conception of
what a drug dealer is supposed to sound like. And Downey, despite the fact
that the script he's given marches him clean off a cliff, works nicely as
the damned soul. What was missing was a stronger backbone to the movie, a
more definite sense of purpose other than the easy target of drug addiction,
to make it really worth the experience.

Title
Review for Sukeban Deka (1995) (V)
CAPSULE: Violent and bizarrely entertaining anime, part 21 JUMP STREET
and part Russ Meyer, that somehow works despite its limitations.
        SUKEBAN: n., Jap., "bad girl".
        DEKA: n., Jap., slang for policeman, "cop"; possible
corruption/contraction of English "detective".
I tried to imagine SUKEBAN DEKA as live-action, and somehow I wound up
with the blueprint for a Russ Meyer movie, Meyer, king of American
Sixties exploitation cinema, would probably have loved to direct a
picture about a teenage ex-con who beats up juvenile delinquents and
assorted upper-tax-bracket scumbags with a yo-yo. I am not leaving out
very much here. And yet I watched SUKEBAN DEKA with a crooked smile;
it's a perversely entertaining movie that, if it HAD been live-action,
might not even have worked.
The plot: Saki Asamiya is a juvenile convict who is given a shot at
freedom by the police. Theyt want to infiltrate a private high school
overrun with crime, and she makes a good mole: fast with her fists and
good-looking. Saki eventually takes the assignment, but only under
duress, and every scene she's in has her under pressure from one
direction or another. Aside from the yo-yo (they can't give her a gun),
she has a sidekick of sorts -- a dippy fellow named Sanpei who latches
onto her like a barnacle, and has his head shaved to prove his devotion
to her. (This leads us to one of the best lines in the picture: "If you
don't stop hanging off me like crap out of a carp's butt, I'll beat you
senseless!" Sanpei, however, takes this as an invitation to S&M, and is
even more turned on.)
Movies like this either work or they don't, and most of the reason they
work is style. SUKEBAN DEKA has its over-the-top-ness right about 80% of
the time. One of the evil girls in the story wears cammo fatigues
underneath her negligee; another dresses like a walking bondage
outfitter's ad and hides snakes in her cleavage. (The fetish for snakes
bleeds over into the intercollary images that flash up between scenes:
when someone gets double-crossed, we see flash shots of one snake
sinking its fangs into the other.) One fight is punctuated with a
passing train, which conveniently hides all the screams.
But there are parts of the story where the plot is just stretched too
thin, and could have used some extra writing -- maybe even some
over-writing. There's a whole brainwashing subplot that surfaces about
two-thirds of the way through, which feels suspiciously plastered on, as
if the scriptwriters were desperate for something to spin things in a
new direction. Also, Saki's enemies -- three sisters who control the
school's illegal activities -- are also patchy: the most villanous of
the bunch is not really the most memorable, and vice versa. A little
more work in this department, and they would really have had something
here. As it stands, it's not bad at all, just limited and inconsistent.
FOOTNOTE: Part of the reason for the patchiness of the story may be its
source material. SUKEBAN DEKA was adapted from a manga which ran for
eight years and twelve volumes, and the movie borrows its story from the
first and part of the second volumes. Shinji Wada, the original writer
and artist, had a hand in the production and the script, but there's
still been a great deal of condensation and collapsing. I went back and
read the entire series myself -- the scope of the whole story is
staggering, to put it mildly -- and can see why they might have had
trouble packing even the first story into a two-hour movie.

Title
Review for Pagemaster, The (1994)
THE PAGEMASTER is the oddest film aimed at children I've ever seen.  It
makes a number of gigantic errors in judgment -- not the least of which is
that it has the unsubtle subtext of reading as being a chore to be risen to.
It's a depressing and blatantly manipulative movie at its heart, although it
obviously wants to be anything but.
The movie opens interestingly enough.  Macaulay Culkin is featured as a kid
who is paralyzed by fear of -- well, everything, from the look of it.  He's
memorized reams of accident statistics and keeps emergency provisions of all
kinds in his room (which gives rise to one of the movie's few genuine
laughs). One day he blunders into a mysterious library, and after some
mishaps, manages to get himself projected into various animated versions of
several classic books.
This is where the first of the errors in judgment come in: instead of trying
to woo the audience with the subtexts or emotional content of those books
("Moby Dick" and "Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde" among them), they get turned into
cheap arcade-game attacks on the senses.  The movie is not interested in
reading, or the stories, per se -- or even in the kid's plight, really.
It's just an excuse to throw us into one animated headrush after another --
and, presumably, to unload PAGEMASTER toys of one variety or another.
Even the animation doesn't hold up.  Shows like "South Park" and "Beavis and
Butthead" (and their attendant spinoffs) don't have Disney-level animation,
but they use smart writing and clever direction to more than make up for it.
They are no more than they need to be.  THE PAGEMASTER badly wants to be an
eyeful of the Disney variety, but looks dim and unclear, done in haste.
How do movies like this get made?  The whole thing probably sounded like
such a nice IDEA that nobody paid much attention to the way it was being
embodied.  Didn't anyone stop and wonder, what an unrepentant piece of
cynicism this is, trying to sell kids on books and reading through the same
strategies as mindless action movies and electronic games?  I have nothing
against video games -- just that books and video games are apples and
oranges, and this movie should have known better than to blatantly confuse
the two.
I also resented the way the kid's emotional problems are used for a cheap
payoff.  At the end of the movie, he's basically learned to suck in his gut
and take it all like a man.  Allegedly, the movie is propaganda in favor of
kids picking up books, but after something like THE PAGEMASTER, they're more
likely to feel insulted than inspired.  The best way to get kids interested
in books is to read to them, and let them pick up the habit naturally,
instead of subjecting them to cynical concoctions like this.

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
CAPSULE: A cultural landmark despite its many flaws, GUMP is at the very
least unique.
Many movies are about people who are unintentionally depicted as stupid,
and are therefore boring to watch. FORREST GUMP is about a man who is not
intelligent, but is never boring to watch, because the way he reacts to his
improbably dreamlike existence is the very substance of this unique but
troubled movie.
The very oddest thing about FORREST GUMP is how some parts of it work so
well and come so naturally, and how other parts of it are at such odds with
the rest of the film. I wondered how no one making the movie could sense
the inherent schizophrenia. And yet, as a whole, the movie works in ways
that defy description. It's vastly overrated, but it's still worth seeing.
Forrest is played with the grace of a tightrope walker by Tom Hanks. He
(Gump) is mildly retarded; he has an IQ of 75 at the movie's start and
stays pretty much on that level all the way through. His trove of facts
increases, but his basic methodology of handling the world never changes.
As a boy, with braces on his legs, he peers at life and expects little more
than to be heard and acknowledged, and the first person aside from his
doting mother to do that with him is his lifelong love, Jenny (played
glowingly by Robin Wright, of THE PRINCESS BRIDE).
Then one day the braces come off -- more or less by accident -- and Forrest
discovers he can run like hell. He couples that with advice from Jenny --
that the best thing to do when you're in trouble is just run -- and this
becomes the big asset that gets him through college on a football
scholarship. And the one thing that gets him through Vietnam, allowing him
to save most of his platoon and receive the Congressional Medal of Honor*.
Although he rescues his platoon leader (Gary Sinise), the man has nothing
but rancor and bitterness, since he lost his legs, while Gump only got shot
in the rear (in a development which starts funny and then gets tiresome).
Good luck rains down on Gump the way bad luck rains down on the rest of us.
He goes on to be the captain of a shrimp boat, a Ping-Pong champion
(clobbering the Chinese in the process), a millionaire, a cross-country
runner. The sly thing about the movie is the way he just sort of backs into
everything, doing what comes naturally, and is even happy when nothing
happens. All he wants out of life is the love of a woman, even though she's
a damaged and desperate person who frantically avoids real love out of the
fear that she will just bring a person that's better than her down.
Too much of any one thing in Hanks' performance would have sent the whole
thing crashing down. The balance is almost unbelieveable: it's no wonder he
won an Oscar for this role. He plays a man who is, quite simply, dumb --
but not uninteresting. He understands just enough about evil to know that
it's something to be avoided, and leaves the analysis to someone else. He
asks himself a question at the end of the movie -- do we have a destiny, or
are we just playthings of destiny? -- and based on everything he's seen,
he's convinced the answer is a little of both. 
The movie throws this into sharp relief with Sinise's character -- a man
who has been screwed badly, but eventually finds a kind of peace with
himself, when he realizes he wanted to die nobly but on false pretenses.
There are two big trends in the movie that work against it. One is the
nonstop running gag about Forrest's dumb luck, which is milked in some
scenes that are charming and other scenes that are not. Another is the way
he's consistently involved with high-profile historical figures in ways
that are totally peripheral and only used to make shallow historical
pointers. (The scene where he "accidentally" spills the beans on the
Watergate break-in, for instance.) After a while, I started questioning the
wisdom of this whole strategy: What was the real point, story-wise, of
having him intersect with such high-profile fate? To further throw his
attitude about life into sharp relief? It only makes us conscious of how
the screenwriter (Eric Roth) is employing the whole thing as a manipulative
gimmick.
This attitude extends into other areas of the movie. In another scene,
Forrest, still in his Army outfit, winds up at a peace rally, and when
asked to speak about the war, the PA malfunctions and all we see is his
mouth moving. The scene serves ultimately only to reconnect him with Jenny,
so it's another irritating throwaway. I, for one, would have loved to hear
what he had to say. The way the script sabotages its own development
through scenes like this is annoying; it makes the Gump character into a
gimmick, not a person.
There's also a tendency throughout the movie to paint people that have more
discrimination and analysis than Forrest in their blood as buffoons: a
scene in a Black Panther cell, for instance, or a scene where he's mobbed
by reporters and hangers-on when running cross-country. Gump isn't morally
superior to these people (how could he be?), just differently motivated,
and to try and make them look like fools is itself foolish. It's a
troubling sign that the filmmakers themselves didn't quite understand what
they were doing, that they hadn't quite taken the extra step in making the
film more than just the sum of its ingredients.
And yet, what an unmistakeably different movie this is, and at times, a
very moving one. The best moments are the simplest: The ice cream in the
bedpan. The ping-pong matches. Or when Forrest finds Jenny as a stripper,
or when he has his son introduced to him for the first time. I am reminded
strongly of BEING THERE, the mind-blowing film in which Peter Sellers
played a simpleminded man whose entire outlook on life has been formed by
television, and how his attitude is misperceived by everyone who comes into
contact with him. BEING THERE was far wickeder and knowing that GUMP, and
contained a final shot that even today people still have heated arguments
about. GUMP never quite has a moment like that, sadly.
* A friend of mine, who was in the service, commented that Sinise's
character would have been required to put in a recommendation in order for
Gump to win the medal. I decided that the movie wasn't ultimately
interested in the factual details of his life, but it did irk me.syegul@ix.netcom.com                                       EFNet IRC: GinRei
http://www.io.com/~syegul                          another worldly device...
Finger me on IRC for address for after-hours (EST) experimental HTTP server.

Title
Review for Hunted, The (1995)
CAPSULE: One of the ten worst movies ever made. Christopher Lambert vs.
evil ninjas in modern-day Japan... and nobody wins.
THE HUNTED is such a bad movie, so completely inept and so totally
brain-damaged that I could almost feel affection for it. I could see myself
showing this movie to friends and getting a good jolly guffaw out of it, if
it weren't also insanely xenophobic and insulting.
Christopher Lambert plays a computer-parts salesman who's on business in
Japan. He meets a slinky young woman (Joan Chen) and has a torrid night of
lovemaking with her -- and then manages to witness her death at the hands
of an evil ninja clan and their leader (John Lone). Apparently they had
some unfinished business that could only be concluded with her getting
slaughtered. Since Lambert is a witness, he's of course the next one to
die.
Let's stop and think about this for a second. If Lambert were in real life
being chased by fanatical devotees to a ninja secret society, he'd have a
lifespan you could only measure with an atomic clock. In this movie, the
ninja manage to kill just about everyone EXCEPT him. I imagine the Japanese
gods smiled down on Lambert and provided him with a Goof Field that
radiates out about ten feet from his body. You know what a Goof Field is:
that invisible zone in which anyone who has intent to do harm to you
becomes a klutz no matter what their real dexterity is.
This is, of course, only the beginning of the movie's problems. Lambert
eventually finds pseudo-safety with a long-haired modern-day samurai
(Yoshio Harada) and his partner -- Yoko Shimada, who you may remember as
Lady Toda Buntaro in SHOGUN. They are the two best things in the movie; in
every scene they have authority and presence, and they actually look like
they belong here, even when dressed in full samurai armor and wielding
bows. The script doesn't know what the hell to do with them.
Lone, as the bad guy, is zero-dimensional. The only bad-guy cliche he has
to wallow around in is the one about how the bad guy always has exotic
women dripping off of him. In THE HUNTED, this is elevated to the level of
an insulting stereotype. What's funny is that the peripheral characters in
THE HUNTED are not sterotypes -- there's a nice little scene with a Tokyo
cabdriver, and a girl in a pachinko parlor -- but many of the main
characters are unsalveageably hateful. Also, the phenomenal instrumental
troupe Kodo has assembled a superior soundtrack -- get the CD -- that
manages to survive despite the drek it's been designed to accompany.
There is an extended battle scene in the middle of the movie that is almost
reason enough to watch the whole thing -- a gory, excellently staged fight
on the bullet train that shows some real imagination for a moment, and then
smothers it by trying to clumsily re-couple the whole thing with the
movie's relentlessly stupid plot. By the time we get to the final showdown,
with Lambert getting to wield his own sword (which, judging from the
ham-handed editing of one scene, was forged in seven hours or so), we no
longer care. We're not even given any definitive information about whether
or not one of the key characters lives or dies!
Someone once said that the key to good art -- good movies, good books,
whatever -- is to start somewhere interesting, end up somewhere
interesting, and show respect for the audience all along the way. This
movie bungles two out of three, badly.

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
So far, I have personally seen more genuinely terrible and unwatchable movies
in 1998 than in any other year in recent memory. DIRTY WORK bellyflops
squarely onto the end of that astonishing string of stinkers. Not only was it
not screened for critics, but when trailers for the movie rolled two months
ago (ours was appended to GODZILLA), people walked out of the theater to wait
for it to end.
DIRTY WORK is offensive in the worst possible way: it's stupid AND
incompetent. The film's basic premise has potential: Norm MacDonald (late of
SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE) plays a schlub who, in an attempt to raise money for his
father's heart transplant, starts a revenge-for-hire service. There! With
that concept in mind, sit down and write as many things you can think of that
might appear in a comedy about this subject. I'll bet my 401K fund that not
only do none of them appear in this movie, but that everything you wrote down
is guaranteed to be funnier than anything that happens on screen. The film is
a wretched parade of cheap shots at fat people, gays ("Keep your distance,
Liberace," one of the characters says after a too-intimate embrace), and
anyone else who wasn't in the room when they scrawled the script on the back
of a gum wrapper.
It's absolutely amazing. I racked my brains trying to remember a single funny
moment in this movie. There isn't one. Usually a movie will have SOMETHING
that at least makes you snicker, even if it's not deliberate. This movie is a
desert, seconded only by SOUR GRAPES so far as the worst movie of the year.
Matters aren't helped by the static direction (Bob Saget, of AMERICA'S
FUNNIEST HOME VIDEOS) or MacDonald's dead delivery. He seems to think that
just because he could get laughs reading "Weekend Update" in a smiling
monotone, he can do the same with everything else he gets handed.
There is a little crew of amateur filmmakers who call themselves Random Foo
Productions. They've even got their own web site (www.randomfoo.com). I've
seen several of their homebrew movies already, and for a bunch of kids with
an operating budget that's probably less than what it costs to chauffeur a
big-name director to the airport, they are enormous fun.
Why do I mention them here? Draw your own conclusions.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
I must be on a roll. In one week I've seen two flabbergastingly, tragically
stupid SF movies: SPECIES, and now, STARGATE. Too bad GODZILLA hasn't come
out yet.
The plot is worthy of at least a pat on the back. A geeky Egyptologist
(James Spader) is tapped to crack the code on an ancient machine which
appears to be some kind of gateway to other worlds. Sure enough, they get
the gate working. But instead of actually THINKING about the situation, the
filmmakers just dove right in and threw every cliche they could remember at
the story: a military man (Kurt Russell) is assigned to head up the
expedition to whatever's on the other side.
What's on the other side? You sitting down? Turns out the sun god Ra has
established his dominion there, and commands giant power (which we all know
as technology of course, but tell that to his zillions of
worshippers/slaves). It's like a grotesque Hollywood version of Church of
the SubGenius dogma ("JEHOVAH IS AN ALIEN, AND IS STILL THREATENING THIS
PLANET!"), only with no sense of humor. Ra is played by Jaye Davidson and
actually fits the part physically, although he's saddled with having his
voice digitally mangled in post. It's only a matter of time before we get
guns, mayhem, uprisings, and a giant LED timer on an atomic bomb. Sheesh.
It amazes me -- really amazes me beyond language -- how much energy went
into a movie this vapid. The effects are seamless. The crowds and sets are
convincingly put together and filmed. But somehow, all that energy managed
to not be directed into writing and assembling a compelling, *interesting*
story about all this stuff. It wouldn't even have to be Oscar-level material
-- just something smarter, more knowing and maye even more curious about
what's out there than something which has the body of a STAR WARS remake and
the mind of a direct-to-video throwaway.
STARGATE is almost certainly written in homage to all those '50s pulp SF
movies where the Scientist and the Military Man lock horns over the Alien
Menace. "We need to understand them!" and "Blow them out of the sky!" are
usually the lines of dialog that get stuffewd into the character's mouths in
a movie like this, but we're not even allowed that luxury in STARGATE. The
movie plays less like homage (think of STRANGE INVADERS or the 1981 FLASH
GORDON for a better example of that) and more like, well, a clone. It's not
a send-up of bad movies -- it IS just a bad movie. Albeit louder and more
expensive.syegul@ix.netcom.com                                       EFNet IRC: GinRei
[new email address coming soon]                                  ICQ: 934998
http://www.io.com/~syegul                          another worldly device...
NEW WEB SITE: http://cablehouse.dyn.ml.org      ...and the mandate of heaven
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
"Hard Rain" has some of the most exhausting-looking stuntwork and mechanical
effects I've ever seen in a movie.  They are used to prop up one of the
thinnest and most inept stories I've ever seen in a movie.  Times like this, I
fear the "Making Of" featurette is more absorbing than the flick itself.
Hell, the story's almost an afterthought.  An armored truck gets stuck in the
middle of a town that's being evacuated due to severe flooding.  A thief
(Morgan Freeman, who manages to be interesting even when given nothing of
substance to do) wants the $3 million in cash inside the truck.  There's a
shootout, one of the drivers is killed, and the other (Christian Slater)
escapes and stows the cash in a drowned mausoleum.
Up until this point the movie isn't bad, but then it quickly becomes an
exercise in -- dare I say it? -- soggy futility.  Freeman's character is
flanked by several inept (and wretchedly played) sidekicks, who tear through
the town on waterskis and shoot everything that blows bubbles.        Slater gets
mixed up with the local cops, who think he's a looter and slam him in a
holding cell.  (This actually leads to one of the better scenes in the movie,
where Slater has to figure out how to break out of the cell while the entire
building is slowly being flooded -- although the filmmakers cheat on the
outcome.)
I mentioned stunts and mechanical effects.  The whole film takes place within
the town -- a masterpiece of engineering, which just gets more and more
treacherous as the movie unspools.  I didn't doubt for a moment that I wasn't
looking at a drowning landscape.  What I did doubt was whether one atom of the
plot made any sense.
The film's confused in more ways that one.  I guess after Freeman came on
board, the script was rewritten to make the thief less of a monster and more
of a philosophical sort.  This, unfortunately, only makes us wonder why a
sensible fellow like him doesn't simply give up and head for dry land.
The monster role gets taken by the town sheriff (Randy Quaid), who behaves in
ways that say he is less greedy than stupid.  You might say that greed often
causes people to behave stupidly.  I imagine the screenwriters who dreamed
this nonsense up would have something to say about that.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Johnny Got His Gun (1971)
CAPSULE: One of the best cinematic arguments against war, courtesy of Dalton
Trumbo's scarifying novel. And a very touching movie to boot.
I've always hated "message" films -- basically, any movie where it's plain
that the director is trying to preach. Dalton Trumbo made his antiwar stance
plain when he originally wrote JOHNNY GOT HIS GUN as a novel in the late
Thirties, but he did it in a way that no one else even dared to imitate.
When his novel was adapted for the screen and directed by himself during the
vitriolic years of the Vietnam War, it got rediscovered by college students
worldwide, and has remained continually in print ever since. The book stood
against war by providing the most gut-level argument imaginable, and the
movie works in the same desperate spirit.
Joe Bonham (Timothy Bottoms) is a fresh-faced young man who lives in a
Rockwell-esque America that has not yet discovered the horror that is World
War I. When the war breaks out, he enlists -- there is a lovely scene where
he spends one last night with his Irish girlfriend -- and is sent into the
thick of battle. While on the front lines, he is sent into no-man's-land to
bury a solider's corpse, and is shelled.
The movie works in flashbacks, starting with the greviously injured Joe and
working our way backwards and forwards through his memory. The movie makes
it inexorably clear that because of the severity of Joe's wounds, the Army
doesn't even think he's anything more than a vegetable (they call him
"decerebrated" as a way of distancing themselves from what has happened to
him). We hear Joe's thoughts as he tries to figure out what has happened,
and as he tries to find ways of coping with his horribly damaged body.
He does, and he even manages to find a way to communicate with the outside
world, much to the astonishment of his attendants. What happens from there
on out is the core of the movie's "message", and I won't reveal it, but I
will say that it serves more as the context for everything else that happens
in the movie, rather than its only reason to exist. We learn a great deal
about Joe, aside from his horrendous lot in life, and the movie makes its
point very plainly by developing Joe as an individual and not a mere basket
case.
One of the most astonishing things about the movie's history came from its
originally being rated X upon release -- not because of a (later excised)
nude scene, but because the MPAA felt that the movie's anti-war theme was
inherently adult. (The rating was later overturned.) Today, such a thing
would probably be unthinkable, but it serves as a chilling barometer of how
unconfortable most of America was with dissenting opinions in popular
culture.
Francois Truffaut once said that no war film could be truly anti-war,
because it would end up making war look glamorous and exciting. I imagine it
was more than a coincidence that he named JOHNNY GOT HIS GUN one of his
favorite films of all time before he died. It sets out to break your heart,
rather than enlist it, and it does that very well.

Title
Review for Needful Things (1993)
Stephen King is a prolific and sometimes gifted writer, but his track record
with the movies is spotty.  Every now and then, we get an original vision or
an offbeat story to begin with, and the result is really memorable: THE
SHINING, THE DEAD ZONE, STAND BY ME, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION were all
strong and enjoyable.  The rest of them have been by-the-numbers piffle,
like this one.
What's wrong with this movie?  It was lifted more or less intact from his
novel of the same name, and I think that's the source of the problem.  Many
of his novels have become windy, overcooked exhalations to no clear purpose.
Once you get your mind around the basic conceit of the story, the rest is
just a taxi ride.  NEEDFUL THINGS fits squarely into that category.  As a
movie, it's even more insufferable and dessicated than the book it was taken
from.
The story opens up in Castle Rock, another of King's fictional Maine towns
that looks peaceful on the outside but you just know is brimming with
repressed horror.  Ooo.  One day a store that vaguely resembles an antique
store, named "Needful Things", opens shop.  The proprietor is played by Max
von Sydow, who is probably the best thing in the movie, since he is always
enjoyable as someone of diabolical intent.  I'm half expecting a movie
biography of Anton Szandor LaVey with him starring in it, and come to think
of it, that would be far more interesting than anything that happens here.
Never mind.  The store has in its collection of bric-a-brac various items
for which all the members of the town all harbor the deepest desires.  The
proprietor sells them, but he is of course charging the highest possible
price for them: your soul.  There are other developments, too, which involve
the townspeople stabbing each other in the back to curry favor with Satan.
The only person who holds out against the Big Sellout is Ed Harris, playing
a police chief with an ugly past, but soon everyone else in town has
succumbed and it isn't long before the whole place is going up in flames.
God, I'm so sick of a movie's third act where they "solve" everything by
blowing it up.  It didn't work in ZABRISKIE POINT, so why should it work
now?
There's not much variety in the movie, either; it's all horribly
monochromatic and repetitive.  Satan arrives, sets up shop, people fall all
over each other selling out to the devil, mayhem ensues, movie eventually
terminates on a sarcastic note.  When I think about how much money and time
and care goes into making any movie, and I see something like this, my heart
dies a little.

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Claustrophobic, flashy-looking and occasionally neat thriller about
a... monster?... that gets loose in a museum. Good for audiences that talk
back.
Tom Sizemore is turning into one of my favorite actors to look forward to.
He's been watchable and interesting in everything I've seen him in so far,
and that includes THE RELIC, a flashy piece of noise about some kinda
critter that consists mostly of teeth making all hell break loose in a
museum. It's either your cup of tea or it isn't; the movie won't win any
converts to the genre, but is decently entertaining, and has all the right
ingredients. It's ALIEN crossbred with fill-in-the-blank, and that's
innovation for you in today's film market.
Sizemore's character, D'Agosta, is a superstitious cop, and that instantly
sets up a cute (albeit manufactured) tension between him and Margo Green
(Penelope Ann Miller). She's an evolutionary biologist who doesn't believe
in the boogeyman, but monsters like the one in this movie have a way of
making people into believers. Actually, she understands how it's been
created -- the science in the story is fast and loose, but what the hell, at
least it's THERE -- but is still scared of it. You would be, too.
The creature actually has an m.o.: it hunts and kills to consume the
hypothalamus of the victim, since the gland in question provides a hormone
that the creature needs to evolve. Or survive. Or something -- I decided it
wasn't important; after all, the gland can only manufacture hormones when
it's in a warm and breathing creature. Ripping it out and eating it would be
only good for a quick fix, apparently, and maybe not even that.
But comments like this are like saying SE7EN was too dark and rainy: they're
beside the point. The movie is about action and movement and shocks, and it
has all of them. It also has some viciously convincing special effects, and
a student of same would do well to check out the movie for no other reason.
But while you're at it, look at Sizemore. He has that look on his face that
shows there's someone at home, even when the script treats him like a piece
of furniture. I walked out wondering when I'd get to see him lead in a movie
where there wasn't something trying to rip open his head and eat it.

Title
Review for Streets of Fire (1984)
CAPSULE: A rock and roll fable, indeed. Like a Hubert Selby, Jr. novel
filtered through equal parts Damon Runyan and Bruce Springsteen, and a ton
of fun.
STREETS OF FIRE bills itself as "A Rock And Roll Fable", and the description
is perfect. This is a stylish, great-looking, and breezily enjoyable movie
that feels like a Hubert Selby, Jr., novel with a Damon Runyan rewrite,
irected by Bruce Springsteen.
Noir is one of the few truly American movie genres, aside from the Hollywood
musical and the Western. This is post-WWII Brooklyn noir, for lack of a
better label, with a generous injection of rock 'n roll and an all-around
confrontational attitude. It all works.
The plot is simplicity itself: Rocker Ellen Aim (Diane Lane) is kidnapped by
a vicious street gang, led by a bloodthirsty fellow named Raven (Willem
Dafoe, very nasty). Her old soldier flame (played by Michael Pare) comes
back into town to save her, but doesn't count on a whole bunch of things
going askew. That's about the entire plot, save for the spats with Ellen's
manager (a hilarious Rick Moranis), an encounter with a doo-wop group that
winds up becoming Ellen's supporting act, and a whole gang of other fun
little touches.
But in movies like this, when is the plot important? The movie is all style,
all visuals and attitudes, quotable lines and posturing -- and it delivers
all those things consistently and with great brio and pacing. No surprise
that it was directed by Walter Hill (48 HRS.), who understands this kind of
macho romanticism perfectly, and has put together a movie that's a mixture
of times and sensibilities, but perfectly unified in tone. When was the last
time you could say something like that about a movie, especially a movie
where it seems like someone gets decked on the jaw (*and* passes out) every
2.63 minutes on cue?
STREETS OF FIRE isn't the greatest movie ever made, but it occupies a
totally unique little niche, and enjoys the position it has. Anyone with a
weakness for doo-wop, neon, motorcycles, rainy streets, the El, Studebakers,
gang pictures, lonely heroes, and a great-looking gal giving the microphone
both lungs will eat this movie up. I did.

Title
Review for Brazil (1985)
I admire a movie like BRAZIL for what it tries to do, but as I've said many
times before, I can only review what's on the screen. BRAZIL is a cluttered,
jumbled, overlong and underfocused movie that has many moments of inspiration
-- and little else.
The story takes place in a dystopian future where everything is mechanized
and yet somehow nothing works. Terrorism is commonplace. Sam Lowry (played
with mousy insouciance by Jonathan Pryce) is one of the worker-ants in the
big machine, and fantasizes about epic struggles to save a dreamlike beauty
from the clutches of an evil techno-samurai. By plot complications too weird
to reveal here, he gets involved with a terrorist cell (who alternate between
blowing things up and repairing them) and is eventually branded an enemy of
the state, but not before enduring a whole slew of near-psychotic adventures.
In the abstract, it sounds great, but on screen, it doesn't come together.
What's wrong here? The set design is astonishing and inspired -- there's one
tracking shot inside a really, REALLY big room that may almost be worth the
cost of the ticket alone -- the actors do fine jobs, and there are many
flashes of brilliantly ugly wit (as when a criminal is persuaded to give
himself up so his credit rating won't be too badly slashed). But... some
larger sense of an overall design is missing. There's no sense that Gilliam
has something really cogent to say about a world like this, or even about
Lowry's place in it, other than the usual platitudes about the Individual vs.
the State.
Terry Gilliam makes movies that are crammed with ambitious, eye-attacking
power, but are also frequently confused or meandering. In BRAZIL, Gilliam is
less concerned with a coherent plot than with an overall mood, a sense of
rushing madness and overarching, indomitable paranoia. And sure, he achieves
it. Trouble is, a movie like this could have used a more focused story to
make it really stick, instead of just making it a series of good-looking but
splattery meditations on the same vague subject.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Title
Review for Naked (1993)
CAPSULE: As bleak and unsparing a movie as could be imagined, and also one
of the finest.
"No matter how many books you read," says Johnny, "there is something in
this world that you never ever ever ever ever fucking understand."
Johnny should know. His world has caved in around his head; when he spits
his venom at the audience and at the others in NAKED, Mike Leigh's scalding
and brilliant movie, he's not so much inflicting abuse as reporting from the
front.
Johnny appears at the beginning of NAKED with no preface, no history. He
steals a car and makes his way to London, where he ingratiates himself with
Sophie (Katrin Cartlidge), the flatmate of an old girlfriend who's on
holiday. From the way he talks to her -- and she's as zombified and
out-of-it as he is, she just has more socially acceptable reasons for being
like that -- we wonder how he could have ever entertained a relationship
with anyone. We wonder how he could even stand to be near a mirror, or how
they can even stand to be near each other. They embody each other's deepest
disgusts, and make no bones about it. And on a deeper, uglier level, they
justify each other.
I've known people like Johnny (played unblinkingly and with frightening
power by David Thewlis). They don't have a fixed address, method of income,
bank account, or even a consistent set of clothes. What they do have is a
philosophy, an outlook -- the one thing they can take with them to the
grave, and they are convinced that is exactly where they and everyone else
on the besotted planet are headed. Johnny has been stepped on by life --
stripped naked, as per the title, and what's left is not something anyone
who can wrap themselves snugly in a cozy house and a good-paying job wants
to look at. Thewlis makes Johnny fascinating, because he is obviously
intelligent and not without a certain amount of heart, but so badly beaten
that it's a miracle he's not one giant walking lump of psychic scar tissue.
And -- quel irony -- there is another character, Jeremy (Greg Cruttwell) who
is not only far safer than Johnny will ever be (or could), but is happily
awaiting his own destruction. The sooner he's out of here, the better, but
there's no reason he can't have some fun toying with others on the way on
the way.
Mike Leigh is one of my favorite directors, because he refuses to force his
material to fit a mold. He takes actors who are his friends, then has them
play out improvised scenes with characters in mind and then develops a
script from that material. No screenwriter could have come up with the
material in NAKED; it's just too confrontational and too raw. One scene
which is almost agonizing to watch -- but it's the agony that preludes
ecstasy, in a way -- has Johnny confronting a night watchman and
systematically trying to break down the man's pat defenses against lunatics
like himself.
NAKED is not a fun film; it's not a piece of "entertainment". But that's
precisely why it works -- it is not only honest and unsparing, but true and
properly observed. After seeing it, I was forced to confront my own sense of
nihilism, and wrestle with it a little harder than I had before. Like IKIRU,
this is one of those rare movies that really does, in my opinion, have the
power to cause people to analyze themselves and maybe make changes in their
lives. It's painful, but not without cause.
The movie's rationale is simple: There are no safe exits or manufactured
redemptions for anyone here. We are all far closer to the abyss than we
think. Even Johnny, who has cultivated the act of staring into the abyss,
does not understand until it's too late that there's no such thing as the
bottom. Only down.

Title
Review for Legend (1985)
[NB: This review is designed to cover the European edition of the film, not
the American version.]
CAPSULE: Gorgeous but leaden fairytale with (literally) a heart of darkness.
LEGEND is a strange example of a lot of energy and effort gone somewhat awry
-- a huge, ambitious production mounted in search of a script that seemed to
only be half there. It's a stunning film to watch, but when it's over, it
leaves nothing behind except an aftertaste.
Ridley Scott, director of ALIEN and BLADE RUNNER, likes to make movies that
enclose the viewer visually, even if they're not spellbinding storytelling
(which those two movies were, but not this one). He gives us a fantasyland
that looks like a Frank Frazetta painting come to life. In it are two
characters: Princess Lili (Mia Sara), lively and innocent, and Jack (Tom
Cruise), a wild-child of the forest. The two of them are in love, and you
know how stupidly people act when they fall in love... and Jack's
transgression is to take Lili to where the unicorns dwell.
They're not the only ones here. There is also Darkness (a very intimidating
Tim Curry). What's interesting is that Darkness is not so much evil as he is
simply an embodiment of lusts -- something everyone has -- so he seems less
like a villain and more like a tragic figure gone horribly wrong. There's
much potential here, but the movie develops it stumblingly.
The plot centers around Darkness's attempts to have the unicorns destroyed,
which will plunge the world back into eternal night once more. Jack winds up
being drafted by a small army of magical creatures to fight Darkness; the
most striking of the gang played by William Bennent, the child actor who
intimidated the audience with his unearthly eyes in THE TIN DRUM. Here he's
also effective, projecting a sense that not all things that enchant are also
neccesarily benevolent. Tom Cruise and Mia Sara are also both fine in the
movie, and they make their characters quick and appealing. 
I didn't hate LEGEND; in fact, it grew on me as I watched it, not only
because of the look and feel, but the psychological undertones of the story.
But at the same time I had to admit that there was not enough of the story
on the screen; I was responding to my own projections and assumptions about
the movie, not the movie itself. Too bad. The movie's also very dark in
places -- it might scare smaller children, and it saddened me to think that
the only person who could really access a fairytale with attempts at
sophisticated undertones was an adult.
LEGEND had a troubled production history. One of the sound stages burned to
the ground during production, and the remainder of the movie was filmed on
hastily constructed sets. It was also savagely re-edited by Universal when
released in the USA, and even the European edition of the movie (which uses
a Jerry Goldsmith score to much better effect than the Tangerine Dream
soundtrack plastered over the US version) is patchy-looking. I suspect a
good deal of the movie's virtues were ruined in the ham-handed editing, but
at the same time, I suspect the movie's basic flaws can only be corrected by
so much.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
CAPSULE: Intelligent, passionate, and utterly gripping exploration of the
idea of interstellar contact. Makes CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND look
like a very bad episode of STAR TREK.
The opening shots of CONTACT are so audacious that they stun an audience
into complete submission. In a simple, elegant series of images and sounds,
we are shown the vastness of the universe and the tininess of man's earth
against it. By the time the story proper started, the audience was already
reeling under the impact of being SHOWN where they stood, cosmically
speaking. They were all ready.
CONTACT is about that sense of astonishment and wonder -- about emotions as
well as ideas, and about how those emotions are played out in the real
world. It is, next to 2001, the single best movie I've seen that really
conveys a sense of WONDER about the universe: What if there's life out
there? How would we get in touch? What would we say after hello?
Jodie Foster plays a radio astronomer who has always been fascinated by the
lure of such questions. After a series of thankless jobs for SETI, which
apparently is tantamount to professional suicide, she works with her
companions to secure funding from a giant multinational corporation to hunt
for signals from space.The realities of getting corporate funding for
scientific research aren't pretty: you have to basically whore yourself, but
Foster's character, named Arroway, winds up working for a man (played by
John Hurt with a mixture of greasy charm and grandfatherly intelligence) who
seems to be as much in love with the idea of contact as she is.
Then one day everything comes together: they find a signal. A whopping huge
signal. Someone out there has been listening, and sends us back a message
with a format we understand perfectly -- TV transmissions. There is also
something else encoded in the transmissions -- something which requires the
scientists to think non-linearly. And when they do...
I will not go any further into the plot. One of the beauties of the movie is
in the way its surprises unfold, and since I'm hellbent on getting people to
see this one, I won't ruin a thing. What I will say is that the implications
of the signal alone are dealt with intelligence and verve -- much more so
than in many, many other movies. In CE3K, for instance, there was the effect
on one man, and not a very stable man at that; in CONTACT, the social and
moral effects are examined.
The film also touches on the issue of faith versus science, and has enough
courage to suggest that the two are not dichotomous, that we need both to
guide us forward into the universe. Arroway does not think religious people
are deluded, and many of the people of faith in the movie do not think that
science is a sterile inhuman business. But they are surrounded by people who
are more fanatical, and some of their actions have tragic consequences.
CONTACT is a daring movie in many ways. It tells a strong, human story
without violence or easy answers, and tries to get us to see beyond the
provincialism of our lives. To see the cosmic scale of things. The closing
credits dedicate the movie "to Carl", and I think he would have been elated.
For those who knew the man, this is very much an encapsulation of his
aspirations and dreams.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Back in the early years of his career, Eddie Murphy was afflicted with what
Roger Ebert termed "Star Magic Syndrome", where a hot young star is shoved
blindly into one ill-conceived production after another, in the hopes that
name-brand recognition will make up for shoddy writing or inept concepts.
After the surefooted fun of DOCTOR DOOLITTLE and THE NUTTY PROFESSOR, HOLY
MAN is a step back to THE GOLDEN CHILD for Murphy.
Murphy plays a guru/swami-type figure named G (yes, just "G" -- [G]andhi?
[G]autama? we never find out), whose idea of mysticism is parlor tricks and
whose expoundings on philosophy are torn wholesale from sub-Robert Bly
self-help books.  He's the kind of character that desperately needs an edge,
a twist.  I kept thinking back to my own readings on Zen Buddhism, in which
the masters slapped their disciples around mercilessly, insulted them, posed
impossible riddles, and did all kinds of other off-the-wall things in the
name of enlightenment.  No two ways about it: G is boring.
G wanders into the lives of two TV execs (Jeff Goldblum and Kelly Preston),
who are the manufactured romance for the movie.  They're a little unnerved
by this guy, even when he repairs the flat tires on their car.  Every time
they look at G, their faces seem to say something like: "What if he's one of
those wackos who insinuates themselves into your life and kills your dog?"
Now right there is something more interesting than anything that actually
happens in the movie.
See, the execs are in charge of a rapidly-failing home shopping network
which hawks various utterly unsellable products.  They desperately need to
revamp things.  One day, on a whim, G wanders onto the set and does his
thing -- and suddenly, merchandise is blowing out the door!  This guy's a
kick-butt salesman!  This leads to him getting his own show (named, with
agonizing predictability, "The G Spot").
Why isn't any of this funny?  Probably because we can see it coming a
billion miles away.  Nothing happens in this movies because it's human
nature -- certainly not the cardboard romance, which has Preston and
Goldblum fighting, making up and getting back together in scenes of leaden
predictability.  And G isn't a counterpoint to anything: he's his own
straight man.  He has a bunch of unedifying little speeches and one long one
that's not only unedifying, but dishonest, because it's a parable that we've
heard way too many times before.
The writer, Tom Schulman, has indulged in this kind of sappiness before.  He
penned the insufferable DEAD POETS SOCIETY, which indulged in the insincere
fiction that poetry and writing need to be "sold" to students with flashy
technique instead of cherished on their own.  Here, he's no better: he gives
G nothing of importance to do, surrounds him with a setup that's bloodless
and uninvolving, and fills his mouth with thimble-deep pop-psych blather.
Suggestions for the rewrite: Either ditch the romance or make it more
bloodthirsty.  And as for G, give him some actual attitude instead of just
a smile.  Here's one role where Eddie Murphy should actually have let the
more scatological, scabrous side of his personality out of the closet.
Failing that, maybe they should have case Chris Tucker.  He would have been
funny just standing there in swami pajamas.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Not as contrived as it might have sounded, this drama uses Brad
Pitt and Harrison Ford to good effect in a story that works emotionally
despite slight lapses of logic.
I had been led to believe that THE DEVIL'S OWN was a ridiculous botch of a
movie, mostly no thanks to a number of severely negative reviews that
focused in on the trouble-riddled production of the movie; apparently, Ford
and Pitt were lured into the movie with a script that was reworked
significantly during preproduction. I gritted my teeth and checked it out
anyway. To my surprise, THE DEVIL'S OWN turned out to be a good movie -- not
a towering success, but an effective and remarkably intelligent film about
two ethics in collision.
Brad Pitt plays a young man who entered the IRA at an early age, after his
father was killed in front of his eyes by masked gunmen. In a police raid,
he kills a number of British police and soldiers, but manages to escape, and
makes his way to the United States under the wings of a judge who
specializes in "assisting" IRA members. Pitt's character is out to snare a
cache of Stinger missiles and return home. Ford plays the Irish cop who
Pitt's character is provided a place to stay with.
The movie strives for emotional authenticity and gets it right most of the
time. The early scenes with Ford's character's family, for instance, are
right on the nose. Ford's character has had three daughters and no sons, and
an emotional bond forms between him and Pitt's character. Also, the cop's
partner is explored in a subplot which comments strongly on the cop's
ethics: He hates the fact that the world drives you to do terrible things in
the name of so-called higher goods which are mutable. And this, of course,
will put him directly in Pitt's character's path.
There are some moments where logic is strained, but the movie never strikes
a wrong note emotionally. That's where it works best, when it tests the
heartstrings of everyone involved and sees what happens. Pitt's character
respects the cop's integrity, but he is, after all, a soldier in a war, and
cannot simply drop everything and retire. There's also some violence, but no
more than needed to move the story forward: there is an exchange of gunplay
at the very end, for instance, but it's not the deciding factor of the
story. To the degree that the movie strove to avoid emotional cliches, it
works very well.
THE DEVIL'S OWN is not the best movie with either Pitt or Ford, but it is a
solid one, and touches on a few points that make it a worthwhile time. And
has more sense than to try and solve everything with a bullet.

Title
Review for Shi di chu ma (1980)
CAPSULE: Roaringly good early Jackie Chan vehicle, loaded with splendid
stunt choreography and -- no! -- a nifty story.
YOUNG MASTER opens with a scene of such brashness and confidence that I was
holding my breath out of fear that they couldn't sustain such a tone
throughout the movie. And they really can't, but they come close enough that
it makes little difference. The scene in question is a contest between rival
martial arts schools, in which two teams dress up as Chinese New Year's
dragons and must compete to retrieve a prize from an elaborate obstacle
course. It's ten thousand times more riveting that the usual "Ha! Ha! Now
you will die!" stuff that most chopsocky movies build their story around.
It's also where we meet Jackie Chan's character, named (not coincidentally)
Dragon.
Despite being well-coordinated, Dragon still loses the competition to the
rival school. His teacher, disgusted with the lack of discipline he shows,
kicks him out -- and his brother, as well, when it turns out his brother's a
sellout to the other side. This sends the two of them right into gobs of
trouble, since Dragon's brother has decided that the best way to make his
living is through allying himself with a criminal family. All of this comes
roaring out at us at the speed of about six fpm (fights per minute).
What's surprising about all this is that it holds together, makes a strange
amount of sense, and becomes a clotheslines for Jackie to hang no end of
martial-arts-based visual gags. (One fight, involving a battle fan, required
over 300 takes to get right.) The movie also has a fixation with props used
in weird ways: there are scenes where a pipe, a bench, and a length of rope
get used in ways that boggle the mind.
Jackie Chan has risen from a cult figure to a consummate "total
entertainer", a man who so completely lionizes the screen that it's no
wonder he was able to make routine HK action movies into something really
special. Here's proof.

Title
Review for Species (1995)
SPECIES is a forehead-knockingly bad movie. You know what I'm talking about:
that's when you sit there, slack-jawed, staring at the screen, and then just
pound your first into your forehead in total disbelief at what you're
witnessing. It's so awful it's downright charming; it's about as bad and as
*loud* as STARGATE.
Here's the "plot": Scientists recieve a transmission from space that seems
to consist of a genetic code. After synthesizing it and crossbreeding it
with human DNA, they develop Sil: an innocent-looking, wide-eyed girl-thing
who, for reasons too protracted to list here, has to be destroyed. Only
trouble is, they can't simply put a gun to the back of her head and turn her
into dog food -- like a Bond movie, they have to kill her *elaborately*,
which gives her a chance to escape.
The government corralls together a team of "experts" -- mostly at screwing
up, from the look of it: an assassin (Michael Madsen, looking even dopier
than he did in RESEVOIR DOGS), an empath (Forest Whitaker, looking like the
Pillsbury Doughboy), another scientist, and the creator of Sil (Ben
Kingsley, the best thing in the movie). Most of them will of course be
murdered in various creative ways, but not before they get to show their
various "skills". Smithson, the empath, for instance, has the uncanny
ability to just spit out where Sil is and what she's doing. Thanks to the
fact that his skill doesn't have any explicit rules, it leaves us scratching
our heads as to why he doesn't just produce a map and draw an X on it.
Sil, as it turns out, is growing and developing at a furious rate -- which,
of course, requires that she murder several people to feed herself. Which is
nothing compared to the vigor she exhibits when trying to find a mate. The
adult Sil (played by Natasha Henstridge) looks like she just walked off the
runway of a fashion show and has no trouble finding nookie in California,
and the movie gets some good laughs out of everyone reacting to her total
guilelessness. There is also one moment -- maybe salvaged from an earlier,
better draft of the script -- where she tries to to explain who she is, and
can't. But the main purpose of the movie is never in doubt: violence,
gratuitous nudity, ear-hammering sound effects. The last one is really
ticking me off in a lot of movies lately: why, for instance, do we alwasy
have swooshing sound effects to accompany the image of a FLASHLIGHT playing
across the camera lens? Light beams didn't disturb the air much the last
time I checked.

Title
Review for Alien (1992)
CAPSULE: The weakest and least engaging of the Alien movies, dragged 
down by an uninvolving story and no real tension.
ALIEN 3 (the "3" should be in superscript) is a sad and wan entry in 
what was shaping up as one of the best SF sagas ever put on screen. It 
continues the story of Ripley, the 
space-trucker-turned-impromptu-survivalist, but seems remarkably 
uninterested in her. In fact, the movie seems lucky to be interested in 
anything at all, it's so elegaic and limp. A little of this would have 
been nice for atmosphere, but the movie telegraphs its own tragedy from 
the beginning.
At the end of the last film (ALIENS), Ripley and two survivors were on 
their way home. Unfortunately, an alien pod had been deposited in their 
ship, and wound up triggering off their ejection in an escape pod. The 
pod crashes on Firorina 161, a prison planet designed to house the 
incurably criminally violent. Ripley lives through the crash; the others 
do not.
The prison is a grim place, even as prisons go -- it's been built around 
the remnants of an abandoned steelworks, which provides no end of 
techno-gothic backdrops for the actors to be backlit against. Lice are 
endemic, and so Ripley's head is shaved (another surreal touch). At 
first it looks like she just has to hold out as an unwelcome guest until 
a Company rescue ship can arrive, but it doesn't stay that way. One of 
the other eggs on board the wrecked escape pod hatches, and soon a 
newly-gestated alien is running amuck. Worse, it looks like Ripley 
herself has been impregnated.
What's weird is how little tension this generates, except near the end, 
when the pressure is being troweled on through every cheap cinematic 
form of cheating imaginable: loud music, shaky camerawork, etc. 
Sigourney Weaver has become comfortable with the role, and she does well 
with it, but this time the role has been underwritten and left slack. 
The supporting actors are also not given a lot to do: the doctor 
(Charles Dance) and another, rather religious inmate (Charles S. Dutton, 
very good), hiave presence, but they're not asked to do anything with 
it.
In light of the impending sequel, which apparently plays fast and loose 
with the ending of this movie, I will not talk about the ending -- 
except to say that they found a remarkably good ending for such a drab 
movie. It's strange that some of the desperate and improvisational 
thinking that they found to wind up this story couldn't have driven the 
rest of it.

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
CAPSULE: Potentially interesting story rendered dull and coldly distant by
David Lynch's perpetually smug and alienating style. There are better ways
to be conned.
Watching LOST HIGHWAY, I kept thinking about a picture puzzle that you spend
a week trying to solve, only to discover half the pieces are missing. I felt
conned; I'd lost two and a half hours of my life over a movie that added up
to exactly nothing. Everything in LOST HIGHWAY cancels itself out.
There are people who have argued this point with me at length, insisting
that was what the movie was about. I disagree, because LOST HIGHWAY doesn't
even bother to enlist our attention long enough to BE about anything. It is
a self-important and boring film that builds in its own excuses for being
and never tells us what they are.
The story actually has an intriguing presence. A jazz musician (Bill
Pullman) and his wife receive a series of videotapes in the mail. Someone is
walking around filming their house. Then the stranger gets bolder and starts
filming the *inside* of the house as well. Eventually, the tapes show
Pullman having murdered his wife -- and sure enough, guess what's happened.
Pullman is sent to prison, but while awaiting execution, he has a series of
bizarre Lynchian experiences in his cell and morphs into someone else
(Balthazar Getty), a young punk. Nobody can explain it, but they have to let
him go. That doesn't mean they can't keep an eye on him, of course.
As I said, all of this is potentially interesting. Not in Lynch's hands.
Everything I described is stretched out to fill the entire first hour of the
movie, which slithers by *so* slowly and lingers on every insignificant
gesture *so* painfully that by the time we get to the change-over, all
interest in the goings-on has been buried. The actors are not bad in their
roles -- they're just made into zombies. I was reminded of the way Robert
Bresson -- the French director with an almost paranoid loathing of actors
attempting to supersede the director's vision -- who made his actors repeat
scenes until they simply did them with mechanical precision and no attempt
at personification. Except that Bresson had a larger vision to communicate.
Lynch has nothing that we can discern, save the urge to be artfully bizarre.
The other day I saw BEGOTTEN, a movie with no dialogue and no real storyline
that succeeded excellently in being enthralling. Why did that work and LOST
HIGHWAY fail? Probably because BEGOTTEN was purer and not beholden to
anything remotely familiar. LOST HIGHWAY is so obviously David Lynch
indulging himself to no good end that we're alienated and fed up in short
order.
David Lynch has made two, possibly three films that I enjoyed: ERASERHEAD,
which was probably the best showcase for his homegrown surreal nightmares;
BLUE VELVET, which actually set up a story in the midst of his pretentions,
and THE ELEPHANT MAN, which made the most sense and was the most human.
Everything since, and no doubt from now on, has proven to be a waste of
time, and to be honest I'm not one to mourn.

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
"Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" is one of the worst movies by a
director of significance that I have ever seen.  It's shameful that
such an amazing book could be transformed -- by an excellent director --
 into a movie of such appalling emptiness and shapelessness.  It's not
even a good lousy movie.  More below the belt than that I can't get.
Ostensibly drawn from Hunter S. Thompson's seminal work of the same
name, "Fear and Loathing" gives us Raoul (Johnny Depp, unrecognizable
and damn near incoherent with that cigarette holder wedged in his
mouth) and Gonzo (Benicio del Toro) as drug-addled journalists who have
allegedly been sent to cover a bike race out near Vegas.  They stick
around after that to also examine (if that's the word) a convention of
district attorneys, and take drugs.  Lots of drugs.
I quote: "We had two bags of grass, seventy-five pellets of mescaline,
five sheets of high-powered blotter acid, a salt shaker half-full of
cocaine and a whole galaxy of multicolored uppers, downers, screamers,
laughers... also a quart of tequila, a quart of rum, a case of beer, a
pint of raw ether, and two dozen amyls. But the only thing that worried
me was the ether. There is nothing more irresponsible and depraved than
a man in the depths of an ether binge, and I knew we would be getting
into that rotten stuff sooner or later."
Raoul and Gonzo consume most of this chemical smorgasbord through the
course of the movie, and the audience is forced to watch the results.
At first there is the hint of something wicked going on, like when they
try to con their way into a Debbie Reynolds performance by giving the
usher a toot, but then the same pattern is repeated, without any real
variation or insight, until we are left with something that cannot even
be watched for more than a few minutes at a time without cringing.
What we have is not so much a movie about drugs as it is a movie that
simply contains drugs.  There's no point of view, no insight, and not a
hint of wit or genuine examination of character.  There is just Raoul
and Gonzo getting into one stoned mess after another.  Cheech and Chong
used to make movies like this, too, but the saving grace was that they
were intermittently funny.  "Fear and Loathing" isn't.
Much noise has been made about "Fear and Loathing" being a dissection
of "Straight" America during the dog-end of the Sixties.  Horse
manure.  Gilliam does this by ineptly throwing some stock footage of
Sixties protests at us, and by having everyone in the movie who's
an "Establishment" person be an asshole.  But Raol and Duke are
scarcely any less assholes themselves, so what's the point?
I like Gilliam as a director; every now and then he pulls himself
together for a really virtuoso movie like "12 Monkeys."  Here, he was
apparently drafted in after the original director, Alex Cox, left; I
suspect Cox, whose movies include the amazing "Repo Man", would have
been able to REALLY make something scary and anarchic out of this
material.  In Gilliam's hands, what we have is barely even intelligible
as a movie.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Chamber, The (1996)
CAPSULE: Starts off as a legal thriller, but mutates into something much
closer to the heart -- and features Gene Hackman in a typically excellent
performance.
Some movies lead you wrong, and that's a good thing. THE CHAMBER, adapted
from the John Grishamn novel, starts off as a typical
legal-thriller-with-a-twist, but then slowly turns into a different sort of
story, about one man trying to find the truth about the past and another man
trying to find the truth about himself.
The two men are Adam Hall, a young Chicago laywer, and his grandfather, Sam
Cayhall. Cayhall is a product of the worst breeds of Southern racism, in
whose fold he built and detonated several bombs. "I never meant to kill
anyone," he repeats angrily, but bombs are generally not designed to do much
else, and three trials and countless appeals later, he is now on death row.
Hall, his grandson, has decided to take on the eleventh-hour defense.
Hall and Cayhill do not like each other. Cayhill has no use for lawyers --
most of the reasons, it seems at first, are blatantly racist, and don't bear
repeating here (even though they are delivered with consummate skill by
Hackman). Hall doesn't like the bitter old man, but he smells a great deal
is being held away from a lot of people's noses here, and digs. He finds a
lot.
As the movie unwound, I felt it could have gone one of two ways: either it
could have developed the plot to the point where the human story became more
irrelevant and therefore could be resolved with a mechanical flourish (the
way the dreadful A TIME TO KILL ended up), or it could pay closer attention
to the people in the story. It takes the second road, and is all the better
for it. And be warned: as a result, we don't get a nice, tidy conclusion --
a lot of threads are left dangling, probably deliberately, since the real
conclusion of the movie is in the way Hackman's character handles his
oncoming fate. Eventually we see that his racism is not so much a philosophy
as a way of warding off terrible grief and hurt, and self-hatred (as is the
case with most virulently racist people, they compensate violently for not
having what they feel should be simply given to them gratis).
Hall (played by Chris O'Donnell with maturity and grace) also has a
transformation of his own, but a smaller one: sometimes it's not possible to
use the law as a way to repair what has gone wrong, just to comment on it.
He resents his grandfather for using the same tired excuses, but at the same
time batters patiently at the man's defenses, knowing that it's only a
matter of time before the imminence of the clock will get him to say
something true to his heart. He does.

Title
Review for Mortal Kombat: Annihilation (1997)
CAPSULE: A step down from the earlier movie: not as enjoyable, not as
well-done, but a pleasant enough timekiller.
Readers with 85 minutes just burning a hole in their pockets will probably
do a lot worse than to catch MORTAL KOMBAT ANNIHILATION, but on the other
hand, they could do a lot better -- like watch the first movie in the
series. MKA is a brave attempt to follow up the surprisingly fun original,
but it doesn't quite work.
MKA picks up *exactly* where the previous movie left off, with denizens of
the outer dimensions breaking the cosmic laws of Mortal Kombat (the better
to invade earth). Two of the first movie's characters -- Liu Kang and Sonya
-- are back, as well as Raiden, but both Raiden and Sonya are played by
different actors. The original Sonya was Bridgette Wilson; the new one is
the less engaging Sandra Hess. Even worse is the cycling-out of Christopher
Lambert as Raiden (a big loss), and the substitution of the more stolid
James Remar -- a good actor, but not quite what's needed here.
However, the movie does try to make up for what it loses in personality by
stirring some new characters into the mix. The best of the bunch is Lynn
Williams (a former American Gladiator regular) as Jax, who steals every
scene he's in with his glib comebacks and his cybernetic arms.
There's also more liberal use of effects -- especially Hong Kong-style
wire-fighting moves, which give the movie's fighting scenes a different
flavor than the original. In the original, the fights were more
straightforward and looked more like they sprung from credible efforts on
the part of the fighters. Here, it's completely over the top and hence less
directly compelling.
The movie does manage to hum along nicely without getting boring; there's
always something neat to look at. But it doesn't pack quite the same level
of genial joy that the first one did. Looks like pulling off this sort of
thing is a lot harder than people admit.

Title
Review for Kiss of Death (1995)
CAPSULE: Strangely uncomplelling but still compulsively watchable modern
Brooklyn noir tale. Caruso's good, Cage is over the top, Jackson is worth
the price of admission.
KISS OF DEATH bears little to no resemblance to the hard-boiled classic that
it takes its name from. It's almost entirely an invention of Richard Price
and Barbet Schroeder, the writer and director, and it's an odd animal to be
sure. Maybe a more over-the-top directing style would have suited the
material, which is by itself convoluted as all hell.
David Caruso (steely and very watchable) stars as a former crook who's gone
straight after a stay in prison; he's got a wife and kid now. One night his
cousin, still crooked, comes banging on the door: they need someone to drive
some carriers full of stolen cars for them. Caruso's character takes the
job, but for his trouble, he gets shot through the hand, and a cop (Samuel
Jackson, very good) almost dies from that bullet. He would've died for sure
if Caruso's hand hadn't been in the way, but some people just have no damn
gratitude.
Caruso goes to jail, but manages to get some time shaved off by helping the
cops. They want to put away Little Junior (Nicholas Cage), the son of a
bigtime hood who's looking to inherit his daddy's power. Caruso goes back in
to infiltrate Junior's crime circles, but then things get far more
complicated than anyone expects. Junior himself is one strange character --
one of those people who's full of vocabulary words but at the same time is
not quite as smart as he thinks he is. He takes a peculiar shine to Caruso
-- why, we're never quite sure, but we get the impression that Jumior is
impressed with the other man's workmanlike attitude. Cage hams it up playing
Junior, which in retrospect may have been better than trying to play the guy
*totally* straight.
Or something like that. The movie has its hands full with its tricky plot,
and hasn't got much time left to give Junior real motives. And yet, somehow,
the movie finds the time to do some nice things. The scenes between Caruso
and Jackson start off ugly, but then the two men learn they have a lot in
common -- and have scenes where they actually *talk* to each other instead
of exchange token insults or complements. It's nicely done.
Unfortunately, all of that gets flushed away in the movie's climax, a mess
of thriller/chase cliches that wraps things up a little too neatly. What
this movie needed was for Price to sit down and do a more heartless version.
Hell, based on having read THE WANDERERS and CLOCKERS, maybe that was the
one he originally wrote. Sad.syegul@ix.netcom.com                                       EFNet IRC: GinRei
http://www.io.com/~syegul                          another worldly device...
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth
=smilin' in your face, all the time wanna take your place, the BACKSTABBERS=

Title
Review for Rashomon (1950)
CAPSULE: A classic for many reasons; a movie that dares to ask questions
about the nature of truth, and that forces us to think. Kurosawa's best
early work.
The magic of a movie like RASHOMON, which has been so badly plagarized that
I make it standard-issue viewing for my friends who've never heard of it,
is that it works from the simplest and most tightly-constructed story to
create endless abysses of possibility. This is one of those movies you
watch with your breath held and then expel it for hours afterwards as you
argue about it with your friends.
RASHOMON gets its name from the gate in ancient Japan, a crumbling,
rain-sodden wreck, where three people have come to escape from the weather:
a priest, a woodcutter, and a vagabond. The woodcutter (the great Takashi
Shimura, veteran of so many Kurosawa movies) and the priest (Minoru Chiaki,
another Kurosawa regular) are both stunned when the vagabond arrives --
trying to make sense of a bizarre incident that has tested their
understanding of human nature: one afternoon while in the woods, the
woodcutter discovered some bits of a woman's outfit, turned them into the
police, and was later summoned as a material witness to a crime.
As it turned out -- according to the court -- the woman in question
(Machiko Kyo) and her husband were set upon by a bandit (a manic and
wild-eyed Toshiro Mufine), who raped the woman and murdered the man. The
bandit spells out the whole story for them, laughing derisively the whole
time. But then the woman has her say, and the story she tells is entirely
different. Worse, they summon the spirit of the dead man through a medium,
and his story (if it could be trusted at all) is equally contradictory.
Eventually it is revealed that more than one person is most definitely
lying, and the nature of everyone's lies bespeaks a lot more about them
than we would dare know.
What's best about RASHOMON is the way the confrontations and anguished
back-and-forthing between the characters comes naturally out of their
personas, and is not imposed by arbitrary plotting. This is one of the few
movies that manages to be about something in the deepest and truest sense:
when it's over, we've had our senses and sensibilities tested thoroughly.
Nothing's taken for granted.
Why is it so hard to make movies like this? I suspect it's for the same
reason it's hard to get into a good discussion about ideas like this.
People with a brain and a heart are rare enough -- which is what RASHOMON
itself seems to be arguing, anyway....

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Here it is, ladies and gentlemen: the worst film of the year 2000.  I say
this in blanket confidence because if there is a film worse than
"Battlefield Earth", I don't want to know it exists.  I'll take my chances
with being wrong.
Derived from the only-science-fiction-by-association novel of the same name
by L. Ron Hubbard, "Battlefield Earth" opens in the year 3000, when a bunch
of aliens named the Psychlos have taken over the world.  Humanity has
descended to the stone-age level.  The head Psychlo on Earth, Terl (John
Travolta), has literally struck gold and has a plan to have human slaves
mine the gold out for him.  He also engages in some dimwitted blackmail
scheme with his fellow Psychlos, a plot item that feels more at home on one
of those websites where someone puts a secret camera in a restroom.
The human hero, Jonnie "Goodboy" Tyler (Barry Pepper), winds up becoming the
chief guinea pig in Terl's schemes.  He manages to organize a human-led
revolt, in scenes of such astounding stupidity and incompetence that B-movie
directors like William "One-Shot" Beaudine would be holding in their sides
with laughter.  Does anyone here believe for a second that a flight
simulator -- or for that matter a fighter jet -- would still be working
after a thousand years?  Or that there would still be fuel, electricity,
spare parts and so on just lying around?  I've never seen so many people
work so hard to defy common sense and logic at every turn.
John Travolta is not a bad actor, but he is completely wasted in a movie
that does not give him anything better to do other than stomp around and
gloat unconvincingly.  He's just not a very good bad guy -- we've got far
too much of a nice-guy teddy-bear persona in mind for him already, a problem
that dogged him in "Broken Arrow" as well.  His one really menacing thing to
do, other than laugh, is Narrow His Eyes.  With all the mugging that goes
on, this might as well be a silent film with title cards.  Come to think of
it, that alone might make it more entertaining.
In a film loaded with bad things, the worst thing is probably the movie's
obsessive-compulsive ugliness.  The Psychlos look like nine-foot-tall
rejects from a Rastafarian cover band that plays Kiss.  Every set is dark,
cramped, trash-strewn and badly photographed.  The sound effects are
nerve-deadening. The camera looks at everything like someone ran into it
full-tilt before it was switched on.  I've seen films made on digital video
in people's basements that looked better than this.
THe film's one claim to fame is its origins: L. Ron Hubbard is also the
creator of the controversial Church of Scientology.  But the film is devoid
of anything to explicitly connect it with Scientology, just as it is devoid
of anything to explicitly connect it with entertainment, thought, feeling,
or coherency.  Maybe that's for the better.

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
     Adapting Jim Carroll's unappetizing memoir of a Catholic-school
boyhood gone very wrong was probably not a good idea; the book didn't
have very much to say in the first place except how bad it was to be
young and depressed and selling one's body for heroin. (Hubert Selby
Jr. and William Kennedy have explored the same kind of territory in
more penetrating detail, but this isn't a book review, it's a movie
review.)
     And so we come to the movie, which is, if anything, even less
insightful.  It's a foul-tasting, unconvincing story that depends about
half on cliche' Hollywood shorthand and half on puerile teen-age
angst.  What's sad is that in the middle of the movie's mess are some
very good performances.  Leonardo DiCaprio, as Carroll himself, does a
fine job with some truly terrible material, and it's not his fault that
in the end he comes out looking somewhat miscast, I guess.
     The movie wastes no time in showing us how, right from the start,
his options are limited and ugly.  Jim plays on the basketball team of
St. Vitus' high school in New York, a place painted in such
unappetizing detail that we are instantly certain the movie is stacking
the deck.  One particular element--the character of a priest--is
depicted so viciously that I wondered if we'll ever see a sympathetic
man of the cloth in a movie ever again.  Just wondering.
     Things start to sour (like they weren't already).  Jim starts
experimenting with homosexuality and drugs, and pretty soon his mother
(Lorraine Bracco, again very good despite the fact she's given no
character of any substance to portray) throws him out.  This is the
only thing in the movie that she does that shows she even exists.  The
movie only gets uglier and somehow also less interesting from there, as
Jim's downward slide gets the kind of sleazy treatment that crummy
Hollywood cops-and-vice movies typically only indulged in.  There are
also a whole plethora of sullen anti-establishment cliches, like the
scene where he saves a dying friend by liberating him from the hospital
(which got bad laughs from the audience I watched it with).
     The final stretch of the movie is also relentlessly predictable,
showing how Carroll is redeemed (if that's the word for it) with undue
haste, and then wastes no time in showing us how his art has benefited
because of said suffering.  On the basis of what we're offered, I was
hoping he'd pick up basketball again.
     There is a little-seen movie called CHRISTIANE F., made in
Germany, about a young girl who becomes hooked on heroin at the age of
fifteen and ultimately turns tricks to purchase it.  That movie had
genuine horror and a real sense of what it must be like to sell off
one's body and soul for drugs.  This movie doesn't have a clue.

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
CAPSULE: Dumb dud of an HK-clone action movie that isn't satirical enough to
be funny. Walberg's fine; the rest is not.
The more I think about this movie, the more I hate it. THE BIG HIT is a loud,
obnoxious, and doltish-supposed-to-be-funny attempt at a Hollywood Hong Kong
shootsploitation movie that falls smack on its face on nearly every count.
Kirk Wong is the latest director (after Tsui Hark) to be dragged kicking and
screaming into Hollywood. His first U.S. film, THE BIG HIT, plays like a cheap
clone: it looks and smells like it was made by people who had *seen* a couple
of HK action movies, but had no idea how to be *inspired* by one.
Mark Walberg is a hitman who works with his cohorts (Bokeem Woodbine and Lou
Diamond Philips, both wasted) in the employ of a boss figure (played nicely by
Avery Brooks, but with a little too much saliva around the corners of the
mouth). They get into improbably complicated shootouts that, while exciting,
have no more real intrinsic interest than a video game. Targets pop up, get
wasted, get replaced. Reload. The movie also cheats pretty blatantly: one
moment involving Wahlberg appearing as if by magic in an elevator had everyone
groaning.
Wahlberg is strapped, no thanks to one girlfriend who's a gold-digger and
another who's determined to marry him no matter what anyone else says,
including her parents. He goes along with a kidnapping that's supposed to rake
them in a ton of money. Only trouble is, the father of the girl they kidnapped
is dead broke (like we couldn't see that coming) and is also the god-daughter
of their own boss.
All of this is nothing but fodder, however. The movie is a dreary mess. Bokeem
Woodbine's character is distinguished from the rest of the crew by his foul
mouth and his compulsive masturbation. The father of the kidnappee threw all
his money into a movie called "Taste the Golden Spray". One of the plot
elements is an overdue copy of KING KONG LIVES. I am not leaving out very much
here, nor do I think I want to.
Hong Kong movies are very adept at mixing and matching genres and tones
without seeming like a compromise. I think part of that is because, at least
when we deal with a movie of this caliber, there's never a moment when we know
we're supposed to take it seriously. THE BIG HIT keeps attempting to enlist
our emotions in lots of stupid little ways, and then throws in more obnoxious
sight gags. Nobody made a decision early on about what kind of movie they
really were making. If it was a parody, then we didn't need the shapeless and
distasteful material about the future in-laws (a pair of snotty Jewish-parent
stereotypes). If it was serious, then they should have wiped the slate clean
and started from scratch.
THE BIG HIT is not even enjoyably ridiculous. It's the kind of movie you feel
bad for renting with your beer, because you could have bought that much beer
for the cost of the rental and had a better time. I suspect the only reason I
didn't downgrade this film's rating even further was because I'd be wasting
too much venom on it.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Specialist, The (1994)
CAPSULE: Not entertainment. A new form of slow torture.
Sometimes I wonder if I should be more faithless. I have a strange
wellspring of faith in me that tells me that Sylvester Stallone, with the
proper script and direction, would be great to watch. COPLAND went a long
way towards proving that. THE SPECIALIST, on the other hand, may very well
forever kill off what faith I did have.
Stallone plays a demolitions expert, formerly with "The Agency". In the
first scenes, he's been assigned to blow up a bridge in South America, the
better to kill a drug lord in a jeep. His associate (James Woods) and he
squabble when they learn there's a kid on board. The bridge blows up, a
fistfight ensues, and the scene ends so clumsily that it forgets to have
Stallone actually try and follow through on his promise to kill Woods.
Never mind. The flick has bigger fish to fry. It drags in (probably kicking
and screaming, although I bet they cut all that footage) Sharon Stone as a
woman with no apparent job or means of support who wants to pay Stallone
piles of money to blow slimy Eric Roberts into lots of itty bitty pieces.
Why? Because when she was young, she saw Roberts murder her father. Thus are
burning motivations born. Both actors look thoroughly Novocained. Given the
lines the/y are condemned to read, I suspect such treatment would have been
merciful.
Stallone and Stone spend most of the movie listening to recordings of each
other's voices. This doesn't just slow the movie down to a crawl; it makes
us shake our fists at the screen and scream, "Go meet somewhere and spare
us!"
THE SPECIALIST as a whole is an uninteresting succession of fights,
explosions, chases, sex-as-contact-sport, more explosions, and bombs with
convenient red LED timer displays. Nothing remotely surprising, interesting,
unique, or funny happens -- except for James Woods, who is always creepy and
over-the-top in everything he does. But aside from him, the film plays like
a catalog of everything that should be shot on sight in a movie.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
CAPSULE: A decent screenplay does matter.
The most depressing thing about GODZILLA, the over-touted Dean Devlin/Roland
Emmerich remake of the rubber-monster classic, is how little it exploits its
own resources. It's itching with possibilities that never get used. The
problem is, I have to review what's on the screen -- a noisy, witless, tame,
lame, underwritten story that bulks overlong and features disturbingly
inconsistent visuals. It's moderately entertaining, but God help you if you
start realizing how thin it is while it's still on screen.
The movie's opening credits are inventive, giving us lizard eggs that are
witnesses to various nuclear tests. But it doesn't develop that kind of
cleverness elsewhere: we get not one but two teams of trawlers dragged down
into the ocean, in sequences that are at first uninvolving and then
ultimately repetitive. Then there is the creature itself, which veers
between very convincing, sort of convincing, and ridiculously unconvincing
-- not just in terms of what it can or can't do, but in how it's presented.
The effects people also play dirty pool with parallax and perspective a lot:
when the thing needs to be closer, it's closer; when it needs to be a long
way off, poof! it's on the other side of town. Idiotic. (When it dives into
the Hudson, for instance, it makes a splash about the size of someone
throwing a van into the water.)
We don't have a lot to play with in the character department, either. Nick
Tatapulous (played by Matthew Broderick, who looks about as Greek as I do
Chinese) is a researcher into animal mutations caused by radioactive wastes,
and when we first see him he's jamming electrodes into contaminated
Chernobyl soil to get worms to come to the surface. Cute. He gets tapped on
the shoulder to help determine what's been causing all of these ships to
vanish, and puts the pieces together so quickly I can only assume he snuck a
peek at the script. Couldn't he have let the rest of the cast in on it, too?
Broderick is joined by a bevy of other actors -- most of them not given
anything substantial to do. Jean Reno is the best of the bunch, playing an
insurance investigator who has his own agenda. He is smart and canny and
resourceful, and we like him instinctively. His funniest, best moment has
him giving sticks of gum to a gaggle of fake Army troops to make them look
more "American", and we buy it. He deserves his own movie.
There's also Hank Azaria's cameraman character, Animal, who starts off
promisingly but winds up getting used merely for mugging and reaction shots;
more wasted potential. But the biggest waste is Michael Learner as Mayor
Ebert, in a role that serves no purpose except to slow the story down and
give a vehicle for the filmmakers to take cheap shots at two film critics
they don't like. The first time was funny; by the seventh or eighth, I was
too exhausted to wince.
I mentioned the worms and the chewing gum. Funny how the movie can cough up
neat little asides like that to flesh out what is basically a lame story --
in other words, at no time did anyone try to apply the same kind of manic
spirit to the movie AS A WHOLE. 
Why didn't we have the mayor, for instance, turn out to be a former head of
the transportation department who knows the subways intimately, which would
give him a reason to exist (and would give them something else to film other
than all those soldiers crawling around down there and acting like idiots)?
Why didn't they take Animal and the stupidly conceived female journalist
character and fuse them into a more interesting composite (since there's
nothing they do that couldn't be handled more economically and interestingly
by one full-fledged person)? Why didn't they make Godzilla's death(s) more
creative -- by having him, say, knock a building over onto himself and break
his own neck? I could go on, but you get the idea. And this was nothing but
stuff people were tossing out on the way home in the car.
For a two-hour-twenty-minute running time, they stretch and huff and puff
and find an incredible number of ways to justify the length. And in the end,
I asked myself if I'd had fun, and all I could think about was how the
massively expensive soundtrack had given me a toothache out of sheer volume.
FOOTNOTE: Over the closing credits, we get an industrial-rap remix of Led
Zeppelin's "Kashmir". Fitting irony, since Page and Plant's publishing
company was called, after all, Superhype.

Title
Review for Body of Evidence (1993)
For better or worse, the appearance of BASIC INSTINCT in the movie
marketplace gave the greenlight to a whole slew of overheated, oversexed,
underwritten thrillers. Apparently not having Joe Eszterhas as the writer
doesn't change a thing, since BODY OF EVIDENCE wasn't written by him, but
has a puzzling Eszterhas-ish presence all over it. In other words, it's a)
really dirty and b) really, really stupid.
Madonna (first warning sign) stars in BODY OF EVIDENCE as a woman who has
piles of money and no apparent job; she lives on a houseboat and likes to
parade around semi-naked, presumably for the edification of the shrimp.
She's been accused of having murdered an older man who was her lover.
Already two classic examples of Hollywood sexism are in effect -- the first
being that any woman in a movie cannot be sexual unless she's under thirty
(or at least looks it), and that they usually only exist for the sake of
studs or filthy rich older men. What's worse is that the movie confirms all
the above, and wallows in them as well. Madonna's character is accused of
forcing sex on the old goat when she knew darned well he had a heart
condition. (And yes, there are the obligatory cracks from the cops about
how at least he died happy. This movie leave no scummy stone unturned.)
Anyway. Willem Dafoe (very good but completely wasted) also stars as the
lawyer who is doomed to run afoul of Madonna's sexuality. How do we know
this? Because his character is set up with the Token Wife And Kids. How
obvious is it that he's gonna cheat on her and have to fess everything up?
And get kicked out of the house? And get welcomed back anyway? Don't skip
to the end yet; we're just getting warmed up.
Dafoe and Madonna have a lot of sex in this movie. Most of it is about as
erotic as open-heart surgery, since it involves such goodies as hot
candlewax (always the kink of choice among screenwriters who don't know the
first thing about *really* kinky sex) and smashed light bulbs. Don't ask. 
Another thing that people are starting to realize about explicit sex in
movies is that unless it is critically important to the story, it's
insanely dull. What's worse is that BODY OF EVIDENCE is dull *everywhere*,
not just in the sex scenes. The stuff in the courtroom is recycled
ninth-hand from other bad courtroom drama scenes. The thriller business
itself is ridiculous -- it involves nasal spray bottles and drugs, and
Juergen Prochnow as a surly doctor. And the ending -- another homage to
Eszterhas, maybe? -- is one of those endings where you can almost see the
exact *frame* where one of the five or six various endings to this mess was
spliced in.
The director is Uli Edel, all the more disappointing since he also directed
the elegiac and powerful LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN and CHRISTIANE F. Everyone
has to eat, I guess, but this isn't a meal ticket, it's leftovers.

Title
Review for Akira (1988)
CAPSULE: Quite possibly the best animated film ever made. A feast for, as
well as an attack on, the senses and the intellect.
Words don't convey the total and monolithic impact that AKIRA has on the
average viewer. With praise to Roger Ebert for the use of the term, it's an
out-of-body experience in the best possible way. It may also be the best
animated film yet produced.
On the factual level, AKIRA is an animated film that has been adapted from a
best-selling Japanese comic, or manga, by Otomo Katsuhiro. Otomo's comic ran
for several thousand pages and has been reprinted in several phonebook-sized
volumes, in both English and Japanese. With some condensation and sweat, it
has been rewritten (by Otomo and others) to fit into a
slightly-over-two-hour-long movie. The adaptation has worked in the vein of
all the best film adaptations: it stands apart from the original and
succeeds on its own merits.
AKIRA takes place in a Tokyo some decades into the future, after a holocaust
of some kind devastated the city. Wiping the map clean and rebuilding anew
has not helped anything: the city is a den of crime and foulness, with kids
running amuck on motorcycles and riots erupting periodically on
streetcorners. During a rumble, one of the gangs runs into a bizarre little
character -- a boy with the face and body of a wizened old man, and with an
expression of perpetual terror -- who is promptly whisked away by the
military. In the ensuing scuffle, one of the kids -- the "runt of the
litter", Tetsuo -- is injured and carted off. Kaneda, the gang leader and
Tetsuo's lifelong confidant, tries to piece together what's going on. He
finds a lot, which I am loathe to reveal here to avoid ruining the film's
many astonishing detours.
The film's dense plotting makes a second or even third viewing more or less
mandatory. Like BLADE RUNNER or NATURAL BORN KILLERS, the sensory overload
is so absolute the first time, it's almost impossible to take the story
directly: there's paranormal powers, government conspiracies, uprisings,
youth in revolt, and a titanic climax that takes place in a half-finished
Olympic stadium. It's almost too much, but on the other hand, *not* telling
a story like this with total sensory overload would have been criminal, and
the animation in the movie is technically unparalleled at showing us, in
synapse-snapping detail, the violent parameters of the world Kaneda and his
buddies are stuck in.
AKIRA is violent, and it's tempting to make obvious comparisons to Hong Kong
action movies, but it doesn't have the exhilarating and intimate
orchestration of a John Woo film. It works on a different level -- it's
armageddon. And it's also strong enough in its own right -- in the way it
deploys and tells its story -- that comparing it to an HK flick would be
redundant. What's also startling is how direct and visceral it is: five
minutes in, we're not responding to the movie as a bunch of painted cels.
We're inside it; it's an environment. Many people, myself included, find
themselves remembering some of the most striking moments not as animation
but as a kind of hyper-reality.
The fact that the movie is animated and not live action is a critical one.
TriStar at one point optioned the film and considered a live-action remake,
but that betrayed the whole point: the project would have cost an
unspeakable amount of money, and would not have had the same effect in some
ways. Animation is about showing us things that are made all the more
graphically theatrical by BEING animation. We're invited to let our own
imagination fuse with the imagination of the creators; it's more demanding
and in some ways more rewarding. As animation, the film is magical. As live
action, it would have been concrete and therefore ridiculous.
A lot of people have complained that AKIRA's biggest flaw is its thin (or
even inept) characterization. There's a case for that: the general, for
instance, is not required to do much more than grind his teeth and snarl,
and many of the supporting characters aren't given a lot to do. But the
details of Kaneda and Tetsuo's relationship are brought out excellently, in
both obvious and subtle ways -- and since this is the true heart of the
movie, it does a good job of carrying the rest of the movie's sometimes
heavy weight. What the movie does best of all is present an experience. The
last hour and a half of the movie are something like riding a motorcycle at
top speed along the crumbling rim of a volcano, staring down all the while,
feeling closer to the abyss than just about any other movie has been able to
bring us.
Watching AKIRA is fast becoming something akin to a rite of passage in some
circles -- an initiation into what the future might recognize as truly
classic from this era. A list of such things might include STAR WARS, BLADE
RUNNER, and maybe TITANIC. I'd submit AKIRA for that list as well, without
blinking.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
I seem to be in a minority of one, but Chris Tucker's outrageous mannerisms
are beginning to grow on me.  When he appeared in THE FIFTH ELEMENT as an
over-the-top radio DJ, my senses misfired: my brain wasn't properly able to
compute what I was seeing until I relaxed and had a good time.
The same thing applies to RUSH HOUR, a sprightly cop-buddy movie that works
by being cheerful and engaging instead of cruel and mean-spirited.  Don't
expect it to be an immortal piece of cinema, and you'll be fine.  It is also
the best of the Jackie Chan vehicles to be produced in English so far -- it
outstrips MR. NICE GUY by a fair margin, since that movie was little more
than a weak clothesline for various action pieces.  RUSH HOUR is funner and
more sustained, and puts Chan up against someone who is a terrific foil.
The plot is standard-issue.  A Chinese diplomat's daughter is kidnapped by a
gang of criminals.  The diplomat wants to enlist the help of Lee, an old cop
friend of his from pre-1998 Hong Kong days.  The FBI refuses to allow this,
so they have the LAPD send over one of their own to "distract" him.
Carter (Tucker) catches on fast to the sleazy runaround he's been given, and
tells Lee off: He doesn't want to babysit a cop; he wants to go out there
and find these slimeballs.  Funny thing is, Lee feels the same way, and
before you know it, they're up to their elbows in suspects and explosives.
All of this is, of course, sustained and interleaved with Tucker's wild-man
motormouthing (which gets funnier and funnier the more you watch it) and
Jackie's typically remarkable stuntwork.
What makes all of this stand out is primarily the tone and attitude.  Most
movies in this genre tend to be cold-blooded and unpleasant; this one's very
much a romp, with good timing and pacing, and a lot of good laughs.  I'm
betting Jackie himself is the main reason for that, since he's professed
repeatedly that he wants to make more family-oriented movies rather than
John Woo-style blast-fests.  Barely anyone gets shot, and most of the
martial-arts stunts are about timing, object juggling, or Three
Stooges-style slapstick.  (There is one stunt involving an antique vase
that's vintage Jackie -- although the way the stunt climaxes is a bit of a
cheat.)
There is also the byplay between Chan and Tucker, much of which seems
improvised (or at least minimally scripted).  At one point during a
stakeout, Edwin Starr's "War" comes on the radio, and Jackie attempts to
sing along -- only to have Tucker coach him on how to sing with soul.  In
turn, Jackie teaches Tucker how to do the snatch-the-other-guy's-gun trick
(and the payoff for THAT gag is a howl).
My main criterion for a comedy is simple: Did I laugh?  I walked into RUSH
HOUR in a terrible mood, and laughed all the way through.  I don't think you
can reasonably expect much more than that.

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
CAPSULE: The Even-Off Rule holds up once again; this is easily the best
"Trek" yet. Do not wait for video.
Ask any Star Trek devotee about the Even-Odd Rule of Trek Movies, and
you're likely to get one of the oddest bits of movie folklore this side of
the man who allegedly hanged himself on the set of "The Wizard of Oz".
The Even-Odd rule is simple: all of the odd-numbered Star Trek movies
stink, and the even-numbered ones are wicked cool. Think for a minute:
since when has anyone actually admitted to liking Star Trek: The Motionless
Picture? Or Trek 3, the Search for Cash? Trek 5 (about which the less said,
the better)? And wasn't the first Next Generation Trek movie a bit of a
letdown?
The reverse also seems to hold true: Treks II, IV and VI all hold up well
on repeat viewings -- not just as Trek movies, but as movies, period. My
personal votes go for Trek II -- and now Trek VIII, or "First Contact", as
the wags at Paramount have chosen to dub it.
If you didn't follow "Star Trek: The Next Generation" when it was on TV,
you may miss a few things, but the opening five minutes cover that
territory without too much trouble. That, and we get *easily* one of the
most amazing opening shots I've ever seen: basically, a pull-back shot that
starts at the near-microscopic level and ends up giving us a view of
something about the size of a small planet. It's something else.
The story settles into place quickly. The Borg, a monolithic race who fused
technology and biology milennia ago, are even more hellbent on assimilating
the Federation's space than ever. Not good. To that end, they've employed a
dastardly plot that ultimately involves time travel -- to say more would
spoil the fun -- and the crew of the Enterprise decide to defy orders and
follow them.
The movie quickly bifurcates into the familiar away team / up-on-the-ship
plot threads, although each one of them develop in totally different
directions. The ship becomes the center of a swarming Borg invasion
(something like "Die Hard" in space), and the away team find themselves
having to adapt to rather primitive surroundings (oh, and there's this
little problem with the locals...) I'm being deliberately vague to avoid
ruining a good many surprises -- not the least of which involves Data's
newly-installed emotion chip (you remember that, right?) and the Borg
queen. The less said about her, definitely the better.
(This movie may also settle some bets among Trek enthusiasts: "So what
would happen in a Borg and Data got into an arm-wrestling match?" Or a Borg
and Worf, for that matter? Watch and learn...)
The cast is in fine form. Memorable scenes include Deanna Troi (Marina
Sirtis) getting royally drunk on *real* alcohol for a change, and Data's
increasingly tense exvhanges with the Borg queen. The supporting actors are
also good. Alfre Woodard is especially well-used (her funniest line about
the Borg: "Sounds like they're Swedish..."), and she and Patrick Stewart
have one amazingly well-written and -played scene together near the end.
Jonathan Frakes, the actor who portrays William Riker in the series, was
given the helm this time. According to the press notes, he studied films
like "Blade Runner", "2001" and the earlier "Star Trek" films for notes an
inspiration. The homework paid off: this is easily the best of the "Trek"
movies, and a standalone triumph, too.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
CAPSULE: Winsomely entertaining SF farce with two great performances. Too
bad it's all empty calories.
There is never a question that MEN IN BLACK is supposed to be sly,
on-the-one, and tongue-in-cheek. It is. It's a comic book for the kind of
people who wouldn't be caught dead reading one, and for that reason I felt a
little bit let down by it.
The premise is simple enough: it's a spinning-together of every
alien-related urban myth out there, with the Men In Black as the principal
protagonists. They're a corps of elite super-secret agents who police alien
activity on Earth, in exchange for the destruction of their identities.
Agent K (Tommy Lee Jones) is trolling for a new partner, and finds one in a
wiseass New York cop (Will Smith). (This is the second time in a row Smith
gets to deck an alien; when does Jones get his next shot?)
There are moments where the movie works hilariously. Smith, alias J, wonders
what the heck is up when he's asked to come into MIB HQ for an "entrance
exam"; the way the scene plays out is a mini-masterpiece of comedic set-ups
and payoffs, especially the shooting gallery. But then the movie starts to
take its flimsy plot seriously -- too seriously, as when it tries to get an
abhorrent amount of mileage out of a gigantic CGI cockroach.
This is undeniably amusing, but the funniest stuff in the movie seems to be
tucked away in the corners and crevices. Take, for instance, the whole bit
where the agents read the tabloid papers to get their latest scoops. That
begs a question all by itself: if the freakin' tabloids get this
information, then how come the MIBs have to hole up in their high-tech
headquarters and beg for scraps? That's only one example of how the movie
doesn't quite carry its thinking through to merciless and potentially
hilarious extremes. Instead we get a plot about a stolen galaxy (yes, a
stolen galaxy) that any member of the audience can figure out if they pay
attention. And there are several effects stuntpieces (like an alien
childbirth scene that ends exactly the way you'd expect, with the alien baby
urping up tons of luminescent goo all over Will Smith) that go on and on
until the joke is played painfully out. One of the surest signs that
cinematic comedy is dying is when every joke is allowed to run too much of a
course.
Yes, the movie is fun. Specifically, the actors are fun. Tommy Lee Jones, as
Agent K, fits into the role beautifully -- a lot more snugly than one of the
aliens in the movie trying to wear a corpse as a kind of disguse. Smith is
sidesplitting even in the tiniest moments; there's a bit where he totally
misinterprets everything a morgue doctor (Linda Fiorentino, also good) says.
But somehow it's all tell and no show. I went in expecting a good time, and
I got one, but I also got the sense they'd missed about twice as many
opportunities as they'd exploited.
I mentioned at the start of the review that this felt like a comic book for
the kind of people who wouldn't be caught dead reading one. If the folks who
made this think they were having the last word in weird and goofy, then they
should read SAM AND MAX.
LOCATION FOOTNOTE: This is the only movie set in New York where I've seen a
foot-chase begin near Grand Central Station and end, seconds later, at the
Guggenheim.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
CAPSULE: Godawful "comedy" that's amazingly shabby and cut-rate, and rather
bereft of laughs.
I was having a bad week in my life when I saw AUSTIN POWERS:INTERNATIONAL
MAN OF MYSTERY. I desperately needed something to cheer me up, or at least
distract me so I could get a clear head. Get some perspective. Even dumb
movies can do that for me, sometimes.
I tried hard not to let my dejection affect my judgment, but I am certain
now that AUSTIN POWERS would have also sucked rocks through bamboo shoots on
the day I won the lottery. Michael Myers has taken a character that would
barely have supported a five-minute sketch on SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE and
stretched it to the length of a feature film, padding it out with toilet
jokes and the sort of
props-strategically-positioned-between-naked-actors-and-camera gags that
Benny Hill got tired of fifteen years ago.
The plot, what little there is of it: Back in the Swinging Mod Hep Sixties
(I don't think I'm doing a disservice to the movie's attempted early look
and feel by describing it that way), sexy British secret agent Austin Powers
tangled with his nemesis Dr. Evil. Evil launched himself into orbit and
cryogenically forze himself to return decades later, when Powers was out of
the picture. Powers also had himself frozen, and he wakes up to find the
Nineties a very hard time to deal with.
The basic gag, that of Powers' total inability to cope with the Nineties, is
not so much exhausted during the course of the movie as never even really
dealt with. The bulk of the movie is taken up with dumb jokes of several
basic rubrics: James Bond gags (of which this movie has no end, right down
to the silly character names), inept slapstick, toilet humor, and
strategically placed props... The movie's amazingly bereft of ideas, come to
think of it, with a couple of bright exceptions. One is Dr. Evil's son --
there is a sidesplitting scene where father and son go to an encounter
group, chaired by Carrie Fisher -- and the other is a throwaway gag where
Austin mimics various forms of transportation from behind a couch (it's a
visual gag -- hard to describe, and hard to recommend seeing the movie for).
A lot of Sixties kitsch has been resurrected and thrown on the screen for
this movie, but it's desperate rather than clever. Instead of skewering the
whole thing, it's a rather bloodless and unfunny tribute. Myers himself is
also desperate: he's given an idea to play, not a character. Plus, the
attempts to make the character work by giving him a relationship with
another sexy (albeit "Nineties") agent are a waste of time. I wanted to have
the movie end with him trying yet again to get it on with her, only to have
her deck him one. With a couple of exceptions, the movie misses all of its
own best moments.
The movie even looks cheesy, and not in a good way: I kept wondering if it
had been transferred down from Hi-Def video or something, so grainy was the
film stock in a good many scenes. The whole thing has the air of being done
on the cheap.
My definition of comedy is simply: Did it make me laugh? The few times that
I laughed in AUSTIN POWERS were completely offset by the time I spent
cringing and wanting out. The most damning thing I could say about the movie
is that Wayne and Garth would most likely have shoved it into Mike Tyson's
shorts and sent it sailing.

Title
Review for Money Train (1995)
CAPSULE: An insult. A stupid and incompetent movie that doesn't even have
the benefit of being trashily enjoyable. Weslely and Woody would do well to
leave this off their resumes.
MONEY TRAIN is one of the worst movies I have ever seen. It's not simply
idiotic, it's contemptuous of its audience. It tries to make us swallow
things that a better movie would be stopped cold by or just plain omit
entirely. It's a waste of Wesley Snipes and Woody Harrelson, who are
enjoyable actors in their own rights but are nauseating here. It's not even
fun as trash.
Woody and Wesley star (maybe that's not the right word) as New York City
Transit Authority police. They have a job which could actually be the core
of a really interesting movie: one of them plays drunk possum to attract
chain-snatchers and the other does lookout. I had a whole headful of legal
and ethical questions surrounding this, raised by a documentary I'd seen on
the subject once, but the movie does not waste any time with being
intelligent or thought-provoking.
See if you can follow this. They chase a kid down the tunnel and into the
station where the "money train", the heavily armored car that picks up all
the cash from the token books, is parked. The guards on the train see this
kid running at them, lift their MACHINE GUNS, shout "Halt!" and then open
fire when the kid doesn't stop running at them. Blam, the kid's dead. Then
Woody and Wesley show up, and of course the other TA cops hate them (why?),
and a pushing match starts, and someone gets decked, and... I covered my
face. I'd seen enough. I've never seen a movie work so hard and in so little
time to destroy, systematically, any chance of being credible or
interesting.
Fed up with the BS at their job (most of it their own goddamned fault),
Woody and Wesley hatch this plot about how to rob the money train. Hence the
title, in case some of you (all two of you) didn't figure it out yet. Then
there's this subplot about a maniac who torches token book clerks, *and* a
love story, *and* a holdup -- no, two holdups, sorry, easy to lose track in
a movie this braindead -- *and* a mob boss who wants his money. There wasn't
a minute when I gave a horse's ass about any of it.
Neither Woody nor Wesley play characters that are interesting for a single
minute. We do not care about them. They are not interesting. They are noisy,
loud, stupid, foolish jerks who whould have flunked out of the police
academy. They deserve to get shot -- or run over, as the case may be. They
only exist to rehash the kind of dynamics that was *written* into a movie
like WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP, and which simply does not exist here. They are
idiots, and we're expected to root for them. Bullcrap.
The movie is completely schizophrenic in its tone and texture. What exactly
is this mess? A cop movie? Police procedure is not given a moment's genuine
thought anywhere. A thriller? The subplot with the Token Booth Killer is
inept, a throwaway that should have been ditched in the rewrite. A comedy?
The few jokes that do work are wasted. A drama? All dramatic tension between
both principals is freeze-dried and off-the-rack. There's not a moment in
the movie where I felt like I was listening to genuine human beings talk;
it's all Screenwriterese, that bizarre analect where every sentence ends in
a punchline and the primary mode of expression is the unique conjunctions of
four-letter words. (Actual dialogue excerpt: "Fuck you." "What?" "You heard
me: Fuck *you*." "No: FUCK *YOU*!")
Look. I'll be honest here. I've tried writing screenplays, and even *I*
suspect that if I tried to pitch this mess, I'd get laughed out of the
office. Anyone interested in hearing my ideas for a few good movies can
write me and hear my pitch, because God knows I know I can do better. I've
weasted enough time on this piece of tripe.

Title
Review for Phantom, The (1996)
CAPSULE: Combine one quart of RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, a dash of a Jackie
Chan movie (sans Jackie), two teaspoons of gun- and swordplay, and a dollop
of CGI. Simmer for 100 minutes. Yields: Zilch.
THE PHANTOM is a depressing and tired retread of so many earlier, better
movies that after the fifteen-minute mark I started cataloguing them out
loud. It's hard to make a good action-adventure movie that doesn't simply
recycle its predecessors, and I've seen movies that even at least did the
recycling gracefully. THE PHANTOM, allegedly based on the long-running
comic of the same name, doesn't even bother to be graceful. It's a stupid
and incompetent movie in too many ways to list, but I'll try.
The film opens up with a "prelude" sequence that looks like it was slashed
to ribbons in the editing and then given a Heavy Voice-Over to compensate
for whatever got thrown out. We go from there to a jungle sequence that, I
swear to God, recycles the truck-chase scene from RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK
note-for-note, possibly even shot-for-shot, right down to the moment where
Indy wrenched open the door and slung one of the drivers out into the brush
-- AND THEN GOES ON TO RIP OFF THE ROPE-BRIDGE SCENE FROM "SORCERER" AS
WELL! SORCERER, as you may well remember, was a remake of a French movie,
THE WAGES OF FEAR, in which a bunch of lowlifes were paid piles of money to
drive a truck loaded with nitro through horrible jungle terrain. Both
versions of that movie were far more interesting than this flick, but I've
got my job to do, so back to the salt mines we go.
Anyway, the cinematic theft doesn't stop there. Or at least the lack of
inspiration. There isn't a single thing here we haven't seen, and it's not
given to us in a way that remotely evokes our interest. We have (where's my
list?) a Bad Girl, a Tough Good Girl, a Secret Cave Hideaway (which seems
inspired more by DR. NO than anything else), a Boardroom Meeting That Drips
With Greed and Venality, Magical Artifacts of Terrible Power, and
Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa wasted in another stupid role where he gets to wear a
Fu Manchu mustache and sneer a lot and generally humiliate himself.
What else is there? The plot is a waste of time. The sets alternate between
big but hokey -- and tiny and still hokey. There are lines in the script
that are just begging to be MST3Ked -- and I'm sure once Mike and the 'Bots
get the cash, they'll stick it on their sked.
The only thing in the movie worth noting is Billy Zane -- he's a good
actor, and he tries very hard, even when the script is sending him down one
dead alley of a scene after another. All I can say is that I pray this
isn't the beginning of the end for him -- although it sure looks like the
final nail in the coffin for the comic-book super-hero movie.

Title
Review for Jacob's Ladder (1990)
JACOB'S LADDER is a horror film in the purest sense of the word: it
horrifies us, not just with what we see, but with what we come to
understand about what we see. Most horror films are about death, or more
recently, the giving and receiving of violent pain. LADDER is about life
*and* death, which is what sets it so far above almost every other horror
movie ever made. It drains the viewer dry, emotionally and viscerally, but
does it with real feeling and technical virtuosity.
Tim Robbins plays a young man named Jacob Singer, and we learn about his
life in quick, hard flashes. He was married once and had a child, but then
was sent to Vietnam and had some unspeakable experiences there that
crippled him in spirit. Now, back in the States, he works in New York City
at the post office and has a girlfriend (Elizabeth Pena, in a very good and
very difficult role).
Jacob is obviously intelligent and gifted, but his psychic scars from the
war (where he obviously did not belong) are ripping open on him. ("After
'Nam I didn't want to think," he says.) He's seeing demonic creatures in
broad daylight. Maybe he's suffering from post-traumatic stress flashbacks.
Or drug-induced hallucinations. All he knows is that he's scared.
Things get even odder. One of his former war buddies dies in what seems to
be a car-bombing, but not before dropping hints that perhaps the bunch of
them were guinea pigs for some kind of experimental drug in 'Nam. And then
things become even more horrific. He remembers being wounded in the war and
getting on a medevac copter, but... 
>From about the 40-minute mark on out, the movie stakes out territory that I
have not seen any other movie attempt successfully -- at least not to the
level of emotional purity that this movie does. We are not passively
observing Jacob Singer's mental breakdown (if indeed that's what's
happening): we're sharing it. Jacob's state of mind is the real theme of
the movie, and it's reflected in the nervous editing rhythm that takes over
in some of the scenes. Sometimes we're not totally sure how we got from one
scene to the next -- there are several flashbacks to his earlier family
life that don't make sense the first time we see them but that disentangle
themselves later -- but we never feel like the movie doesn't know what's
going on.
Tim Robbins is never less than excellent in showing us Jacob, a man whose
intelligence is not going to provide him with an answer to anything he
sees. The real answer is in his feelings. Also, I mentioned Elizabeth Pena
has a tough job to do in this movie, perhaps no less difficult than
Robbins'. She plays a smart, rather headstrong character who only has a
limited amount of patience, but plenty of love, and there are some scenes
where she has to walk a fine line between being selfish and being
blunt-nosed. Danny Aiello also has an interesting supporting role, as a
gentle chiropracter, who offers an occasional word of advice to Jacob.
So much of the movie cannot be discussed here without ruining it, because
up until the very end we are given one way of interpreting what we see. And
then the final scene arrives and changes *everything*, and provokes a very
uncomfortable question: What is all of life, anyway, but perhaps a kind of
desperate squirming in the face of a dead universe? And how do the dead
know that they *are* dead? The final shot, the more you think about it, may
even open more doors than it closes. JACOB'S LADDER may very well be the
first real thinking man's horror movie.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Why is this movie three hours long? Because it's too stupid
to know when to stop.
THE POSTMAN may be the single dumbest movie I've ever seen. Not the
worst -- I still leave that accolade to be divided between STARSHIP
TROOPERS and MONEY TRAIN -- but by far the dumbest. It takes a
situation that had plenty of possibilities, which are all better
examined in the David Brin novel that THE POSTMAN has been sensessly
cannibalized from, and turns them into an idiot's delight. People
should be able to buy insulin along with their popcorn for this one,
it's so saccharine and treacly.
Not too far into the future, America has been ravaged by a war which
has shattered civilization. The exact details of this war are
conveniently omitted -- I imagine they felt "it wasn't important", or
some other such lame writer's left-handed excuse. Omitting critical
detail is not the same thing as creative restraint, and in this movie
they add up to glaring empty places in the story.
Wandering through the shattered landscape (snore) is a man with no
name (double snore) who comes across the uniform and truck of a dead
mailman. He's used to sleazing his way from one end of hell to the
other, so he puts on the uniform (hey, it's in pretty good shape for a
guy who's been dead at LEAST a decade!) and tries to scam whatever
little pockets of civilization are left into offering him shelter, by
pretending to be a letter carrier for the "Restored United States of
America".
We are supposed to believe that the movie is about how this drifted
inspires people by his "example". Wrong: the movie is not about
anything, because it's too busy drowning in jackass cliches and
godawful writing to ever manage a Statement of Purpose. It's one part
Western, one part MAD MAX and one part Hollywood self-congratulatory
sentimentalism, none of which works. It's also an ass- (and bladder-)
breaking three hours. TITANIC, in comparison, felt half as long
because it was so watchable and so swift on its feet. THE POSTMAN is a
lumbering, boneheaded wreck of a movie that doens't know when to lie
down and give up.
The silliness is just unstoppable. One painfully unfunny scene has
Costner's character trying to do Shakespeare from memory (and we
learn, over and over and over again, that he can't do it without cue
cards). Another one has him doing his letter-carrying rounds on
horseback, shot in such agonizing slow motion that we want to shout
instructions at the projectionist. Maybe when this is released on tape
and in a deluxe CAV letterboxed collector's edition laserdisc set (as
it inevitably will be), we can thumb the fast-forward and make up for
Costner's hamhandedness in the director's chair.
Monty Python once had a recurring character they named D.P. Gumby, an
utter dimwit who approached everything from brain surgery to flower
arranging with granite-jawed seriousness. Watching THE POSTMAN, I felt
many associations could be drawn between Mr. Gumby and Kevin Costner
as a filmmaker. Costner is just so ploddingly, heart-rendingly,
goddamned *earnest* in this movie -- both as an actor and as the
creative mind behind it -- that he fails to notice he's making a
complete and utter fool of himself.

Title
Review for Cool World (1992)
CAPSULE: Wretched, supposedly fanciful combination of animation and live
action that puts a fat nail in Ralph Bakshi's career coffin.
COOL WORLD was stalled and then re-started when ROGER RABBIT took theaters by
storm. Based on what's on screen, it should have remained stalled. It's a
haphazardly-assembled movie that nobody thought very much about,
except in how it would look. And even there they didn't do much thinking.
Brad Pitt (called Frank Harris) opens the movie, shortly after "the war".
After coming home, he rides on a motorcycle with his mother, gets into an
accident, and somehow manages to breach a path into a parallel dimension
called, none too surprisingly, Cool World. The inhabitants are cartoons,
called Doodles -- although based on the mouth/dialog mismatch, I suspect they
were originally called Toons before the ADR people decided to avoid trouble.
Flash-forward. Jack Deebs (Gabriel Byrne) is a comic-book creator who's about
to get out of prison. We learn though various incompetently-placed bits and
pieces of exposition that he landed there when he murdered the guy who was
duking his wife, although like a lot of things in this movie, that kind of
behavior is not shown to really be a part of his personality. It's just sort
of dropped in. But Deebs has bigger problems: he keep sliding back and forth
between reality and the world of his comics, which is, of course, Cool World.
And then one day he lands there for keeps, and is instantly hit upon by
sexbomb Doodle Holli Would ("realized" by Kim Basinger, who has gone on to
prove that she is, in fact, a very capable actress).
COOL WORLD tries to set up the "rules" about its universe and falls flat on
its face. For instance, Doodles and humans are never supposed to have sex, for
reasons that are never made clear. Worse, the consequences of such intercourse
are depicted later in the movie, but they're so confusing and nonsensical that
we don't even care.
The movie's look is frantic and inconsistent. Bakshi's animation has never
been long on clarity, and COOL WORLD looks like a hashish-crazed version of
those Jack Davis cartoons in MAD, where grotty-looking maniacs all chase each
other around the room. The art direction, staging, 'tweening, and everything
else are pitched so hard and so far over the top that it's impossible to FOCUS
on anything. There is less imagination at work here than
anthologizing. Everything looks bizarre for the sake of being bizarre, and the
"ironic" contrasts (the little fluffy bunnies, etc.) are just witless.
The live-action backdrops also don't look credible. Bakshi, in an interview,
lovingly described how the sets were created by simply projecting cels of
animation onto them and then having the builders paint using the projections
as guidelines. The results aren't like a cartoon come to life; they look like
a very bad set for a school play. One of the walls vibrates disturbingly when
Pitt throws Byrne against it.
The story shows the signs of a script, and a movie, that were hacked to shreds
and then pieced back together on the editing table. An interesting way to find
out about tampering is to read the comic-book tie-ins or novelizations of
movies: you frequently see a lot of material that existed in the shooting
script, provided to the artists or writers of the tie-ins, but never made it
to the screen. COOL WORLD's tie-ins not only have a totally different ending,
but show the fingerprints of meddling all the way through. At no point, I
guess, did anyone take a look at his story and decide it simply wasn't enough
-- that there needed to be a clear line of logic from beginning to end, that
the characters had to be motivated by other things than passing whims, and
that we get more out of the movie than a juicy headache.
Ralph Bakshi seems to have been an artifact of a very particular time. His
earlier movies, like HEAVY TRAFFIC and STREET FIGHT, were inconsistent, but
also funny and nasty in hallucinatory ways. Then he tried to create more
upscale work, like the spastic WIZARDS and the over-touted LORD OF THE RINGS
productions. Now this. He hasn't done anything since, has he?
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Suspiria (1977)
CAPSULE: Ranks with HALLOWEEN and PSYCHO as one of the most viscerally
terrifying pieces of moviemaking ever. An artful and visually sumptuous
scare.
For all of his other shortcomings, Dario Argento has made some of the
best-looking horror movies in existence. And some of the most mortifying.
SUSPIRIA is the creme de la creme of his career, a *really* scary story
that will give even sophisticated audiences a good jolt.
Jessica Harper stars as Susie Banyon, a ballet student who has gone to a
special conservatory in Austria to study dance. The movie sets her up
quickly and efficiently: she's not a genius, but she has a kind of taciturn
stubborness about her that's endearing, and will help see her through the
more ghastly moments in the movie. The night she arrives, it's raining and
thundering (of course), and she blunders into a student who's running out
of the conservatory. She half-hears her shout out something, but it's lost
in the wind. The next night that girl is murdered horribly, in a scene
which had many of the seasoned horror fans around me raking the fabric off
of the couch arms. (The brawny arms of the killer, by the way, are the
director's -- a consistent visual device of his which he refuses to discuss
in interviews. Hmm.)
At the conservatory, Harper is instantly surrounded by all manner of
eldritch characters. Some are a lot less innocent than others, of course,
and the way Harper pieces together what's *really* going on behind the
walls (literally) is ingenious. I will not reveal the deeper aspects of the
plot, even though it's not too difficult to figure out. It's the tone and
mood of the movie that matters more in this case, both of which are superb.
Be warned that SUSPIRA delivers some incredibly gruesome moments. One scene
has one of the girls falling into a pit of barbed wire and being slashed
horribly -- and then having her throat slit as she's trying to climb out.
Another scene features an unbelievable number of maggots coming through the
walls and ceiling. (The last one is especially memorable because the
explanation turns out to be relatively mundane!)
Technically, the film is excellent. This is a beautiful movie -- the screen
fills with bright, garish colors (mostly red, of course), and the set
design is eccentric and striking. I watched the uncut US laserdisc edition
from Image, which is now regrettably out of print, but is letterboxed and
features the full-length version of the movie plus two trailers. If you can
find the uncut edition, watch it in lieu of all others. On an empty
stomach.

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Entertaining if *really* ridiculous action-adventure epic from
French bad-boy director Luc Besson. Expensive, and it shows, but couldn't
they also have spent some money on a solid story, too?
There are so many good *individual* things in THE FIFTH ELEMENT, Luc
Besson's gargantuan adventure-fantasy epic, that it's easy to overlook how
they don't neccesarily add up to a good movie. On the plus side of the
balance sheet, we have action, adventure, and some of the most
lavish-looking scenes ever put on film. On the minus side, a silly story. A
very silly story.
In the abstract, ELEMENT is great fun. It moves fast and always has
something worth looking at, and for people who enjoy such things from movies
(I know I do), it's very enjoyable. But there are limits. The movie has been
(unfairly) compared to BLADE RUNNER, which is one of the few really profound
SF movies out there. ELEMENT is mostly a loud action movie with some SF
trappings -- and one of the most sumptuous visual styles yet put on screen.
The mega-cities are big, but they looked a little more like really big
*sets* than actual environments. Maybe that's deliberate, since the movie
wears its ambitions to be entertaining pretty plainly.
The movie opens at the turn of the 20th century, with some aliens dropping
in on an archaeological dig (Luke Perry gets a few cute moments as a junior
archaeologist that Indy Jones would probably want to deck). Much mystical
mumbo-jumbo is exchanged. Flash-forward to 300 years from now, when former
military man Korben Dallas (Bruce Willis, being his usual self), now a
cabdriver, becomes the unwitting rescuer of Leeloo, a genetically engineered
superbeing that is the fulfillment of a cosmic prophecy. The rest of the
plot involves securing four stones that can help Leeloo complete her mission
of saving the world against a gigantic evil thing that resembles a sentient
star.
I mentioned that this was an adventure fantasy. ELEMENT is only SF by
accident; it uses the trappings of SF to dress up a basically silly story.
But just because it's a silly story doesn't mean a fun time can't be had.
The movie has an incredible amount of confidence in itself, even when giving
us scenes that are ridiculous in the extreme.
Most surprising is Milla Jovovitch as Leeloo. She's given the interesting
job of playing a character who can't communicate directly with anyone (at
first), and she succeeds in making Leeloo a sympathetic and truly *alien*
character. There is also a touch of philosophy in her character: What's the
point of saving a race that is only hellbent on its own destruction anyway?
I wish some of this stuff had been explored further in the movie, but that's
not where the movie's agenda really lies. Also good is Gary Oldman, who
holds himself slightly more in check here than he did in Besson's THE
PROFESSIONAL (where his tics and mannerisms threatened to destroy every
scene he was in).
ELEMENT is bound to be enshrined in the college fratboy SF hall of fame. It
wants to entertain and be fairly bizarre. It succeeds in both respects.
Watch it in a theater with a good sound system, and check your brain at the
door. Sometimes, though, I wish mindless fun didn't have to cost so much.

Title
Review for Ariel (1988)
CAPSULE: A deeply cynical and yet gaspingly funny movie about going so far
down on the food chain that you come out on the top again.
ARIEL, by the longtime Finnish director Aki Kaurismaki, is not quite like
anything I've ever seen. That's good, because in a world where movies are
becoming increasingly noisy, interchangeable and dull, seeing something like
ARIEL is like drinking Evian after a twenty-year diet of flat Pepsi.
Turo Pajala, a skinny-faced actor who has this way of almost daring us to
care about him, plays Taisto Kasurinen, a coal miner whose job has just
evaorated. Finland is switching from coal to nuclear power, and so his job
has come rather abruptly to an end. His drinking buddy gives him the keys to
his Cadillac (worth its weight in gold in that country), then backs up into
the men's room and puts a bullet into his head. Taisto's reaction is more or
less worrying about where the hell he's going to park the damned thing.
Everything in life is an imposition, and the movie walks us through that
frame of mind, one fuck-up at a time.
Taisto gets screwed about sixty percent of the time. He drives south to look
for a job and gets mugged; he can't get anything together. His life takes a
turn for the better when he meets a meter maid and her young son, and the
three of them form something like a family, but even then Taisto has
trouble. Eventually, he hatches a scheme to steal tons of money and split
for the States, and he manages to get away with it -- sort of -- but by that
time the movie has already made itself clear: No matter what you do, you get
shafted somehow.
What's amazing about the movie is that as bitter and cynical as it is, it's
also a pleasure to watch unfold. Nothing in the movie is dictated by idiotic
Hollywod plotting standards -- we're not in this to find out if the heist
goes off as planned (they spill the cash on the sidewalk, for God's sake!),
but rather what we learn about human behavior along the way. Kaurismaki
understands how people really talk to each other, and how they pretend to
listen -- the conversations in this movie are unleavened with sitcom
pseudo-speak, and are not interested in the slick stratagems of go-getters.
They just want to get through the day without having the sky fall on their
head. What Taisto slowly figures out, it seems, is that he's hardly alone in
getting screwed, even though it sure feels like it.
ARIEL, then, is about people who have their head bowed down by life. They're
not interested in saving the day, or even seizing it. They are trying to
bail out of the whole damn cycle, because it's done nothing but take
advantage of them. Kaurismaki is the only moviemaker I know who's willing to
take people like that and make them his characters -- and on that basis
alone, I intend to find as many of his movies as I can.

Title
Review for Moonstruck (1987)
What a beautiful thing it is to be in love. And what a royal pain in the
ass. MOONSTRUCK knows this, and is entertaining all the more because it is a
slyly knowing romantic comedy, a wicked one, even. It knows about love --
why we fall in love, why we resist love, and why we make ourselves into
complete fricking idiots over love. Mostly the last bit.
Cher (who is great in this) stars as a woman who has already loved and lost;
she's in her thirties, and that's enough time, apparently, for her to have
been married and widowed. Has her heart been scarred for life? Maybe. She
meets and gets engaged to a fellow named Johnny Cammareri (the
always-enjoyable Danny Aiello), but the whole thing has the flavor of an
afterthought. Then she bumps into Johnny's bitter and distant brother,
played by Nicholas Cage, and lightning strikes.
She's not the only one. Her mother (Olympia Dukakis) meets up with Perry
(John Mahoney), a professor who's been pulling the
female-students-find-mature-intelligent-men-sooo-sexy routine for a little
too long, and he finds himself drawn to this woman who's competely against
"type" for him. Opposites attracting, and all that. Cher's father
(hilariously played by Vincent Gardenia) is also a moon-eyed romantic in his
own way -- and his way happens to be played out via adultery, with a woman
so dry and cynical, it's like he had an affair to have another woman to
kvetch with.
The movie works by combining clockwork plotting with careful and intelligent
pieces of human comedy. One of the best scenes in the movie has Cage's
character unveiling the source of his bitterness: his brother caused him to
accidentally lose a hand in a bread slicer (he now has a wooden
replacement), and now he's submerged himself in bread-baking almost as a
kind of pathological self-penitence. "Bread, bread, bread," he shouts,
throwing loaves from one end of the room to the other, "the 'staff of life'.
For everyone except me." Cher is uncompromising: "You think you're the only
one who ever shed a tear?" She doesn't know it yet, and neither does he, but
the fact that the two of them can be so confrontational with each other is
the key to them being happy together.
What's best about the movie is the total feeling of the package -- it's a
date movie, to be sure, one that pairs up all the right couples in the end
and leaves you smiling. What's even better is that the smiles it earns from
you are endearing and real. A common cliche about reviewing a movie like
this is "See it with someone you love", and in this case I can't escape
making a recommendation like that.

Title
Review for Tetsuo II: Body Hammer (1992)
CAPSULE: Supercalifragilisticbiomechanoidism.
The original TETUSO: THE IRON MAN, made for about the cost of the opening
credits of many, many far less successful movies, was a 67-minute blitzkrieg
on the senses that became a deserved cult staple, both here and in its
native Japan. The director, a gentleman named Shinya Tsukamoto who will
probably not be receiving much babysitting work, has gone ahead and created
a follow-up, in spirit more than in form. It doesn't have the total
advantage of novelty, but it has searing images in abundance, and a very
strange story indeed -- a slightly more coherent one that its predecessor,
if that's an inducement.
As with the last film, Tomoro Taguchi stars as a meek "salaryman", except
this fellow has a wife and child, and they have what appears to be as normal
an existence as could be asked for from modern-day Japan... except the
camerawork as they eat is just a little bit creepy. Then their son is
kidnapped by a gang of thugs, and his rage somehow makes him mutate into a
kind of human gun, wreaking (unwanted?) havoc every-which-way. That's as
much of the plot as bears up under a synposis; the rest is one blast of
images after another. (One slightly astonishing item: the remarkable sets
were all "found"; nothing was constructed for the sake of the movie.)
Is this a horror movie or a piece of SF? With the blurring of the lines
between the two (thanks to some good movies like ALIEN and some dreadful
ones like HELLRAISER: BLOODLINE), it's safe just to call it a gut-level
experience. There are many moments where it doesn't make sense, but we never
get the feeling it was *supposed* to. It's quite a ride, and it leaves you
wrung out and raw-eyed, the way it should. As far as more coherency to the
story goes, there's a detour about 2/3 of the way through to explain a major
character's actions, but it should be regarded more for the sake of color
than plot: What's most fascinating about TETSUO and BODY HAMMER is not why
any of this is happening, but what everyone does because of it.
Three out of four body-cannon-electrode-probe-thingies.syegul@ix.netcom.com                                       EFNet IRC: GinRei
http://www.io.com/~syegul                          another worldly device...
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth
UNMUTUAL: A Digital Art Collective - E-mail syegul@ix.netcom.com for details
=smilin' in your face, all the time wanna take your place, the BACKSTABBERS=

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
"The Apostle" is one of the very few American movies I know of that is not
only about religion but seems to be informed by the very spirit of what it
studies. It doesn't make its subjects into easy, hypocritical targets or
strawmen.  Many people do believe in God without being the kind of
Bible-clutching psychotic characters that Hollywood loves to indulge in.  The
movie, which was written and directed by Robert Duvall as a labor of love,
does not indulge in such easy cliches.
Duvall's Euliss Dewey, or "Sonny" as he's known -- the apostle of the title
-- isn't just a man who talks to God.  He has out-and-out shouting matchines
with Him.  One of the early scenes of "The Apostle" has him pacing in his
room like a prisoner in solitary, bellowing at God, begging Him to let him
have his wife and children and ministry back.  His wife, you see, has been
cheating on him with another man, a youth minister, and she's now using
underhanded tactics to get Sonny voted out of the church.  Then the phone
rings and Sonny's mother answers, telling the angry neighbor on the other end
of the line that Sonny's been talking to God ever since he was a boy, and she
sees no reason to tell him to stop now.  And she hangs up with a gentle smile
on her face and goes back to sleep.
There's some symmetry here with an earlier scene, where Sonny and his mother
stop at the scene of a roadside accident.  Sonny pokes his head in the
driver's- side window of a car where a young man lies bleeding, and gently
asks him if he's ready to accept Jesus as his savior.  The man agrees.        In
any other movie this would be farce, caricature, borderline bad taste.        But
the way it's seen and played and directed here tells us, gently, that
everyone involved, from the victim to the cop who comes to shoo Sonny away,
takes this seriously.
Sonny is a charismatic Pentecostal preacher who tours and shouts and whips up
his congregations into jubilation.  He's fond of wild metaphors: "Tonight
we're going to short-circuit the Devil!  We're going to plug into a power
line that's wired straight into the Pearly Gates!"  But his marriage is
troubled, and his wife (a neurasthenic Farrah Fawcett) fears something in
him.  We get a hint of what that might be one day when Sonny confronts the
youth minister one day during a softball game and smashes him over the head
with a bat.
Sonny flees, heads to another state down South, and changes his name to "the
Apostle E.F.".        In one of the best scenes in the movie, he ingratiates
himself with a black man who lets him sleep in a pup tent on his property. 
One of that man's friends is a retired preacher, and E.F. hooks up with him
to start a small congregation of his own.
The congregation is tiny, but E.F. gets it going with sheer sweat -- working
odd jobs at the local garage (one of the mechanics dotes on him), getting
promoted on the local FM station ("We have a pay-before-you-preach policy
here," the program director informs him, having been stiffed too many times
before), and putting together Thanksgiving baskets for the poorer families.
He's redeeming himself -- not just in the eyes of the characters, but in OUR
eyes as well, because at first we're not really sure if he's just putting on a
good front of change, or is really changing.
Then other things start to happen, so casually we barely notice them creeping
up on us.  E.F. has a showdown with an almost compulsively angry bully (Billy
Bob Thornton) that does not end in the way we would anticipate.  E.F.'s family
back at home starts to ask about him.  And then there is the matter of the
youth preacher, for which E.F. will eventually have to answer.
The film is shot in a quasidocumentary style that feels almost like
eavesdropping.        No one reaches for affect or "acts".  The actors are all
unknowns, aside from Duvall himself, playing the preacher as though born to
the role, Fawcett, and Miranda Richardson as the radio station secretary. 
Because of this, we don't see a bunch of "Jesus freaks"; we just see people
with a deep and abiding faith that gives them a genuine community and
togetherness.  The whole film feels alive and spontaneous; it isn't just
another plot out of the Hollywood shrink-wrap factory.
Duvall's movie works on almost too many levels to list.  It's spiritual
without being smarmy or cloying; it's an affecting character study (E.F. is
far from being one-sided); it's great fun.  It only seems appropriate, in
today's climate, that he would have had no choice but to make the movie
himself.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Texas Chain Saw Massacre, The (1974)
Seeing THE TEXAS CHAIN SAW MASSACRE, twenty-five years later, is like
ripping open the sarcophagus from which come ALL modern horror movies.  And
MASSACRE, which is now available once again in an excellent remastered
laserdisc and DVD edition, STILL scares the Shinola out of even today's
jaded audiences.
MASSACRE eschews plot and character development in terms of as much a pure
sensory experience as can be put on film.  After reports of graverobbing and
necrophilic mutilation, a group of young people head out to see if any of
their departed grandparents were among the ones desecrated.  Along the way,
they pick up a deranged hitchhiker -- he doesn't last long with them after
slicing himself open with a razor and laughing -- and wind up being forced
to stop for gas.  Then they make the mistake of wandering over to a nearby
house... and to say any further than that, of course, would be sacrilege.
See it for yourself.
Though the story has been ripped off by so many other horror movies that to
run through it seems a cliche.  But amazingly, when you experience the
original for the first time, all of that just vanishes.  The original blows
everything else even remotely like it so far off the screen, it's
astonishing.  The imitators can get the words, but not the music.
Surprisingly, MASSACRE is not that gory a movie.  Gore is not frightening,
and this is where most modern horror movies trip up: they're not really out
to scare anyone, but rather MORTIFY them.  What's genuinely frightening
about MASSACRE is the setup as much as the payoff, the atmosphere and the
primal dread of the goings-on, and the sense that whatever we are seeing
now, there are far, far worse things lingering offscreen.
Like NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD and HALLOWEEN -- two other genuinely horrific
films -- it is shot in a flat, spare, almost documentary-style fashion, but
at the same time is breathtaking to look at.  The shots of the house steeped
in the orange sunset, or the roomful of bones, have a raw beauty that no
other movie like it has been able to imitate.  On a nickle-and-dime budget,
they achieved what movies costing a hundred times as much can't even come
close to.
If the movie has a flaw, it's that it ends so abruptly.  It needed a third
act, another round of happenings, to make what came before seem more
complete.  But what it does achieve is astonishing.
Horror movies today, for the most part, aren't frightening.  They're too sly
and knowing to have any real elemental dread in their veins.  Something like
MASSACRE serves as a reminder of what movies like SCREAM or even FRIDAY THE
13TH were attempting to tap into.

Title
Review for Ngo hai sui (1998)
Jackie Chan may not make the best films, but there's no question that he makes
some of the most entertaining and audience-friendly ones.  "It's not Bach," a
friend once said, "but it is at least Offenbach."
"Who Am I?", a Hong Kong production which was released direct-to-video
through Columbia TriStar, is very much in the same vein as "Rumble in the
Bronx".  Its plot is mostly a clothesline on which Jackie hangs as many
stunts, visual gags, bits of derring-do, slapstick, and everything else that
isn't hammered down.
And what of the plot, you ask?  Jackie plays a member of a secret military
platoon who're deployed to get their hands on a meteorite fragment that can be
used as an energy source.  The platoon is betrayed from within, and Jackie
takes a chuteless nosedive from his helicopter.  He wakes up, sans memory, in
the care of a jungle tribe.  "Who am I?" he cries out, and the running
(Homeric?) gag of the movie is that Whoami becomes his name.  (The tribe, BTW,
is depicted with a surprising amount of sensitivity and intelligence given the
movie's pedigree.  They've got T-shirts and binoculars, and understand that
Jackie fell out of a crashed copter, not some Great Metal Sky-Bird.)
The movie actually gets a lot less mileage out of Jackie's memory loss as a
plot device, but it gets a lot of mileage regardless.  Jackie saves a
motorcross driver from snakebite (driving the ATV over the finish line
himself); gets mixed up with a journalist who wants to write about his story;
wrecks a Mitsubishi sports car; winds up in the Netherlands, throwing wooden
shoes at the bad guys; and gets into a rooftop fight with two astonishingly
brutal savate' fighters.  The usual stuff, but it's served up with a good
sense of fun and a fast-moving camera.
And of course, we get to see Jackie's end-of-movie outtakes.  It wouldn't be a
Jackie Chan film without at least one shot of him on the stretcher -- although
this time around, we get to *hear* outtakes as well, from the studio sessions
where Jackie sang the title tune.  And as a singer, Jackie's mostly a pretty
good stuntman.  Like the man says: not Bach, I guess, but certainly Offenbach.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Sgt. Kabukiman N.Y.P.D. (1990)
CAPSULE: Another great piece of nonsense from the masters of enjoyably bad
moviemaking.
Troma are the best bad filmmakers in the world. They're totally aware of
their purpose in life, and they embrace it with a vehemence and a glee that
other schlock-makers can't even come near. Actually, most Troma films are
not nearly as bad (unwatchable, stupidly conceived, boring) as many
high-ticket Hollywood movies, and that's the secret of their charm. They're
always entertaining, if ridiculous. I saw SGT. KABUKIMAN in a week where I'd
suffered through an unbelievable amount of forgettable and uncompelling
big-ticket junk movies -- some of them bad but most of them just plain dull.
KABUKIMAN was by far the best of the bunch -- a funny, sustained,
surprisingly witty movie with a ton of good lines.
The plot is typically Troma-weird: an NYPD detective, name of Harry
Griswold, gets involved in a massacre during a Kabuki performance and gets
the power of one of the dying players transferred to him. Now he can
transform himself into Kabukiman, with a wild hairdo and outfit, and who can
sling sushi and chopsticks to stop foes in their tracks. Really.
All of this is, of course, utterly idiotic, and done with grubby low-budget
production qualities that make the movie all the more fun. It's also
well-sustained. The movie doesn't simply pick one schtick and slog through
it, but has fun coming up with bizarre tangents to the story (like when
Griswold tries to transform into Kabukiman and... uh... comes up with
something else), and plays out its elements well. The movie finds a tone and
sticks with it, which is not easy to do: most of the other movies I saw that
week were hopelessly confused as to whether they were taking themselves
seriously or not. KABUKIMAN knows, and wallows happily in it. Better to be
an honest schlock movie than a confused or dishonest serious movie, any day
of the week.syegul@ix.netcom.com                                       EFNet IRC: GinRei
[new email address coming soon]                                  ICQ: 934998
http://www.io.com/~syegul                          another worldly device...
NEW WEB SITE: http://cablehouse.dyn.ml.org      ...and the mandate of heaven
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth

Title
Review for Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song (1971)
CAPSULE: Earthy, experimental, difficult, shockingly frank (even for
1997!), and ultimately refreshing story of a black man on the run from the
cops.
The first few minutes of SWEET SWEETBACK'S BAAD ASSSSS SONG (yes, I checked
-- that's the correct number of Ss) are without dialogue, just eerie
montages of sounds. A young boy, obviously malnourished, is taken in and
fed up by several loving mother-surrogate figures. Then one of them takes
the boy to bed for a sexual initation (underneath the title credits) that's
far more confrontatory and shocking than any ten BASIC INSTINCTs --
probably because it has the directness and clumsiness of real life,
something we're not used to seeing on screen. This is one tough movie to
swallow, no matter who you are, but that probably reflects more on how
pallid and unchallenging movies have gotten lately. (I suspect the sex
scenes in movies like EL TOPO and SALO would probably melt the synapses of
most modern audiences.)
The plot is simple but not simpleminded. Sweetback, hassled by two white
cops who are apparently just looking for an excuse to beat up on a black
man, breaks his bonds and runs like hell. Along the way he moves through a
good many of the kinds of environments that we are only just now being seen
in a more serious light in the movies -- or at all, for that matter: the
slums, the missions, the ghetto. In other, lesser, movies, Sweetback would
be machine-gunning everything in sight and the end credits would roll over
a pile of bodies; in this one, we get taken on a kind of a tour of the
depressing and anarchic world that Sweetback takes for granted.
SSBAS first appeared in 1971 and was promptly rated X ("by an all-white
jury", as director Melvin Van Peebles crowed in his legendary ad
campaigns), and it's hardly surprising why. There's a good deal of sex in
the movie, but it's handled in a way that's unsettlingly frank -- a
frankness that spills over into the rest of the movie. In one scene,
Sweetback visits a friend's house in the hope of getting sanctuary there,
and the other man chats him up while on the toilet. We're not used to
coming this close to people in real life, let alone in the movies --
especially not people who are not made out to be glamorous.
The movie is also full of experimental stylistics that are relatively
unused today, but probably because of that seem curiously fresh and new in
Van Peebles' hands. One scene, in which a man is interrogated by the cops,
is loaded full of menacing energy as they fire off a gun inches from his
ears, and suggest his deafness through a cleverly edited soundtrack.
Another note: SSBAS is not so much anti-white (that would be too easy) as
anti-authority, and as the movie goes on to demonstrate, authority exists
in many forms -- governments, churches, and even the paranoid inside of
one's own mind. SSBAS is ultimately about thirsting for freedom -- and it
looks like we could use a little more of that in our movie diet, God knows.

Title
Review for Swiri (1999)
"Swiri" broke all box-office records in its native South Korea when 
it was released, outgrossing even "Titanic".  Its US$2.2M budget made 
it the most expensive Korean movie yet (with a good chunk of the 
money put up by Samsung, whose logos feature predominantly 
throughout).  Maybe it's not surprising that the movie in question 
was created in blatant imitation of the slick Hollywood products it 
would be forced to compete with in Korean theaters.
What we have here is pretty much a Korean take on the 
Simpson/Bruckheimer formula: a fast-moving thrill machine with slick 
visuals, tons of action, and a certain amount of sentiment (in this 
case, a 'cross-the-border love story).  It works as entertainment, 
and people who've never seen a Korean movie in their lives will be 
able to dive right in.  But it's resoundingly hollow.
The first few scenes are shatteringly violent, showing North Korean 
prisoners being used as training dummies in a sickening covert-ops 
exercise.  One of the spies is Hee, a North Korean female 
sharpshooter who's being sent South to perform assassinations.  (The 
movie misses a bet by not having her leave a calling card at every 
killing, but I guess they figured even that would have been 
excessive.)  The hero is Won, a South Korean special agent who's been 
on the tail of Hee for quite some time.  He suspects a leak in his 
department when one of their contacts is gunned down in front of 
them, and stumbles into a plot that (MacGuffin time!) involves a 
special chemical bomb that can level city blocks.
The movie wastes no time in deciding if it's going to be a political 
thriller or a shoot-em-up -- we get a token amount of pontificating 
and introspection about the North and South, and then gobs of 
gunplay.  There is also time for a romance between two major characters, all
the pieces of which are out of the standard kit of movie love stories.  We
do get an explanation of the cryptic title, though -- although it's less
than edifying, and more than a little maudlin.
And for a movie that comes from completely outside Hollywood, it's funny how
many of the cliches are here. True to form, any movie that mentions a bomb
and that does not provide at least one building being blown up is cheating
us, and we do in fact get exactly that (although it would be criminal of me
to see which one or when).  We also get the handy Aquarium Rule (thank you,
Roger Ebert), which dictates that any movie with aquariums in it is going to
have them shot to pieces.  Speaking of visual cliches, if I see one more
shot of a door being kicked  open by a bunch of guys with flashlights
strapped to their guns, I'll puke.  We get that three times here.
I liked "Swiri" without ever really getting involved in it.  It's a 
well-made exercise; it looks and sounds as good as anything Hollywood 
ever put out.  If it were released here in a dubbed edition, it might 
do fairly well.  In fact, director Kang Jae-gyu has hinted that was 
exactly his aim.  But it's a little saddening how unadventurous it 
really is.  Korea has managed to produce one of the best, most 
thoughtful films of all time ("Why Has Bodhi-Dharma Left for the 
East?"); with "Swiri", it's clear they can make big entertainment 
machines as well.  Here's hoping they keep it on an even keel.

Title
Review for Macross Plus (1994) (V)
CAPSULE: Gives "Akira" a run for its money, and makes more sense. Gorgeous
to look at, and more than a little heart-tugging, too.
The excellent "Ghost in the Shell" hinted at what combining computer
graphics with conventional cel animation could do. "Macross Plus", an anime
series distributed in four 40-minute installments by Manga Video, ups the
ante even further.
This is quite simply the most astonishing-looking animated series I've
seen. It's also a hell of a story, lest we forget that the visuals are not
going to make it alone (which was the single biggest problem with
"Memories" -- stunning images and very shallow storytelling).
Set in the same universe as the other Macross stories (although seeing them
is not a prerequisite), the story revolves around three characters: Isamu
Dyson, a reckless but incredibly skilled pilot whose antics have gotten him
reassigned to a test pilot gig on his homeworld, Eden. Most other pilots
would veer shuddering from the opportunity, but Dyson gobbles it up, not
even blinking when he hears that the other folks who flew the transforming
fighter he's going to be testing didn't last more than a week.
Another plane is being tested in the same program -- a sleek monster that
is straight out of the Clint Eastwood movie "Firefox": the pilot operates
it with mental commands. And as it turn out, an old rival of Dyson's, Guld
Goa Bowman -- an alien halfbreed -- is the pilot. The two are snarling down
each other's necklines almost instantly.
Also on Eden is Myung Fang Lone, a former singer-turned-producer who is now
manager of the galaxy's most popular singer, Sharon Apple. Myung was
romantically involved with both men at one point, but something terrible
happened between all three of them at some point (the single weakness in
the movie's story is the use of the Gradually Expanding Flashback to reveal
this detail), and now tension rides high.
The plot twists come on quick and strong. First, Sharon Apple is a
computer, whose music-making is guided by Myung's thoughts in exactly the
same fashion that Bowman pilots his craft. No one outside of the inner
circle of Myung and her producer know this -- and there's even more to it
than that. Much more. And then there's the *third* plane being tested in
the project, about which the less said the better.
What's amazing is that with all of this hardware, the story is never less
than absorbing on the human level. The characters are all very strongly
delineated and draw us into their world without seeming to try very hard;
the voice-acting is also several notches lower than the usual anime
histronics, thank goodness. A spectacular score, second only to "Memories"
and "Akira", accompanies all the action, and is available on two CDs -- and
includes several songs allegedly by Sharon Apple which in my opinion have
the potential to chart. They are that good.
The ending is astonishing in its emotional impact. I will not reveal it
here. All I can say is that the last thirty minutes of the movie find the
perfect metaphors -- story, visual, conceptual, technical, what have you --
to get the point across brilliantly. "Macross Plus" deserves to share shelf
space with "Akira", or any of the Miyazaki films, as one of the best
examples of how animation can transcend its boundaries.

Title
Review for North (1994)
CAPSULE: MONEY TRAIN now has company on my list of worst movies of all time.
I am having trouble putting my total contempt for NORTH into words. NORTH is
easily one of the worst movies ever made by a major studio, and what's worse,
it was made by a filmmaker I normally respect -- Rob Reiner, who gave us
SPINAL TAP and THE PRINCESS BRIDE, two of my perennial favorites, among the
many other excellent movies he's made. Now he gives us this... thing, which I
suppose was intended to be a comedy in another, better world. In this one,
it's a bag of garbage.
NORTH alleges to be the story of a young boy by the same name, who lives with
his well-off but uncommunicative parents. The movie doesn't even bother to
properly establish the lack of communication between child and parents: it
dives right into a wretched scene at the dinner table where North (Elijah
Wood) fakes a heart attack as a way of getting attention. Yuk, yuk, yuk. His
father, a clothing inspector, makes the first of several dreadful cracks
involving too-tight garments, none of which bear repeating here.
It gets much worse. After North decides that he has to divorce his parents
(in itself the subject of the terrifically funny IRRECONCILABLE DIFFERENCES,
but worthless here), they go into comas and have to be wheeled into the
courtroom on pallets. Yuk, yuk, yuk. North then heads off on a worldwide
quest for better parents. Because of the publicity involved in his case, he
gets lots of offers from various countries.
What happens next is a flabbergastingly shameless series of on-screen
humiliations by dozens of actors, all of which play prospective parents from
different locales. We get Dan Aykroyd as a Texan, Kathy Bates as an Eskimo,
just to name two -- all of which are painted as such mindless caricatures
that they don't even work as being *deliberately* hokey. It's a double
insult: not only are the images of, say, the chainsmoking Frenchmen laughing
like nitrous-oxide-crazed hyenas with the Eiffel Tower looming over them not
funny, but they're not even interesting. One especially odious scene, which
the filmmakers had the temerity to include in a trailer for the film, had
North backing out of joining an Amish community, retreating into his airplane
and laughing, "I think I left my butter churner in the overhead compartment."
Yuk, yuk, yuk.
Oh, yeah. Wandering through this horrible mess is another character in
various guises, played by Bruce Willis (who must have been real short on cash
the week he agreed to be in this movie). Was there a clause in the contracts
that required every actor to be humiliated beyond redemption?
I watched NORTH in appalled silence, waiting all the way through past the end
credits for some sort of gag to be sprung on me. I kept waiting for the movie
to turn itself inside-out, for some kind of meta-joke to start unspooling and
make the whole wretched mess worthwhile. It never did. It really WAS that
bad. With this and SPECIES II, I'm on a roll for the week.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for JFK (1991)
CAPSULE: A technical marvel, but an intellectual muddle, and ever so
pretentious. Oliver Stone's take on who really killed JFK is compulsively
watchable even if indigestible as history.
When I watch a movie that is based, however loosely, on fact, I try to keep
"the facts" out of my mind and just watch the movie. With a movie as
voluminous and fraught with controversy as JFK, this is darned near
impossible, but I think I've managed to keep my feelings about the film in
the abstract, and the service that the film has been put to.
In the space of three hours, JFK covers an astonishing amount of
information and territory, and presents it in a package that is superbly
edited and filmed. It keeps up involved and keeps us tense. What it does
not do is provide us with much in the way of real characters, or a story
that is not simply a mining of miscellaneous conspiracy theories that,
especially after the publication of books like Gerald Posner's CASE CLOSED,
pretty hard to defend.
Oliver Stone, the director, has chosen to follow the odd saga of Louisiana
district attorney Jim Garrison, who got curious about the assassination
after the fact and attempted to prosecute a Louisiana businessman, Clay
Shaw, for conspiring to kill JFK. In real life, Garrison's ethics and
scruples were questionable to say the least, and the story makes for some
eye-opening reading. Stone doesn't hesitate a second to whitewash Garrison:
the first time we see him, he's wearing a white shirt, and backlit to give
him an angelic glow.
Many of the important details about who Garrison talked to, and when, and
under what circumstances, are distorted or omitted entirely. What does come
across is a sense of urgency and *grand mal* paranoia that few other movies
have managed to match. Even if Garrison is dead wrong -- heck, even if
*Stone* is dead wrong -- we can still sense what they must have been going
through. The rush of names, places, footage styles, all contribute to the
general feelig of truth held over. Even if the feeling is a propagandistic
one, the fact that the movie works as well as it does can't be denied.
I had an argument with someone after coming out of the movie -- that JFK
should be screened along with Leni Rienfenstahl's TRIUMPH OF THE WILL as a
pair of perfect examples of film propaganda. The other man was appalled
that I would dare to lump an obvious Nazi sympathizer in with someone as
liberally inclined as JFK. I don't remember the conversation getting much
further than that, unfortunately.

Title
Review for Seconds (1966)
CAPSULE: Paranoid, bleak, hopeless and devastating. Also damn near perfect.
Frankenheimer's "ultimate nose job" movie is now back out on laserdisc,
better-looking than ever, and, if anything, even more terrifying and
relevant than ever before.
SECONDS is, next to JACOB'S LADDER, JOHNNY GOT HIS GUN and M, one of the
most emotionally devastating movies ever made. That is also precisely what
it aims for. Like any good movie, it tells a strong story, populates it with
believable characters, and gets under our skin. And brother, does this one
ever get under the skin.
This film was directed by John Frankenheimer, whose most legendary film was
THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, long unavailable no thanks to Frank Sinatra's
objection to that movie's political overtones. SECONDS was also out of
circulation for a long time, mostly because of its incredibly painful
subject matter. But now it has been reissued in a gorgeous laserdisc
edition, with restored footage and a pristine audio track, all the better to
hear Jerry Goldsmith's incredibly intimidating organ-and-orchestra score.
SECONDS opens with Arthur Hamilton (John Randolph), a worn-out businessman
who takes the train from his job in the bank every day. His relationship
with his wife is perfunctory and tired; he doesn't even know his daughter
anymore. He has about twenty years left to live and nothing to do in them.
He receives a call from a friend he thought long-dead -- an invitation to
participate in a clandestine, nameless organization that specializes in
giving people a second chance. First they fake your death, in the manner of
your choosing, and then with surgery, therapy and some careful social
engieering, they give you, literally, a new life. Hamilton wants to think it
over. Then the organization blackmails him, and in he goes.
With a good deal of work, Hamilton is remade into Antiochus Wilson (Rock
Hudson), an artist. Hamilton doesn't know anything about painting, but they
contrive things to allow him to grow into his new life. Unfortunately, it
doesn't work out like that, and soon Hamilton/Wilson is in desperate
struggle with his new captors.
This was one of Hudson's most ignored roles, and it's a good one: he does a
great job of suggesting a transition between the burned-out Hamilton and the
refurbished Wilson. The camerawork, a collaboration between the director and
James Wong Howe, is fearful, kind of over-the-shoulder. Even the innocent
scenes look disturbing, like the walls are ready to fly apart any second.
The cumulative effect is exhausting and overpowering: by the movie's
horrifying climax, we're wrung out. There's almost nothing in the movie
that's out of place or that breaks the flow. The events unfold with the
inevitability of death.
SECONDS is not an easy film to take, especially if you're in the trap that
Hamilton himself is in. Or even if you just think you are. I foresee coming
back to this movie in twenty years, much the same way I came back to LA
DOLCE VITA or BLADE RUNNER, and seeing something new. Maybe also something
even more horribly seductive. I hope I don't.

Title
Review for M. Butterfly (1993)
CAPSULE: A strange, off-center treatment of a very odd footnote to history
that works about half the time.
David Cronenberg is capable of making a bad movie, but never quite capable
of making a boring one. M. BUTTERFLY is a good substantiation of that
theory, a consistently interesting, watchable and tasteful, but not quite
successful, movie about one of the oddest love affairs ever recorded. Read
no further if you would rather discover more on your own.
Rene (Jeremy Irons) is a French diplomat assigned to China in the mid-60s.
He is unsure of himself and his position, and doesn't consider his ignorance
of the culture a handicap. Then he meets Song Liling, a Chinese opera singer
-- they have a great bit of dialogue over her choice of "Madame Butterfly"
as her aria of choice at a government function -- and an erotic fascination
he didn't even know exist is stirred up for this woman. Except that she's
not a woman, but ... a man. She is, however, a very good caricature of a
woman -- a contrivance created by a man, designed to work as a spy.
The movie makes a great deal about the fact that even the two of them in a
room, pouring tea for each other, is dangerous. "Everything I do has
implications," Song whispers. In fact, the movie makes everything they do so
top-heavy with implications that it often forgets there's a story to tell.
It gives us many of the more explicit details of how Song concealed her
biology from her lover, but they only make Rene's self-delusion seem even
odder. For instance, based on what we see, Song only allows Rene to have
anal sex with him -- but then announces that she's pregnant. Rene is
overjoyed instead of perplexed. Surely he can't be that ignorant? No, but
maybe he can be that self-deluded. But...
Well, if the movie's intention is to show how deeply Rene's self-delusion
runs, it doesn't quite manage it. It shows him being promoted at his job and
using many of Song's own half-baked aphorisms as some kind of insight into
the "Eastern mind", or something -- and then when he loses his job and goes
back to Paris, continuing his self-deception when Song manages to secure a
visa to Paris as a cultural exchange student (a development I found strange
in the light of the fact that the last time we saw her, she was in a
re-education camp). And when he denounces the man over the illusion at the
end, it's stilted and unconvincing.
Jeremy Irons is the perfect actor for the role of Rene, but he has been
mishandled somehow. He's only really proper in the beginning, as the meek
accountant who doesn't know what he's getting into, but when he swoons over
Song, he becomes strangely hammy. There's no real sense that he's got a
passion for this woman; he looks like he's acting, even as an actor.
John Lone as Song gives us a very credible woman for most of the movie, but
she's got a weird acerbicness, a self-deprecation at the core of the
character that we have to ascribe to self-hatred of some kind, because the
movie never gives us any other real explanation.
M. BUTTERFLY, as I said before, is not a bad movie. But there are too many
ways it fails to make it a good one. We get lots of background information
about China at the time, including a few functional details about the
Cultural Revolution, but not enough real insight into how a man like Rene
could deceive himself. There's a couple of canned speeches at the end of the
movie about how Rene loved the illusion more than any reality, but they
stand out like broken fingers, not attached to anything.
In the end we're left with a technically excellent, and watchable, but not
very satisfying curiosity. Cronenberg has always specialized in a kind of
clinical detachment in his movies, even when the most ghastly subject matter
is in focus. Sometimes this works (DEAD RINGERS, CRASH), and sometimes, like
in M. BUTTERFLY, it keeps us from getting any real subjective insight. Okay,
he loved the fantasy more than the reality -- but why? I guess the answer
will require a more daring movie.

Title
Review for Escape from L.A. (1996)
CAPSULE: A giddy, wild sci-fi farce that keys in on a ROBOCOP-style view of
the future and contains more laughs than you might expect.
The original ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK was a halfway-serious futuristic thriller
that turned Manhattan Island into a giant maximum security prison, and then
dumped the President of the United States into it. To rescue him, we had
one-eyed Snake Plissken (Kurt Russell, who up until then had a roster
mostly of Disney movies), and the combination of fairly unique ingredients
made the movie a long-standing pulp-SF-and-fratboy favorite.
ESCAPE FROM L.A. is not simply a sequel, but a sly self-parody that has
endless fun inverting the same conventions it seems born to exploit. There
are some scenes that are just impossible to take straight: how about Peter
Fonda teaching Snake how to catch a tube in what looks like the
post-apocalypse version of Big Sur? Or a basketball game to the death? Or a
plastic surgery clinic filled with Beverly Hills zombies?
The plot is the thinnest of excuses onto which to graft one weirdly
hilarious sequence after another. The President (a far-right lunatic)
drafts Plissken for a mission: rescue his daughter, who's absconded with
the control block for a doomsday device. She's hijacked Air Force Three and
sent it screaming right into the heart of L.A. -- which in this world, has
not only been forcibly seperated from the rest of the country by an
earthquake, but is a dumping ground for "undesirables" (i.e., anyone who
would look even slightly out of place in a Norman Rockwell painting). You
have the choice of deportation or electrocution at the border. They also
have a nifty little coercion for Snake: a fast-breeding disease that will
kill him in eight hours unless he gets back to them with the goods. Nice of
them to think of everything.
We're in overdrive right from the start. Snake is jammed into a one-man sub
and shot at L.A., and skims across all manner of submerged and trashed
landmarks. If you live in the area, you're guaranteed a few laughs at
seeing your least favorite eyesores in ruins. (The biggest eyesore of all
is at the very end of the movie, along with a line of dialogue that will
convulse all comers. I am not ruining that one.)
EFLA is almost like a slightly bigger-budgeted version of the kinds of SF
movies that used to come out more often, like REPO MAN and ANDROID. While
EFLA isn't nearly as much of a real cult item as the former or as
emotionally involving as the latter, it's nice to see that John Carpenter
still has a good soupcon of the anarchist/indie-producer spirit in him. The
last scene in the movie should be a clear indication of that -- it leaves
us wide open for endless possibilities. Like, say, ESCAPE FROM PLANET
EARTH. Heh heh heh.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
"Wretched" is the word to describe "Virus", a film so patently bad that I
damn near felt an affection for it.  It's hard to make a good movie, but to
make a movie that's a failure on every single imaginable level is, in some
ways, tougher.        It's very difficult to get this many people, all at once, to
abdicate any of quality work.
"Virus" plays like a rip-off of both "Deep Rising", another terrible movie
from last year, and any of the "Star Trek" episodes that feature the Borg. 
It starts off with some kind of space cloud "infecting" a Russian orbital
station and using the station's antenna to send some kind of computer virus
to a communications ship in the ocean below.  The virus appears to want to
take over humanity, or something, but its methodologies and M.O.s are never
clear.
Anyway, the aforementioned ship gets discovered by a tug crewed by Kit Foster
(Jamie Lee Curtis) and Steve Baker (William Baldwin).  The tug's captain
(Donald Sutherland, doing one of his wacko roles) wants to claim the ship for
salvage, but it isn't long before they discover Something's Not Right Here.
The ship's steering itself, for starters.  In such circumstances, the
characters are advised to find the screenwriter and beat him to death for the
crime of rampant laziness and unoriginality.
It gets worse.        The virus manages to build robot incarnations of itself and
use those to transform the crew members into things that look like rejected
test reels for the Cenobites from "Hellraiser".  The master creature is
laughingly reminiscent of a Pop Art junk sculpture, and looks about as
threatening.  It drills through bulkheads and barks out idiotic pulp-movie
dialogue in a voice that sounds like my car's "Your door is ajar" warning on
very bad drugs.
According to the movie's press kit, the movie was drawn from a Dark Horse
comic series with the same name.  Dark Horse is a comic imprint that
specializes in strong, compelling stories.  My guess is that they
liposuctioned the story out of the comic before filming it.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
CAPSULE: Miles better than the lackluster GOLDENEYE, but oh what a tangled
plot they weave when they recreate TV. Entertainment by proxy?
Advance posters for MISSION:IMPOSSIBLE showed Tom Cruise's hawklike profile
with the words EXPECT THE IMPOSSIBLE. I was all set to expect the
impossible: a smart, engaging thriller from the Hollywood TV recycle bin.
They got it halfway right. M:I is a thriller, and it is occasionally smart,
but it's more confusing then engaging and bears an in-name-only resemblance
to the TV show it was cribbed from.
The TV show, for those of us who were still a twinkle in Dad's eye when it
aired, featured a gang of top-secret government agents who go on one mission
of derring-do after another. It was another of TV's many attempts to cash in
on the James Bond franchise and also echoed the greater sense of trust
people had in institutions of "law and order" in those days. The M:I movie
seems to have been dragged into the '90s without much real thought as to how
faintly absurd it seems now. In fact, in one scene, there's a TV interview
with a Senator who expresses grave doubts over just what the government is
doing with its "black operations" funds. In the '60s, Mr. Phelps would
probably have walked in and set the man straight with a We're Trying To Keep
Your Country Safe speech. In the '90s, the audience was ready to chime in
with "You said it, brother!"
Suffice to say the material feels dated from the git-go. How has it been
re-worked? The usual Hollywood Hi-Tech Injection has been applied to the
movie: explosions, guns, chases, violence, gadgets, gizmos, and totally
inaccurate and absurd uses of computers and the Internet abound in this
movie. There isn't a moment where anything that's happening is remotely
plausible, but it's filmed well, and paced nicely -- even if half of what we
see is an invitation to guffaw in contempt.
What about Tom Cruise? Tom Cruise is an excellent actor and he turns in fine
work here, but the basic idea of the story was never about an Angry Young
Rebel. The original IMF people were team players. The movie turns quickly
into a Cruise solo vehicle and does away with the "problem" of team dynamics
by having the rest of Cruise's team killed off quickly. A-ha.
I mentioned guffawing in contempt. See if you can follow this -- if you're
reading this message, there's a good chance you're Net-literate. Early in
the movie, Cruise's character sends email to someone named "John@3:14".
What's wrong with *this* picture? Or what about the CIA computer room which
has every kind of detector EXCEPT a motion sensor. Why? Because if there WAS
a motion sensor in the room, there would be no reason to break in and give
us a flashy scene of Cruise hanging by wires and hacking into a mainframe
upside-down. I'm not even going to try to criticize the final chase, which
breaks the laws of physics at an insane rate and ultimately turns into a
kind of exhibition house for many of director Brian de Palma's favorite
fetishes.
So what have we got here? A loud, overly complicated, flashy,
not-very-interesting movie that has all the lasting strength of a caffeine
jolt, and had me giggling in all the wrong places.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
I had this stupid little smile on my face during the opening scenes of URBAN
LEGEND.  I thought back, fondly, to CANDYMAN, an intensely disturbing little
movie that took the idea of urban legends and invested it with a grand and
primordial dread.  The only dread I felt during URBAN LEGEND was the fear
that my watch had stopped.
Okay, maybe I'm being too cruel.  URBAN LEGEND was obviously put together,
post-haste, to cash in on the success of movies like SCREAM and I KNOW WHAT
YOU DID LAST SUMMER -- a movie where teenagers and proto-twenty-somethings
get sucked into various horrible happenings, but maintain the ability to
spit out ironic one-liners and wisecracks.  LEGEND is competent and amusing,
and gory without being excessive, but barely worth more than a glance when
it comes on cable TV.  We've seen it all before, better.
This time around, the premise is that various students on a college campus
are being stalked by a nutcase whose methods of dispatching his victims are
patterned after various urban legends.  There's the Man With The Axe In The
Backseat, the Microwave Death, and so on.  About all that's missing is the
Death By Broiling In A Tanning Salon and the Choking Doberman -- and if you
don't know about those, go ask the guy who writes "The Straight Dope".
Once the movie gets rolling, though, there's not much to look forward to
beyond the unmasking of the killer.  But along the way there are some cute
stops.  Robert Englund (the voice and face of "Freddy Krueger" from the
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET movies) plays a professor on campus who runs a class
on urban legends, and one of his hallmarks is that the camera never just
seems to SHOW him.  We'll see a bunch of students in a hallway or something,
and then the camera will slam-pan to the side with a ZOINK! of horror-movie
synth music, and there he is.  I guess it goes without saying that he's one
of the suspects.
Movies like this inspire a great deal of free-association in me.  For
instance, why is it in films like this that the killer always chooses to
dress so homogenously?  In ...SUMMER, it was a yellow rain slicker; in this
movie, it's a parka with a fur-trimmed hood, which in the middle of a
non-snowbound campus, would be sure to grab anyone's attention.  And do the
people who compose the scores for these movies all use the same orchestra
hit synthesizer patch?  It sure sounds like it.

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
Funny how your expectations can be defeated, and not in good ways. THE
GHOST AND THE DARKNESS promised (at least, it seemed to me to promise) a
Hemingwayesque showdown between men and nature. What it delivered was
MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000-level material -- an inadvertently hilarious
story that made me scream advice at the characters. "Get new jobs!" was one
line, if I remember correctly.
At the end of the 19th century, Col. Patterson (Val Kilmer, whose Irish
accent comes and goes like an African zephyr) is an engineer who has been
hired to build a British railway bridge across the Tsavo River in Uganda.
He is having immensely stereotypical problems: the natives are restless,
his boss is a jerk, and now two man-eating lions are stalking the work camp
and killing people off. Patterson tries to handle the situation himself,
incompetently, and then turns to Charles Remington (Michael Douglas), a
hunter of world reknown (or something like that).
The movie stacks the deck so heavily in favor of the lions, they should
have gotten top billing and co-starred with Siegfried and Roy. They are
nigh-invulnerable, as one comic book put it, and this is of course just the
excuse the movie needs to have one native after another stepping forth to
solmenly recite lines about the Power of Nature. Give me a break. The movie
hasn't got the wherewithal to even begin to exploit such ideas; it's just
trying to find convenient ways to stall us.
Even the lion hunts themselves are idiotic. Get this: Remington's big plan
is to build a large scaffold-like structure in the middle of the savannah,
sit on it, and wait for the lion to show up. He does this, and then gets
knocked off by a BIRD. By the end of the movie, the blood vessels in my
palm were all broken open from me pounding my forehead with my hand.
The acting is forgettable. Douglas does a good job of portraying a
relatively cracked fellow, but it's nothing he hasn't done before. Kilmer
looks like he wishes he were someone else, somewhere else, and the rest
vanish into the cinematography. The camera, by the way, sometimes behaves
so stupidly all by itself that most of the lion attacks are incoherent.
What did I expect from this movie? I dunno. Some real excitement, I
suppose. A sense that there were formidable forces on both sides of this
equation. No such luck. I dug out my tattered copy of Hemingway's "The
Short Happy Life of Francis Macomber" and read that to get the taste of
this movie out of my mind.

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
Some subjects never get a fair shake in the movies.  Mental retardation is
one: offhand, I can only think of two movies that had retarded characters who
were entirely convincing and human.  "What's Eating Gilbert Grape?" and
"Dominick and Eugene" were both wonderful movies regardless of their subject
matter.
Maybe that's the heart of the problem.        "The Other Sister" would be a
dreadful movie even if the retarded characters were Nobel laurelates.  It's
overlong (130 minutes), overplotted, tedious, contrived, and absolutely
agonizing to endure -- especially if your understanding of mental retardation
goes beyond TV movies-of-the-week.
In the film, Juliette Lewis plays Carla, a retarded girl of 18 who has spent
most of her youth in an institution for the mentally handicapped.  She now
wants to go back home and train to be a veterinarian, but her mother (Diane
Keaton), as is always the case in movies like this, is opposed to her
daughter doing anything that doesn't fulfill the label of "retarded person". 
The father (Tom Skerritt) is all for it, of course.  It wouldn't be a movie
without conflict, but the conflict here is fake.
Carla eventually enrolls in a local polytechnical school and meets up with
Danny (Giovanni Ribisi), who is also retarded, and whose job seems to consist
of unstopping the brass instruments in the school band after they've been
pelted with marshmallows during football games.  Yes.  Why are they
interested in each other at all, retardation aside?  A more honest movie
would not need to use manufactured scenes, like the cringe-inducing one where
they puzzle over "The Joy of Sex", to make them comprehensible as a couple.
The movie also commits the cardinal sin so common to movies like this, where
retardation is used as a gimmick and not taken seriously.  In one scene, Danny
gets drunk (under circumstances which any bartender or seasoned drinker would
find ludicrous) and delivers a speech that is so obviously not his own words,
but the screenwriter speaking through him.  How's about that?  The movie not
only doesn't bother to give us convincing characters who are retarded -- it
doesn't even allow them freedom of speech!
I know a fair number of retarded people.  Most of them resent being
condescended to; they are not "cute", not "quaint", not "funny", and certainly
not insensitive to callousness.  They are also, alas, not as sitcom-witty as
the folks in "The Other Sister", but that's life: nobody in real life talks
like a sitcom (and if you do, see a doctor).
The director, Garry Marshall, has Ribisi and Lewis act retarded by having
them garble half their lines and walk funny.  Does he know anyone who is
retarded? Dd they really think that the lameness of the performances would be
overcome by everyone's good intentions?  Didn't anyone realize how contrived
and phony this story was, before it was put on the rails?  Evidently not. 
"The Other Sister" (even the title is virtually inexplicable) is going to be
stuck in my craw for a long time as one of the worst movies of 1999.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Hudsucker Proxy, The (1994)
The Coen Brothers have occupied a weird little world of their own for a long
time now, making movies that are motivated by some kind of damaged clockwork
mechanism that we can't see.  All we see is the surface, which generally
consists of weird and sometimes frightening behavior that is sometimes
endearing (FARGO, BLOOD SIMPLE) and often just weird and off-putting
(MILLER'S CROSSING).
THE HUDSUCKER PROXY is a high-end Coen production, with big, bold sets and
broad-screen cinematography in the service of nothing much in particular.
It's like the cinematic version of a shaggy dog story, somehow, and the
goofy voice-over narrations and the non-plot only hammer home the point.
The film takes place in an Art Deco New York of the Fifties, a world of
giant boardrooms and snappy hats, where the monolithic Hudsucker Corporation
makes jillions of dollars making... something.  But all is not well.  After
the most recent declaration of record-busting profits, the president of the
company hops up on the boardroom table and leaps out the window and falls
what looks like half a mile before finally going splat.
This scene, which was hinted at by dozens of people before I finally saw the
movie, is a good indicator of how the movie works -- or does not work.  It
consists of a single visual moment with no real payoff.  At first I thought
this was just an aberration, but the whole movie unfolds like that.  It's a
series of visual setups in search of a story.  Another scene, for instance,
has the old fuddy-duddies in the boardroom laughing at someone's wisecrack.
They laugh.  And laugh.  And laugh.  And laugh, until all possible patience
and perspective has been drained out of the moment and all we're left with
is weird behavior.
Eventually a plot accrues from all of this material.  The new dark horse in
the company (played by Paul Newman), takes hold and sticks an incompetent
mailman (Tim Robbins) into the top slot, hoping to drive stock prices down.
Unfortunately, the kid has an invention in mind -- actually, a whole slew of
them -- and soon the company is making recordbreaking profits all over
again.  But that was about it.  I was absorbed after the first half hour,
amused by the first hour, and then everything after that was me checking my
watch.
Why?  Because the story never really elicits our interest on any other level
other than the superficial.  It is, as they have said, all style and no
substance.  It's like the guy who tells you a really funny joke today and
then is offended when you're not still laughing a week from now.  It does
show that the Coens are very comfortable manipulating visual cliches for
short-term payoff, and there are some scenes that are hilarious -- I liked
Jennifer Jason Leigh's character, who is clearly modeled after the heroines
in the screwball comedies of the Thirties.
But the Coen brothers are also capable of making us care deeply about all
their characters, as they did with FARGO -- which makes this movie seem all
the more calculated and humorless in comparison.

Title
Review for 1/2 Mensch (1986)
Halber Mensch [1/2 Mensch / Half Man] (1986)
A movie review by Serdar Yegulalp
Copyright 1997 by Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Documentary-cum-music video of the now-legendary cult band
Einstuerzende Neubaten's 1986 tour of Japan. Caters more than it informs,
unfortunately.
The single most repeated story about Einstuerzende Neubauten, the
underground band from Germany who beat on sheet metal and shopping carts to
create mutant rock music, is the one about the time they caved in the
ceiling of a venue they were playing in. Not by playing too loud, although
they were certainly capable of it: they'd used a buzzsaw to cut through the
support pillars. The buzzsaw was a staple part of their act. They'd mike it
up and use it as an instrument. During one show they used a jackhammer to
drill a hole in the rear wall and made their escape that way. This is
clearly not a group you want playing your prom, unless you want to assume
the clean-up fee.
HALBER MENSCH, directed by the fitfully brilliant Japanese filmmaker Sogo
Ishii, is an attempt to weld documentary-style footage with blatantly
calculated music-video images. It's marketed (by Atavistic Video) more or
less as a music video product: the track names are indexed on the sleeve,
and Atavistic is primarily a record company. As a documentary, though, it
works in a fairly unorthodox way.
Einstuerzende Neubauten (the name means, to be entirely literal about it,
"collapsing buildings from the newer school of architecture") is as
unorthodox a band as there probably could be. There are some conventional
instruments -- guitar and bass -- but the majority of the sound of the band
is made up of metal and plastic objects that are smashed, rubbed, beaten,
stroked, and sampled in various ways. The band's live performance, if the
above example is any kind of clue, is an experience in itself. HALBER MENSCH
does not seem as interested in recreating the experience as it is in using
the band's performance as a kind of visual fetish.
The band is not introduced formally at first: they are simply dropped into
our laps, playing the droning, eerie "Armenia". The lead singer, Blixa
Bargeld, is a scrawny, bug-eyed fellow who seems to have to gather on
strength from every sector in his body to howl out the haunting lyrics:
"Please let me know... / Are the volcanoes active again?" The lyrics are in
German and are not titled, except once briefly in Japanese, and not having
them is a big minus to people who don't know the band, since the music, as
visceral as it is, also works because of its poetic and angry lyrics.
When we are formally introduced to the band, they don't speak for
themselves: we see them in single shots, or walking in a looming landscape,
with title cards that explain who they are. Their custom instruments are
given similar treatments. The net result feels less like a good documentary
and more like a handholding exercise: we're not permitted to really discover
the band on our own.
The film works best when it meshes the band's pummeling music to equally
powerful visuals. The high point is the song "Z.N.S." (Central Nervous
System), which features a crew of Sankai Juku-esque dancers and a good deal
of hyperkinetic editing. When we finally get to see the band performing for
a real audience, instead of the camera (the filmmaking is so matter-of-fact
about the fact that the earlier scenes are such setups that we are allowed
to see the camera tracks and the crew), it's almost anticlimactic.
The documentary end of the movie fails in other ways. When we get to see the
band setting up, for instance, it's all done in bewildering closeups and
snippets of people taping this and miking that. There's no sense of a
process, of *how* the work is being done. It's like those movies where they
show a character who's allegedly a writer and all we see is him crumpling up
one piece of paper after another and throwing them away. How do these people
come up with their music? What's their creative process like? Hell, we can't
even get a clear idea of how they put their stage act together!
As weak as HALBER MENSCH is as a documentary, it works best as a piece of
propulsive eyecandy for people who know the band, or are being introduced to
them through another means. Just don't go into it expecting to learn
something substantive about one of the few bands on the face of the earth
that could use a good documentary.

Title
Review for Gridlock'd (1997)
CAPSULE: Tim Roth and Tupac Shakur are both fine in this unfortunately
contrived tale of two junkies on the kick.
The worst thing about GRIDLOCK'D is that it takes a basically
interesting idea and surrounds it with prefab plotting, and the idea
is forced to surrender. Sad, but that's probably the way it goes: I
doubt many people, let alone filmmakers, would want to sit still long
enough for an absorbing story about two musician/junkies. I know I
would.
Tim Roth ("Stretch") and Tupac Shakur ("Spoon") are the
musician/junkies of the title. Based on what we see, they're talented,
but they also have a disgustingly narrow world-view: drugs, gigging,
and crashing afterwards. They share a loft with their singer, Cookie
(played splendidly by Thandie Newton) and have an existence that's not
as hellish as TRAINSPOTTING, but is still pretty grungy nonetheless.
One night they get a bad hit of something after a gig, and Cookie
plunges into a coma. Cookie winds up in a hospital bed, and Spoon
decides it's time to get off the junk. Stretch doesn't
empathize. Yet. These opening scenes and the moments in the hospital
that follow are brilliant: they're both funny and desperate, and they
strike a uniquely black tone for the movie's humor. In another scene,
the two of them try to injure themselves to get into an emergency
ward; all they've got is a crummy little penknife that probably
wouldn't be good for whittling down pencils.  But they use it anyway,
in a scene that's both funny and agonizing.
The two of them then get plunged into a maddening bureaucratic hassle
in an attempt to get into detox. Trouble is, you can't get into detox
without Medicaid, and you can't get Medicaid without being on welfare,
and you can't get on welfare without... and so on. There is one scene
where they try to intimidate a social worker by trying to comvince him
they're psychotic and need to get into detox NOW, GOD DAMN IT, and
then in a reversal that's the movie's trademark, THEY get the living
Christ intimidated out of *them*. There's also a cameo by Elizabeth
Pena as an ER nurse who gets her own sadistic little form of revenge
on the two of them when they show up for treatment in her ward not
once but twice. But then the movie slowly drifts into a stupid
shrink-wrapped plot about a drug dealer, with the attendant chases and
shoot-outs (at least it doesn't end with the bad guy being shot a
dozen times), and for me the real magic of the movie was lost.
The core of the story -- the Shakur/Roth byplay -- is solid. It shows
off both actors as being comfortable with the material -- especially
Shakur, who would certainly have gone on to do more interesting acting
had he lived. Shakur has one remarkable monologue about the first time
he popped coke, which sounds improvised, and has its corners and
cracks filled in with the nuances of a good-and-soon-to-be-great
actor. At the end, I reflected on how good the best parts of the movie
were, how senseless it was to clutter the movie up with its stupid
thriller plot, and on how we seem to be losing a few too many good
young actors these days.

Title
Review for No Escape (1994)
CAPSULE: Dumb dud of an SF action epic that tries to crosbreed prison movies
and far-future post-apocalypse, and fumbles both.
The title NO ESCAPE aptly describes the feelings of an audience condemned to
watch the movie in question. This is the first movie I've seen that tries to
crossbreed a Barton Maclaine prison picture and MAD MAX. While I could give
them points for being original, those points get yanked immediately back for
rampant stupidity.
It is the future. Ray Liotta plays a prisoner who has been condemned to the
kind of maximum-security facility that some of my more outspokenly
right-wing friends would no doubt have approved of. There, he clashes with
the (predictably) sadistic warden, and winds up being sent to Absolom.
Absolom is a jungle island with two major populations: The Insiders, a kind
of craft-guild village led by Father (Lance Henriksen), and Marek's Men, a
bunch of bloodthirsty Mad-Max-style headhunters led by -- who else? -- Marek
(Stuart Wilson). A clash between the two forces is inevitable, with Liotta's
character being in the midst of it all.
The movie brazenly ignores so many things it's appalling. Why were these
slave labor camps built in the first place, since they aren't visibly
profitable in any sense? What's all the hoopla about keeping them a secret
from spy satellites? Why is it that the slave camps never seem to get much
in the way of work done? And so on. It's plain there was never a moment's
thought at the script level to really dealing with any of this; the movie
eists as a series of action set-pieces, each only peripherally linked to the
next. It's also got a monumentally huge cheat of an ending -- it doesn't
conclude; it just stops dead, as if the final scenes were not filmed.
Ray Liotta is a good actor and I enjoy him in just about anything. In this
movie, he's a cut above the average hunk of beefcake used by most filmmakers
to absorb bullets; he can actually *act*, although the character he's given
to portray is a thin and uninteresting one. Lance Henriksen looks
approprately weathered and haggard (when has he *ever* looked young?), and
Stuart Wilson as Marek is appropriately in-your-face and loud. But the movie
doesn't care to equip these people with much to do except stumble through
the contrivances of the plot.
The movie sure *looks* impressive; they spent some fairly hefty money on the
set design and pyrotechnics. The producer was Gale Anne Hurd (THE
TERMINATOR, ALIEN NATION), and she's been known to stand behind some fairly
innovative projects that deal with the fantastic. NO ESCAPE is not one of
them.

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
CAPSULE: What a surprise: a big-name Hollywood comedy that's actually funny.
Tim Robbins and Martin Lawrence both score points (although Robbins comes
out slightly ahead).
The opening scenes of NOTHING TO LOSE hit me like a left hook when I was
expecting a body blow. Tim Robbins, playing a corporate hustler named Nick
Beam, is in bed with his wife, murmuring in a dead, empty voice about how
the love is gone. Then we get a surprise -- several, actually -- that had
both me and the rest of the audience falling out of our seats. This sets us
up on several levels: not only is Robbins a good actor, but so is the Beam
character.
Nick works for an advertising company which fills his hours, but he still
manages to find time for his wife. One afternoon, he gets out of a whole
slew of corporate obligations and comes home early... to find his wife and
his boss in bed together. He wanders downstairs, dazed, and then does what
no man in a blue funk should ever do: get in his car.
His aimless driving leads him to a carjacking, courtesy of a fellow named T.
Paul (Martin Lawrence), who senses Mr. Whitebread ain't firing on all
thrusters when he doesn't even look at the gun pointing at his temple. "Boy,
did you ever pick the wrong guy on the wrong day," Beam mutters with a
deadly little smile, and floors it.
One scarifying ride later, the two of them take stock in a diner far outside
the city. They don't like each other, but they're forced to rely on each
other when the Land Rover runs out of gas and Paul sticks up a gas station
to fill it up. Bit by bit, Beam's story comes out... along with a bizarre
plan to get revenge on his boss by robbing him blind.
The movie's a pastiche of recent comedy cliches, and there's no point in
ignoring it. What's different is that the movie is funny. Most comedies that
try to play this kind of mix-and-match don't work; they strike the wrong
notes, or make the heroes into idiots. Both Beam and Paul know what's what,
which makes them interesting to watch: you wonder what they're going to do
next. In one scene, they rob a sporting-goods store, and what could have
been a routine stick-em-up turns into a heated competition over who had the
more intimidating stickup style.
Martin Lawrence is an odd duck. I can't figure out if I like him or hate
him, but I liked him in this movie: he does things with his voice and face
that shouldn't be physically possible, which is half the reason for the
laughs he gets. The other half is his timing and attitude: pay attention to
the scene where he dresses down Beam for not having a tighter grip on his
wife (and Beam's reaction, too). Or the scene where he tries to tell Beam
he's in danger, and gets shrugged off.
Ultimately, the cliches win in NOTHING TO LOSE, but that doesn't mean the
ride isn't enjoyable. My basic rule of thumb for comedy is: Did I laugh?
Yeah -- a lot more than I probably should have, but I can't say that about
most movies. And the scene with the security guard Goth-dancing in the laser
vault has to be seen to be believed.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
"Deep Impact", disaster-season-twin to the wretched "Armageddon", is an
absorbing enough movie when it unfolds in front of you.  But when it's over,
its seams (and there are a lot of them) bulk huge.
I'll be fair.  Instead of becoming the comedic macho-porn action-movie cliche
that "Armageddon" sunk to, "Deep Impact" tries to deal realistically with the
possibility of global annihilation.  It falls short, I suspect, because there
are far too many times that we are reminded, however quietly, that we are only
watching a movie.
"Deep Impact" opens with young Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) peeking at the
heavens through his telescope.        There's something up there which doesn't seem
to register on the charts, and it takes professional astronomer Marcus Wolf
(Charles Martin Smith) to figure out it's a comet on a collision course for
Earth.        He rushes out the door of the observatory with his data disk in his
hand, and then gets himself killed in a crash with a semi.  Right off the bat
this told me the movie is not above using cheap plot devices to build
suspense.
No matter.  The movie skips ahead a year, into Plot Thread Two.  Not-so-
intrepid reporter Jenny *Lerner* (get it?) stumbles across a scandal involving
a Presidential cabinet member and what she believes to be a mistress
named "Ellie".  Lerner is played by Tea Leone as someone who only seems to be
about 66% there. Later on, when she's an MSNBC anchor, she's so wooden and
lifeless I was waiting for a cane to come from offscreen and yank her out of
the chair.
Of course, the scandal is not the news about "Ellie", but "E.L.E.", or an
Extinction Level Event -- the aforementioned comet plowing into the earth and
decimating life as we know it.  In a nice little scene, President Beck (Morgan
Freeman) confronts Lerner about the news and forces her to balance her own ego
against the welfare of billions.  In a movie where a lot of things are not
terribly convincing, Freeman is completely convincing as the President, even
when he is mouthing platitudes like, "Life will go on; we will prevail," with
all the certainty of a man who doesn't want to get caught with his britches
down.
When the news finally breaks, the President unveils a plan to send a space
probe to the comet and blow it to pieces with nukes (gee, where have we heard
that plan before?).  This is, of course, Plot Thread Three.  The probe, named
the Messiah, is piloted by "the last man to walk on the moon", astronaut
Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall).  There's a moment where Tanner seems to be
at odds with his crew -- "They're not afraid of death -- just looking bad on
TV" --        but nothing much is made of it; I suspect either the film or the
script was originally much longer, and many of the emotional subtexts for
such scenes is missing.
This seems to be the heart of the problem with the movie: it doesn't convince
us that the planet is really at stake.  Sure, there's panic and looting and
people boarding up their windows.  There's a truly jaw-dropping (unfaked) shot
of an interstate highway crammed with refugees.  At least we don't get the
obligatory shots of the wild-eyed street-corner preacher with the sign reading
THE END IS NIGH.
But... somehow... there's an additional emotional level to all of this that
seems to be missing.  The script tries to make up for it rather ham-handedly
through some synthetic heart-tugs.  One is Lerner's estranged parents, and
another -- so unconvincing it almost sinks the movie singlehandedly -- is Leo
and his girlfriend, a plot thread which starts well but rapdily degenerates
into something out of "For The Love of Benji", with kids scrambling tearfully
through the wilderness on mopeds.
When disaster finally strikes, the movie's messages are even more confused.
Are we supposed to sit aghast at the destruction, or point at the screen and
go, "Oo, cool!  They blew away the Brookyn Bridge!"  The effects show at the
end belies the movie's intentions -- not because it's there, but because it
doesn't know how to show what's going on except in terms of shopworn disaster-
movie cliches -- people pointing, screaming, running, buildings falling over,
etc.  What emotional involvement we've built with the movie is tossed in favor
of a money shot; a CGI-driven End Times Porn.  And then we get the conclusion,
in which the filmmakers cleverly cheat the story and pull not one but two
endings out of their hat.
What would have worked here?  I'm not sure.  Part of the problem is the movie
is an uneasy alliance of two stories -- serious studies of human beings faced
with hopeless situations like "The Day After" or "The Sacrifice", and
spectacle- effects movies like, yes, "Armageddon".  Somewhere along the line
they should have just picked one track and stuck with it to the bitter end.
Don't get me wrong.  This isn't a bad movie.  It's professional-looking,
relatively well-acted, and fast-moving (courtesy of Mimi Leder's fluid
direction).  I guess the big problem is that "Armageddon" makes it look like a
masterpiece, when it just isn't.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
CAPSULE: A rare one. A grand and wise movie about cosmic patience, hope
found, and hope kept.
The beauty of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is in the slow and careful way it
works towards its conclusion. Which is, I have to say, a deceptive one: the
movie starts by making you believe it's going to find its subject in one
man, but in reality is about another.
The two men in question are Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins) and Red (Morgan
Freeman), inmates in Shawshank Prison. Dufresne, as we learn in the opening
credits, has been sentenced to two life sentences for murdering his wife and
her lover. We are shown quite plainly that he didn't do it, but in prison
everyon's innocent: his factual innocence means nothing there.
Dufresne is assaulted brutally over a period of years. The way the movie
deploys this is heartbreaking: this is not one of those cheapjack movies
where the hero sits up all night working to conceal a rock in his fist and
then creams his tormentors with one blow each. He will only be able to
survive by outlasting others, by outthinking them, and by putting himself
out of their reach.
Red is a procurer: for the right price, he can get you anything short of
escape. But in Shawshank, any escape is worth it -- even a poster of Rita
Hayworth -- and so Red is constantly in business. Dufresne and Red slowly
grow to like each other, Red warming to Dufresne's quiet, persistent manner.
Slowly, over the course of time, Dufresne begins to make changes in the way
the prison operates. He has all the time in the world; why not make the most
of it? And while this is happening, another, more subtle series of changes
is taking place inside Red -- one which we see dramatized in each of his
consecutive parole board meetings, ten years or so apart.
The movie is patient. There is no hurried scurrying from one forced plot
point to another, but instead the wonderful feeling of a story developing on
its own, flowing naturally from its material and its characters. And what
characters: as Dufresne, Tim Robbins is almost invisible, but all the better
for it. When he finally smiles and raises his face to the rain near the end
of the movie (in a shot which was better off being kept out of the
trailers), he's earned it. Freeman, as Red, does gradual things with his
role that are worth watching the movie a second time for. Maybe a third,
since he's a lot more important to the significance of the title than we
think at first.
There are some deviations from the original Stephen King novella, and some
people will no doubt find this irksome, although it's probably inevitable.
But they don't damage the movie as a whole -- in fact, it would probably
take nothing short of a missing reel of film to do that.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
I'm spoiled.  Long before I had ever read a single Michael Crichton novel, I
read Stanislaw Lem, the Polish science-fiction writer who has far more to
say in one book than Crichton has had to say in all of his.  The book in
question was SOLARIS, a novel about a planet that appears to be a life form
unto itself.  Crichton probably didn't plagarize SOLARIS to write SPHERE,
but it's simply an infinitely inferior book compared to Lem's novel.
SPHERE, the movie from said novel, suffers from all the same drawbacks.
Worse, there has already been a movie made of SOLARIS, by the Russian
filmmaker Andrei Tarkovsky, which is haunting and chilling in ways that this
film, directed passively by Barry Levinson as a holding action before WAG
THE DOG, cannot even begin to conceive of.
The plot: A ways back, a psychologist by the name of Norma Hoffman (played
by *Dustin* Hoffman), put together a government report on what to do if E.T.
comes calling.  He named several colleagues of his as members of a "contact
team" -- almost jokingly, it seems, but the government gets the last laugh
when the team is activated for a mission to the South Pacific.  Sure enough,
down on the ocean floor, there are the remains of a spaceship that crashed
there -- almost 300 years ago.  (There is one funny moment straight from the
book about the maker of the ship's electronics that I will not spoil here.)
What they find is by turns intriguing and idiotic.  A pattern gets set up:
we get the hint of something that may be an explanation, and then we're
forced to discard it and start from absolute scratch.  This is annoying.
When we finally DO understand what the Sam Hill is going on, it doesn't make
any sense -- and the conclusion the movie tries to draw from it is just
plain limp.  The effects are decent, but they are no more than a light show
to support a movie that really isn't about much of anything.  I kept
harkening back to THE ABYSS, which generated horrible suspense with nothing
more than a broken umbilical cable -- or the exploding rivets of DAS BOOT.
Nothing like that holds the attention here.
The actors try.  They do not get far.  Samuel Jackson is probably the best
of the bunch, since he can pretty much survive anything through a show of
attitude.  Sharon Stone, who is a better actor than people realize (see LAST
DANCE and CASINO, and the upcoming THE MIGHTY!), is totally lost.  And
Dustin Hoffman himself does a reprise of the same territory he did with
OUTBREAK.  No wonder they're content to just drift: the material they're
given doesn't afford them a chance to really make their performances matter.
So.  When do we get a Tarkovsky revival?

Title
Review for Silent Fall (1994)
SILENT FALL has the shreds and shards of a far better movie lurking around
inside it somewhere.  It takes the form of a psychological thriller, where
the detectives work hand-in-glove with psychiatrists to disentangle the mind
of a witness to a murder.  The witness is an autistic little boy, and there
are strong hints that he is probably the killer as well -- after all, they
found him swinging the knife while standing over his parent's corpses.
Richard Dreyfuss is the psychiatrist, and it is to his credit that he does
the best job he can in a movie of such abysmal silliness.  He has one very
nice scene where he uses a deck of cards as a metaphor for how to jog the
kid's memory.  Unfortunately, like so many other ham-handed scripts, the
metaphor is hammered on again and again until its initial charm collapses.
I had high hopes going into this movie.  For the most part, psychiatrists
get short shrift in films: they get portrayed as soulless technicians (ONE
FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST), or fiendish maniacs (BAD DREAMS), or goofy and
ineffectual softies (AMOS & ANDREW).  Dreyfuss plays a fellow with smarts
and presence, and he does a decent job of soldiering on while the film
collapses around him.  John Lithgow gets dragged in for a wasteful little
cameo as a drug-dispensing doctor, which reminded me of what a good actor he
is when he's not in junk like this.
The movie has so few real ideas about its alleged subjects that it's
distressing.  Take, for instance, the murder investigation.  If you were a
cop, would you let the children of the murder victims live in their house
while it would still be a crime scene?  The movie's insights into autism are
also pretty much nonexistent.  Autism, like the rest of the movie's conceits
with psychology, are just cheap hooks onto which to hang the rest of the
plot.  And if there is another thriller out there with a more contrived mess
of a plot than this one -- write me, I've got cigars.
The film's big climax has Dreyfuss getting the kid to re-enact almost on cue
what he witnessed.  Never mind if the people in the movie watching this
thought it was believable: did anyone FILMING it think it was believable?
Really?

Title
Review for Last Action Hero (1993)
CAPSULE: What must have sounded like a surefire idea on paper somehow falls
flat onscreen. Arnold tries, and has his usual goofy charm, but he can't
redeem this one.
LAST ACTION HERO (that's right, no "the" in the title) has one of the best
premises I could imagine for a movie, and one of the least involving
payoffs. It's about a kid named Danny, who's a fan of a series of Big Man
With An Even Bigger Gun action movies, all named after its hero, Jack
Slater. Jack Slater is played, of course, by Arnold Schwartzenegger.
One night Danny gets a sneak preview to see JACK SLATER IV, and by plot
mechanisms too complicated to relate here, gets sucked into the movie.
Literally. He winds up in the back of Jack Slater's car, ducking bullets,
and pleading for his life ("My name's Danny -- I'm a, a kid!" he shouts).
What happens next has terrific promise. Danny is intimately familiar with
movie conventions, and tries to use his knowledge of same to keep both him
and Jack a step ahead of the bad guys (Charles Dance and Tom Noonan).
However, Jack (not Arnold, but the character Jack!) is a tough nut: for
instance, Danny points out that all the phone numbers in movies have a 555
prefix, using the phone book to support this, and asks Jack how they can do
this when there are millions of people living in Los Angeles alone? "That's
why they have area codes!" Jack retorts. And so on.
There are many individually funny moments. One, which is basically a
throwaway, has Danny re-making HAMLET in his head as a Jack Slater movie.
Another has about a billion cameos walking in and out of a police station,
and a third (possibly the funniest gag in the movie) deals with who plays
The Terminator in Jack Slater's universe. (No, I won't ruin it.)
Strangely, the promise never gets realized. Instead, the movies makes the
critical mistake of taking its ricepaper-thin plot seriously, and gets
gimmicked up with over-the-top action sequences that don't fit. One of the
dangers of making fun of movies like LETHAL WEAPON is that the original
material had a wicked sense of self-knowledge, and could kid itself openly,
so making fun of something like that would be a fool's errand. LAST ACTION
HERO makes that mistake, and as a result the movie gets bogged down in
synthetic confrontations that are not as interesting as the movie's
original leap of wonder.
There's more problems. The movie also fumbles its business with the line
between imagination and reality -- fumbles it so badly that when Jack and
Arnold finally DO meet, NOTHING HAPPENS. Nothing, that is to say, of
interest or substance. We get a couple of pat emotional countercharges
flung back and forth, and that's it. Where's the astonishment or wonder?
And perhaps that's the biggest problem with the movie: it assumes that tons
of cameos and lots of movie in-jokes will take the place of a real,
sustained sense of wonder about what's going on.
Woody Allen, before his downfall, made a wonderful little movie about the
line between cinema fantasy and gritty reality, named THE PURPLE ROSE OF
CAIRO. In its modest way, it did everything that LAST ACTION HERO never
manages to touch.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
CAPSULE: MONEY TRAIN has been displaced; SPECIES II is the worst movie ever
made by a major studio.
You'll notice that there's a "minus" sign in front of my one-star rating of
SPECIES II. This is deliberate: normally, the lowest I go for any movie is
"no stars", meaning that I was not only unentertained, but offended as well.
Minus-one stars, then, goes even lower than that. SPECIES II is the most
offensive movie -- morally and aesthetically -- ever made by a big-name
studio. Period. It's a sequel, I guess, to the dumb ALIEN ripoff of a few
years back that had one twist: we got a sexy *female* alien, who transformed
into a very unsexy puddle of chow mein when she got horny. This movie doesn't
even have a new element to bring to the mix. It's a geek show.
There is one scene in SPECIES II that is the core of my disgust with the
film. It consists of two creatures that we have seen represented as humans,
transformed into aliens. One of them -- the "male" -- attacks the "female" in
a very specifically sexual way, raping her orally. It's impossible to
interpret what happens as anything else. I am astonished that a PG-13 rated
film could contain a revoltingly explicit depiction, however metaphorical, of
oral rape -- and with no point to it except to give us trashy shock. But
there it is.
When the film isn't being disgusting, it's boring. Its plot, what little I
could find of it, centers around astronauts returning from Mars infected with
the same alien DNA that spawned the first movie's "Sil". One of them mutates,
mates like mad, learns that there's a female alien on Earth somewhere, runs
amuck. I am not leaving out much, nor am I trying to.
The director of his garbage, incredibly, is Peter Medak. Medak is a good
filmmaker, and you will never know that from watching this movie. Medak has
directed LET HIM HAVE IT, ROMEO IS BLEEDING, and THE KRAYS, all of which were
above-average movies about crime and violence. SPECIES II seems to have been
done entirely on autopilot, which is a shame, because if he'd bothered to
take the material into hand, he could have reworked it into something less
purposelessly nauseating and vile.
A friend brought up a comparison that's worth mentioning here. The Japanese
animated sex-and-apocalypse epic LEGEND OF THE OVERFIEND is wall-to-wall with
scenes like the one I described above, and worse. But it is nowhere nearly as
hateful as SPECIES II is. As disgusting and repellent as LEGEND OF THE
OVERFIEND was, it at least had a degree of internal consistency and ferocious
energy. SPECIES II doesn't even classify as a beer movie (not unless you feel
like cleaning beer-vomit off the couch). It isn't interesting, original,
watchable, thought-provoking *or* entertaining. It's an all-new cinematic low.
Congratulations, guys. You're my new basement tenants.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
BLADE is the single best example of a live-action movie that draws its
lifeblood from the comics.  Not only is it adapted from one -- albeit a
minor one -- it's designed from the ground up to give us the feel, the
smell, the you-name-it of a comic book's kinetics and adrenalin.  It works.
As someone else once said, "If this film WAS a comic book, my fingers would
be black from it."
Wesley Snipes stars as the title character, who was born shortly after his
mother was bitten by a vampire.  Thanks to this, he has the advantages of
both vampire and human strains, and in conjunction with his sidekick and
weapons-smith, Whistler (Kris Kristofferson, very good), he's engaged in a
one-man war against vampire-kind.  The war is about to be escalated, too:
Deacon Frost (Stephen Dorff, scary as hell), one of the young-turk vampires,
has managed to decipher information about an old vampire legend that could
unleash unbelievable power and destruction.  Blade outfits himself with some
truly savage weapons, including a booby-trapped sword that has to be seen to
be believed, and wreaks havoc.
Into the middle of this stumbles a doctor (N'Bushe Wright, also very good),
who gets mauled and infected, and must trust herself to Blade for both
protection and understanding.  She's convinced there's a way to undo the
vampire curse; he's not -- he's wrestled with it long and hard himself, and
there are signs the vampire half of him is winning.
BLADE stands out for a number of reasons.  I mentioned the look-and-feel,
but there are some subtle dimensions to the way the movie plays out.  Rather
than cap off each action scene with a hard climax, the scenes taper off
gently -- sort of the way the end of one comic issue leads into the next, to
keep you reading.  The result is that instead of having the action just stop
and eliciting applause from the audience, everything rolls smoothly along
into the next sequence.  There's also a good deal of experimentalism with
the camera -- time-lapse, stop-motion, jagged angles, but none of it is
overused or cliched.  It all feels fresh.
Snipes plays Blade as an uneasy amalgam of tough guy and scared loner.  When
he grins and postures, he slumps a second later, because for all his bravado
he's vulnerable and very alone, and he knows it.  Wright, as the doctor, is
a great ordinary-hero type: she starts off unwitting and confused, and then
learns very, very fast.  There is one scene where she verbally intimidates
Frost which, all by itself, lifts the movie up another notch.
There are other things in the movie that show smarts and creativity: the
younger vampires are clearly pattered after '90s "heroin chic" models, with
their hollowed eyes and rag-tag wardrobes.  There's also more than a hint of
a racial allegory, since most of the protagonists are black -- something
which is a nice sign that the color line in big Hollywood productions is
finally dissolving.  If it had just been an ass-kicking vehicle, that would
have been good, but Snipes and the rest of the movie's crew took this story
and pushed it up to the next level, and made it something really special.

Title
Review for Kokaku kidotai (1995)
CAPSULE: Crack the shell and discover a real gem. Navigates its wilderness
of high-tech philosophy without dropping the ball.
When we first see Agent Kusanagi, she's squatting naked on the ledge of the
topmost floor of a gigantic building, waiting for the right moment to
strike. In the room below her, illegal deals are being transacted. Just as
someone smells a rat, she dives like a suicidal bungee-jumper, takes out her
target with a burst of hollow-point submachine-gun fire, and then vanishes
in a haze of personal body-cloaking technology. Not exactly the opening for
a very thought-provoking movie, we might think. We are wrong.
GHOST IN THE SHELL -- a great title, by the way -- contains a barrage of
ideas that are both engaging, AND played out on-screen in fascinating ways.
It takes place in a heavily technologized future, where the human body
itself can be turned into one gigantic cybernetic host for a mind -- the
"ghost in the shell" of the title. The heroine of the film is the
aforementioned Kusanagi, a cool and calculating policeman with a totally
synthetic body, but with a very human mind. She knows from whence she came,
sort of, but where is she going?
Kusanagi and her cohorts run afoul of a clever and malicious hacker who
calls himself the Puppet Master. His specialty is hacking human bodies and
memories to perform crimes, and then leaving the hacked humans behind as
saps for the police. Fortunately, Kusanagi catches on fast, and when she
moves to trap the Puppet Master, she finds something even more startling --
not a hacker, but a new kind of life form, one that has been germinated in
the web of information and technology encircling the planet. GITS gives this
idea the workout it deserves, even though it's not a long movie -- less than
100 minutes -- but it's packed with movement and color, and never pauses for
breath. It also has the right ending for its difficult material; a lesser
movie would have a shootout and that would be the end of it, but GITS has a
knowing coda that puts everything into perspective.
GITS' biggest flaw, which is becoming an increasingly irritating caveat in
many imported movies, is the shockingly bad dubbing job. This is a movie to
watch subtitled if at all possible, since the dubbing is done with voices
that often don't match the characters at all. Kusanagi's dub voice is the
worst of the bunch -- static and uninvolving, despite the fact that she has
one of the best speeches in the movie.
The movie's greatest glory, however, is in its sleek and overpowering
images. There is a moment where Kusanagi goes scuba-diving, and touches the
reflection of her own face on the underside of the water. There is the final
brutal showdown in a "museum of evolution" between Kusanagi and a
death-dealing robot tank. There is the opening sequence, in which a human
shell is assembled and deployed. And there is a moment in the middle of the
movie where the camera stares and stares at rain-slickened streets with
crowds peppering them in slow-motion, for no other reason than to revel in
the glory of it all.

Title
Review for Blechtrommel, Die (1979)
What a strange story.  It's been nearly a week, and I'm still having a hard
time sorting out my feelings about THE TIN DRUM.  Oddly, I get the feeling
another viewing wouldn't help much.
Disturbing but not dishonest, THE TIN DRUM is certainly like no other movie
ever made: it mixes a note-perfect evocation of WWI, Weimar Republic and
WWII Germany with a heavy streak of sexually-symbolic surrealism.  There's
also a twisted coming-of-age story in there, somewhere.  But it all adds up
to a movie that isn't quite the sum of its parts.
Based on Guenter Grass's monolithic and symbolically-saturated novel, THE
TIN DRUM takes its time setting up the story of Oskar, a child of pre-WWII
Germany who at a very early age takes fierce note of the unpleasantness and
hypocrisy of the adult world.  To protest all of that, he throws himself
down the cellar steps and stops growing -- just like that.  From then on
it's Oskar against the world, in a sense... although the movie's main flaw
is that seems to have less and less of an understanding of Oskar as it goes
along.
Oskar is played by the dwarfish David Bennent, a terrifying-looking little
man with eyes that seem centuries older than the rest of him.  (See him in
LEGEND [where I accidentally called him "William Bennent"] for another
example of his malevolence.)  He's never anywhere without a tin drum he
bangs incessantly on (hence the title), and his stunted growth gives him the
ability to shatter glass with a keening shriek.  Both become ways he
registers his disgust with and distrust for the world: when he finds his
mother philandering, he jolts her and her lover out of bed with a
cathedral-wrecking yell.  And in the movie's best scene, he uses his drum to
subvert the signals of a Nazi marching band and gets them to switch over to
"The Blue Danube".
Danzig of the Thirties and Forties comes to life perfectly on the screen in
this movie; in fact, the reproduction of the time and place is so convincing
it's a little unnerving.  We get a scene in a post office on Polish soil,
under attack by German soldiers, that recreates the ugliness of the war with
distressing vividness.  The details of Oskar's neighborhood (including a
Jewish toymaker and a gaunt, wraithlike figure who seems to live in the
graveyard) are finely observed and stick in the memory.
But the center of the story -- the underpinning, I guess -- is never clear.
The movie's a little too free with its cold-blooded whimsy.  At one point,
in apparent contrast to what he's done before, Oskar joins a midget troupe
to entertain the Nazi soldiers at the front lines, but the movie never
really makes it clear if he's doing this out of expediency -- or
self-contempt, or out of loyalty to his friends in the troupe, etc.  If the
movie is trying some of the same tricks as the book -- throwing a whole
fistful of emotions at us and seeing if they stick -- then it makes more
sense, but only slightly.  Except through artifical devices like the drum,
the movie never achieves real coherence, and then it's a kind of forced
intelligibility that hurts its apparent ultimate aims.
I mentioned that the film is off-putting, but not dishonest: a good deal of
the middle stretch of the movie depicts Oskar becoming aware of his own
sexuality, and fixating on a young girl who's come to work in his father's
store.  (There's also the suggestion, left openended, that he winds up
fathering a boy through her.)  As uncomfortable as the scenes are of Oskar
and the girl (they have a *very* weird variety of foreplay that involves, I
think, cane sugar), they make sense in context.  But... what context is
that? I kept asking myself, and came up empty.
So -- is it worth seeing?  I guess so.  THE TIN DRUM is not a bad movie, and
certainly never a boring one, but not wholly intelligible or satisfying
either.  What a strange story.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
"The Corruptor" is a mixture of Hong Kong arcade-action cinema and Sydney
Pollack-esque New York crime drama, and what's surprising is that the hybrid
seems to work.        It concerns two New York City detectives -- played by Chow
Yun- Fat and Mark Wahlberg (who gets better every time I see him) -- who get
sucked into a complex plot of double-crossings and betrayals.  It's one of
those movies that makes more sense after it's over, but is quite a ride while
it's still unspooling.
Chow Yun-Fat's cop is one of those guys who "frisks" someone by smashing his
face into a brick wall while lifting the guy's cigarettes.  Wahlberg's
detective is more reserved and thoughtful, and has been assigned to Yun-Fat's
department to handle a possible organized-crime connection.  The two don't
like each other very much -- and in fact learn to hate each other's guts
enormously, especially after both of them may turn out to be dirty and on the
take.
And more than that I'm not sure I should give away, since at about the
halfway mark there are a series of revelations which, instead of seeming
tacked-on as gratuitous plot-twists, give everything we've seen before a new
and ominous resonance. (There's even a subplot about the Wahlberg character's
father, which at first seems gratuitous, but soon turns out to be organically
connected to everything.)  The movie, instead of getting dumber, gets smarter
and less beholden to formulas as it goes on.  That's rare.
After the visually-enticing but otherwise shallow "Replacement Killers"
(which I still admired for its bombasticity), Chow Yun-Fat now has his first
English- speaking dramatic role as a New York cop in "The Corruptor".  He
plays the role -- a tough-as-rusty-nails detective -- with all the
eye-rolling, evil-smirking over-the-top-ness that he brought to many of his
more outre' Hong Kong roles. But instead of seeming out of place, he hardly
seems to be able to catch up with the manic pace of the movie he's in: he
seems like a caged animal, trying frantically to chew its way out.  Wahlberg,
cerebral and at times exhausted, comes off as someone who knew exactly what
he was getting into from the moment he stepped on screen -- even if we don't
know what that is.  His performance fills in what we don't know factually by
being emotionally complete.
I was surprised to hear how universally derided "The Corruptor" was.  This is
a good, gritty film that knows its material well, and wraps it in a slick and
entertaining package.  A friend of mine slammed the film as being
"predictable".        Maybe its plot is predictable, but the way we get to the
ending we're expecting doesn't come the way we'd expect.  And if every story
were unpredictable, then fiction as a device would be semipointless: the
point is not to get something you can't anticipate, but to get it in a way
you can't anticipate.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
CAPSULE: Irredeemably stupid and pigheaded attempt at a story about the
first female Navy SEAL. Read ROGUE WARRIOR instead.
Demi Moore has never been terribly compelling, if you ask me, but she's the
best thing in G.I. JANE, a dismal and off-kilter piece of work from the
once-notable director Ridley Scott. What's to be said about a movie where
the best scene is the one where she shaves her own head?
The biggest problems with G.I. JANE are a) plausibility and b) deployment.
The broad outlines of the story are compelling -- the very concept of women
in the military has always caused a stir in many quarters -- but the movie
hasn't got the faintest idea how to put across its conceits. Plus, it
suffers from a grafted-on Hollywood plot that one can hear squeaking and
grinding blocks away.
Moore plays O'Neil, a career military woman with enough endurance for any
three soldiers. She gets involved in a pilot program to allow women in the
SEAL training program, which is being coordinated by a brassy female senator
(Anne Bancroft, utterly wasted). A good example of the movie's basic
airheadedness -- or maybe indecisiveness -- is an early scene with Moore's
beau, also a military man. "I wasn't ready to decide the rest of my life
today," he bleats at her while scrubbing her toes in the bathroom. The whole
speech was glaringly upstaged by the fact that for a military office,
O'Neil -- sorry, Demi -- has amazingly good-looking feet.
O'Neil's trouble begins before she even enters SEAL training proper. A whole
bevy of preferential treatments have been set up to provide women with a
slightly easier road into the military, and apparently all of those
protocols have been preserved in the SEAL program as well. This gets O'Neil
hopping mad, since that's the last thing she wants. There are several
tongue-tied speeches about whether or not her very presence there "makes a
statement", but the movie simply doesn't have the capacity to make us care;
it's too busy hustling us through one manufactured conflict after another.
The details of the SEAL training are ridiculous and overblown. In Richard
Marcienko's eye-opening book ROGUE WARRIOR, there are a great many details
about the brutality of the program (60 percent of the enlistees don't make
it). In G.I. JANE, we're treated to the unbelievable sight of the drill
seargeants using live ammo on the recruits in one exercise. In another
scene, the recruits have to eat their meals out of trash cans. Physical
abuse is commonplace (another total boner). Even THE HILL didn't go this
far.
As the movie plodded onwards, I kept asking myself: Isn't there some basis
in fact for a better, more compelling story about this subject? A story that
wasn't beholden to Hollywood conventions about the military, for one? The
movie also shoots itself in the foot by injecting gratuitous pop-song
snatches onto the soundtrack ("Mama Told Me Not To Come" is used to
disastrous effect at one point), which only makes the movie seem that much
more contrived and manipulative.
Demi is, interestingly enough, fine in the picture. There was never a moment
when I doubted her competence or her physical presence. It was the rest of
the movie I had my reservations about. Big ones.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
This film enraged me in ways that I find difficult to put into language.  I
was at first compelled to consign it to the "no stars" category, which I
reserve for films that are morally repugnant, but I held back -- if only
because I wasn't too sure if the filmmakers were aware of how badly they'd
botched their own story.  Let me explain.
APT PUPIL has been adapted from a Stephen King short story about a high
school kid who discovers that the old man living down the street is Kurt
Dussander, a former Nazi commandant.  He blackmails the old man into spilling
more and more of the beans about his life as a Nazi, and then, as we might
imagine, there is a transference of personality and intent.
The story seemed less exploitive on paper, I guess.  On film, it's appalling,
because it shows us things that in a more intelligent movie, we would have
felt repulsed by -- but in this movie, they're being used for shock value, to
lead us along and enlist our attention when it's already being kept.
Technically, the movie's credentials are solid: it was directed by Bryan
Singer, whose THE USUAL SUSPECTS was fascinating if a little too much like
the ultimate cinematic shaggy-dog story.  The acting is also solid: Ian
McKellan, who was magnificent in RICHARD III, is fine as Dussander, given the
limits of the script.  Brad Renfro plays the boy, and does a decent job.  His
character is not stupid, but morally bankrupt, and the movie tries to get its
mileage out of the idea that his moral vacuum may somehow be worse than
Dussander's.
But isn't this a futile effort? I kept asking myself.  The only reason one
would try to gauge which of the two is worse -- Dussander or the Renfro
character -- is so that one could mete out punishments, and the movie
indulges in precisely the kind of ham-handed eye-for-and-eye revenge
moralization that bad Hollywood movies of this stripe wallow around in. 
There is a particularly odious attempt to provide "balance" at the end of the
movie, when a concentration camp survivor is trotted out and made to recite
John Donne, as if on cue.
The film is littered with noxious episodes which are allegedly supposed to
portray both character's disintegrations, but which don't add up to much more
than ugly attempts to shock the audience -- probably because they're dealt
with in such an exploitive fashion.  For example: Dussander, in one of his
less tractable moments, tries to stick a neighbor's cat in the oven and gas
it to death.  The film's shifty editing allows us to draw our own conclusions
about whether or not the cat survived.        In other words, the movie wants to
have its cake (cheap shock of cat being gassed in oven) and eat it too
(larger "statement" about Dussander's evil).  The film even sinks to the
level of shamelessly milking the old He Isn't Really Dead ploy, which does
not belong anywhere near a movie of its alleged caliber.
I think I understand now why I hated this film.  I resented the movie because
it tries to use the subject of the Holocaust -- as well as many other kinds
of horrors -- to spice up a basically mundane story.  It gets to the point
where we are being asked to listen to details that add nothing to the actual
drama, but are simply there as a kind of emotionally pornographic embroidery.
Take, for instance, one scene where Dussander describes in loathsome and
graphic detail the process of gassing Jews.  The scene is squirm-inducing for
all the reasons I described above, but then it takes on another level of
audience betrayal.  Dussander is made to say that the gas came from nozzles
in the ceiling -- in other words, from the infamous dummy showerheads that
have been the subject of many a documentary of the gas chambers.  This is not
even factually correct: the showerheads were cosmetic and not attached to
anything. The actual gas (which came in the form of Zyklon B, a gravel-like
substance that released cyanide gas when exposed to air) was either thrown in
through doggable ports in the ceiling or introduced through wire mesh
devices.
I don't mean to digress forever on this point, but it is a strong component
of what I objected to about this movie.  The whole issue of the Holocaust and
its impact on people is not being explored per se, but is simply being
exploited as an attention-getting factor -- and what's worse, the filmmakers
and screenwriters didn't bother to do basic research beyond recycling
whatever obvious cliches of the Holocaust were floating around in their head.
 That's offensive.
I am now mentally comparing APT PUPIL mentally to another movie that I saw a
while ago -- BETRAYED, which was written by Joe Eszterhas and starred Tom
Berenger as a good ol' boy-cum-Klansman.  That film contained a scene which
brought the whole movie screeching to a halt -- a sequence where Berenger and
some of his Klan buddies kidnap a black man and use him in a live manhunt. 
If the filmmakers felt that to include such a scene in that movie was
"required" to establish how vile the Klansman were, then they are mistaken. 
BETRAYED was written on the level of a two-dimensional Hollywood
entertainment AT BEST. Putting a repulsive scene like that in it does not
"ennoble" the film, because the film has not earned the right to exploit that
imagery by dint of any understanding of those issues.
And now, at last, I think about a movie like the heart-stopping documentary
SHOAH, which contains an almost uncountable number of real details about the
Holocaust, or even HOTEL TERMINUS, which examined the Klaus Barbie affair --
both of which have infinitely more to say about the nature of evil than the
rancidly exploitive APT PUPIL.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Metro (1997)
CAPSULE: Better-than-average actioner with Eddie Murphy *not* doing a
reprise of Axel Foley. Still doesn't quite leave the ground, though.
Eddie Murphy isn't exactly breaking new ground with METRO, an action picture
in which he plays a fast-moving police negotiator, but he does make the
movie an enjoyable experience. He is several megawatts less cranky than the
shrill and unpleasant Axel Foley, for starters.
Murphy's character lives and works in San Francisco. He knows his job well,
and doesn't believe that everyone he negotiates with deserves a SWAT bullet
through the head. But if it comes to that... well, that may be part of the
reason he goes to the racetrack and bets like crazy. He's a weird cross
between Can-Do Man and a walking deathwish. He does have a ladyfriend, and
the time they have on screen is engaging and funny (and judging from the
repartee, mostly unscripted).
Murphy runs afoul of a very nasty and cold-blooded diamond thief (played
with torrents of venom and grease by Michael Wincott), and quickly earns
himself an enemy. In a remarkable scene, Wincott takes over a posh
jewelers', and Murphy goes to talk him down. The two of them engage in a
fencing match of wits that's almost worth seeing the movie for -- and then
erupts into an incredibly violent and drawn-out chase that tears across most
of San Francisco. Both characters taunt each other savagely in scenes that
feel like they come from another movie, they're so ugly and angry.
The movie's schizophrenia is subtle, but it's there. On the one hand, there
are the *really* smart touches, like the way the whole hostage scene is
built, or the aforementioned mental cruelty between the two leads. On the
other hand, there are a gutload of criminally manipulative moments, like the
one where Murphy's ladyfriend is being stalked by bad theme music. Taken as
a whole, METRO's relatively entertaining, but anyone who picks too hard at
the movie is going to be disappointed. It's another disposable stop on the
trolley car of Murphy's career.

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Freaky and fiendish thriller that follows its internal logic almost
through to the end.
THE GAME is David Fincher's new movie after SE7EN, and like that movie, it
revels in the horrid feeling we have that things are scuttling around out of
sight and rearranging the chess pieces on us.
Michael Douglas plays a wealthy loner named Nicholas Van Orten, who spends
all day playing with other people's money and most of his night screening
his phone calls and watching CNN. His ex-wife still tries, futilely, to get
back in touch with him, and he's estranged from his brother -- who drops
back into his life one day and tells him about a weird, clandestine company
called CRS. For a fee, CRS will make your life "more interesting." Van
Orton, tempted, eventually caves in and signs up for whatever it is they
have to offer. They have a lot.
At first CRS seems to be something like one of those elaborate prank-pulling
firms, mixed with a live-action role-playing game. Little things go wrong in
Van Orton's life -- his briefcase gets stuck, his pen explodes, etc. -- but
they add up and go from being nuisances to outright maddening. Soon he's
running down an alley with attack dogs tearing his shoes off. Soon after
that he's being followed, stolen from, shot at, drowned, blown up, and
stranded south of the border, and I think I've missed more than a few
things. Through all of this, Van Orton tries to maintain his sanity and
enlist whoever he can to find out what's really going on.
The whole purpose of the game, of course, is self-encapsulating: Van Orton
is driven to find out who's screwing with him, and is then inspired to do
leaps of amateur detective work (and pure sweat). What starts as an irritant
becomes a way for him to re-evaluate how he deals with his life -- something
like full-contact est, although I doubt est was ever conducted from the
barrel of a submachine gun. It's a neat idea, but it's not quite played out
to its fullest here; the way the broken connections in his life are handled
are sewn up on the level of a bad TV docudrama, while the movie's real plot,
as frightening and convincing as it is, takes place in a completely
different world.
The movie's technical and thespian credits are top-notch. Fincher makes the
movie's backdrops and environments into genuinely threatening and harsh
places to be, not just movie sets; he immerses us the way SE7EN ate at the
senses as well. Douglas does a fine job of portraying a man whose nerves are
being frayed, then re-braided by hand. And Sean Penn does a nice turn as Van
Orton's brother. (Look fast for Fincher regular Mark Boone Jr. as a greasy
private eye, too.)
All of this doesn't change the fact that I felt a little put off by the
movie's conclusion. Without ruining anything, I'll say this: given the level
of psychic sadism shown in the movie, it's more than a little astonishing
that we get the ending we do. Maybe I was expecting the wrong thing, but
this is one of those movies where a Grand Guignol ending would have been a
perfect cap to the movie's deranged mission. Instead, we get a closed-ended
logic that while symmetrical, isn't nearly as satisfying as the tastes of
anarchy that we got throughout. But the ride is freaky and entertaining, and
unquestionably a shade different from the run of the mill.
POSTSCRIPT: ROT13 SPOILER DISCUSSION. DECODE AT YOUR OWN RISK.
Urer vf zl pbzcynvag, fcryyrq bhg n yvggyr zber rkcyvpvgyl. Ina Begba vf yrq
gb oryvrir gung gur tnzr vf n tvnag fpnz qrfvtarq gb frcnengr uvz sebz uvf
zbarl. Jung V rkcrpgrq onfrq ba gung frghc jnf guvf pbapyhfvba:
Nsgre Ina Begba fvtaf gur "ovyy" sebz PEF naq unaqf vg onpx gb uvf oebgure,
uvf oebgure gheaf, jnyxf bss, naq tevaf rabezbhfyl. Gur jubyr guvat JNF n
fpnz -- gur purpx sbe gur fvtarq "ovyy" jvyy tb qverpgyl vagb uvf cbpxrg,
naq gura ur naq PEF jvyy vaqrrq inavfu sbe tbbq. V zragvbarq guvf gb frireny
crbcyr, jub ehrshyyl fnj jung V zrnag. Ohg abguvat bs gur xvaq gnxrf cynpr,
bs pbhefr.

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
CAPSULE: Silly and inane adaptation of Gibson's short story, which is
nowhere in sight. Gibson's script only adds insult to injury.
JOHNNY MNEMONIC is an awesomely bad movie. I say "awesomely" because it's
one thing to fail, but another thing entirely to fail so completely that
even the chances for camp value are sabotaged.
Keanur Reeves (who is terrible) stars as Johnny, an "information courier"
who can carry dozens of gigabytes of data in his head. He is given "one
last job" (whenever you are in a movie and you hear those words, RUN),
which involves him shoving so much data into his cranium that it could be
lethal. One of the neater touches that the movie brings in is that the only
way he could make such an arrangement work was by ditching all of his
childhood memories, but it's only followed up on in a token fashion.
For his trouble, Johnny gets chased by the Yakuza, who seem to be the new
bad guys in all the high-tech thrillers. What's funny is that if you watch
gangster movies made *in* Japan, there are whole gobs of details about
genuine Yakuza behavior and ethics, but of course there's no room in this
movie for any of that. The Yakuza are simply used to point guns, wave
swords, flaunt tattoos, and grimace menacingly. (I could go on about how
gangsters and criminals of many other ethnicities have gotten thoughtful
examinations in the movies -- BOUND BY HONOR, SUGAR HILL and AMERICAN ME
come to mind -- when Asians remain perpetually stereotyped. But that's
another essay.)
Anyway, Johnny runs and eventually winds up in Newark. Why Newark? Maybe
because it was cheaper to fake a future Newark than a future New York,
that's why. There, he meets an assortment of odd characters (Ice-T, Dolph
Lundgren and Henry Rollins play a whole gallery of weirdos). The script
deals with them with all the depth of pieces of furniture. It turns out
(what else?) that the data in Johnny's head could save a lot of people, but
of course Johnny only wants it out of his head so it doesn't kill him.
Handled right, this could have been absorbing, but the script manages to
mangle any chance of real sympathy for Johnny at every opportunity. 
The details about the look and feel of the future are all phoned in from
other, better movies -- BLADE RUNNER and BRAZIL come to mind. Everything
looks run-down and scummy, everyone dresses like they're punk rockers, and
videophones are commonplace. Snore. The only really interesting flourish is
an extended depiction of the way the Internet might work in the future
(complete with VR goggles and feedback gloves), but I kept thinking that it
was more like what some relatively un-technical fellow would *think* it
would look and behave like. A hacker of Johnny's caliber would be blasting
away with one command-line function after another, instead of wasting all
this time twiddling with holograms, but of course that's not cinematic.
Whatever.
What went wrong with this movie? Gibson wrote his own screenplay, which I
guess is part of the problem: what works as a short story doesn't work in a
movie. His ear for dialogue is terrible and the plot doesn't advance, it
convulses. From the script on out, it was probably all downhill. Renting
the movie to make fun of it is sort of pointless; there's no fun in kicking
a wounded dog, is there?

Title
Review for Faster Pussycat! Kill! Kill! (1965)
CAPSULE: Russ Meyer's most popular movie hasn't dated badly, and it serves as
the best introduction to the mammary-mad director.
I wasn't too sure what to think when John Waters raved in his memoirs that
FASTER, PUSSYCAT! was "the best film ever made". Chalk that up to Waters'
love of high-trash cinema, I guess. Exactly how much credit, and for what, to
give to Meyer is a seriously debatable question. One thing I don't doubt was
that he made a campy, magnetic, high-energy movie that hasn't dated all that
badly -- much better than many of the other movies he made at the time. (And
because all the eroticism is implied, that makes it only smuttier and
therefore more fascinating.)
FASTER, PUSSYCAT! gives us three go-go dancers who head out into the desert
to race their cars. (I couldn't help thinking that Meyer would have had
endless fun with a scene where one of them explains her ambitions to
eventually enter law school, making love to a support pillar during the whole
conversation.) After meeting up with a whitebread-innocent couple, Varla
(Tura Satana) gets fed up with being one-upped, and kills the guy with a few
well-placed karate blows. They kidnap the girl and keep her sedated while
trying to figure out what to do next -- although it sort of hits them over
the head: at a gas station, they learn than a weird old cripple and his sons
live in the area, harboring a massive fortune. No prizes for guessing what
happens next.
The movie's loaded with things that have since become pop-cinema staples:
bizarre camera angles and editing, improbable character pairings, bizarre
fights. One of the most memorable scenes has Satana vs. one of the old man's
sons. She's trying to run him into a wall with her speedster, and he's
holding her car at bay with his bare hands, the wheels digging a huge ditch.
Satana's idea of karate has nothing on Jackie Chan, but it's not hard to see
how a woman using violence against a man in the late Sixties, on-screen, could
be construed as *really* shocking. She isn't flashy; she's trying to do
damage. She means business.
As the model (or at least the center of inspiration) for the rest of the
women in the film, Tura Satana eats up the screen without even trying. She
reminds me of the extremely fetishistic, almost representational ways women
are depicted in X-rated Japanese manga: gigantic chest, mask-like face,
drill-instructor's voice. She reportedly received a deluge of fan mail after
the movie came out, mostly from men who either wanted to marry her or be
flogged by her. Most of the reason you can't look away from the screen is
her, and it's not because she's attractive, or even sexy. She's terrifying,
especially when Meyer shoves the camera down on the desert floor, somewhere
between her toes, and has her stare down at us.
What we wind up with, incredibly, is probably the wellspring of almost every
butch-femme empowerment image. I'm not sure Madonna or Pat Califa would exist
as we know them, without something like FASTER, PUSSYCAT! as part of the
ambient background noise in American culture. Then again, maybe I'm crediting
him with too much. But then I watched Ralph Fiennes get the cheese kicked out
of him by a green-haired punk girl in STRANGE DAYS, and thought: Maybe too
much credit isn't nearly enough!
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Money talks, but do dinosaurs run the marathon? In this movie
they do; too bad the humans don't shut up.
The worst part about THE LOST WORLD, like its prequel JURASSIC PARK,
is the humans.  I'm reminded, oddly, of the more-or-less equally
stupid humans in the garbage movie STARSHIP TROOPERS, who didn't know
when to leave well enough alone either. I've never enjoyed watching
movies that are about stupid people and don't know it, and THE LOST
WORLD is no different. It is a few gorgeously done effects surrounded
by Sargasso Seas of insanely dumb behavior. It's just so very, very
tired that I'm amazed they didn't just stick a sequel number on it and
dispense with the subtitle.
The plot (what there is of it) focuses on the dinosaurs who have more
or less colonized the island that the original Jurassic Park was
constructed on. It also brings back Ian Malcom (Jeff Goldblum), the
doom-saying mathematician of the first movie, although his presence
here isn't cemented: he's here because his wife is here, not because
of plot demands. That sounds odd, coming from someone who preaches
constantly about movies which have too much plot and too little
character, but the characterization in this movie is thin enough that
I was willing to reverse my rules for the time being. For enemies, we
get a gang of hunters who want to bring back a T.Rex. What're they
going to do, mount the head on the wall?
The story is handled in a manner I could call "Spielberg lite": the
strained relationships between the generations, the urgent
quasi-liberal flavor to the movie's "themes", the moments of breakneck
action. In this movie they add up to virtually nothing, because it's
not happening to anyone who merits our attention.  Malcom we know
about, but what's so important about him (or his wife or kid, for that
matter) that we need to spend two hours with them? Aside from the way
they nursemaid a baby dinosaur (and get the tar mauled out of them for
doing so, in a scene of exponentially-exploding preposterousness),
nothing. They're only smart enough to get them out of whatever the
plot hands them. There's no sense that they're actually INVOLVED in
any of this.
There are so many little betrayals that contribute to the big
betrayals as well.  For instance. Pete Postlewaite's character,
allegedly a big game hunter, apparently doesn't even know how to hold
his rifle to prevent it from filling up with rainwater. The incidental
roles, like the sleazy corporate people (who get eaten and stepped on
like jelly beans), aren't filled out with any details that would make
them more interesting as anything except set-pieces.
There is a magnificent book out there called DINOTOPIA. It is a work
of real vision, a story about a world where the dinosaurs did not die
out and were in fact domesticated by man. Buy it and read it with your
children, and spare them the tiresomeness of this movie -- and the one
that preceded it, and the one(s) that will almost certainly follow it.

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
CAPSULE: Dumb dud of an entry in the BODY HEAT sweepstakes, and now
something of a landmark for having spawned a jillion clones.
BASIC INSTINCT's worst crime is that it's not just a bad movie, but in many
ways, an incompetent one as well. It's stupid in itself, and stupid to
think its audience is as stupid as it is. It's supposed to be a thriller,
but the plot is dead on its feet, and ultimately arbitrary; it's only put
into the movie to jerk us around. It's also supposed to be sexy, but it's
instead got the unpleasant rawness of a teenager showing younger kids his
collections of dirty pictures. It's a ripoff.
The story opens with a rock star being murdered while in the throes of
orgasm. The biggest suspect is an authoress, Catherine Tramell (Sharon
Stone), who wrote a novel in which the murder was eerily presaged. Or maybe
it's the work of a copycat? These and other plot threads get fed to the
detective who's on the case (Michael Douglas), who has a few problems
himself. Like we wonder if his elevator goes to the top floor. We can
measure with a stopwatch the time from them setting eyes on each other to
the moment they are doing the mattress dance.
Joe Eszterhas has written the screenplay, and he uses a device that he used
before in the much better JAGGED EDGE: the killer's identity is kept a
secret until the movie's final shot. This isn't in itself a problem -- the
problem is that up until that point, we've been given nothing to work with.
Every clue in the movie -- EVERY clue -- is ambiguous. The whole thriller
aspect of the movie is a shill.
Red herrings, dead plot threads, violence, and kinky sexuality litter the
movie like potholes in Manhattan streets. They add up to zip, because
they're not happening to people we care about. Douglas's character is
foulmouthed and bitter and that's it; Stone's character has an iron-on
smile that never changes; the rest are forgettable. When we don't even have
the luxury of giving a damn about anyone in the movie, who cares what
happens in it? Especially with an ending that is not only unsatisfying, but
in many ways inexplicable? (A friend of mine once came up with a rule of
thumb about movie characters: "If no one in the movie behaves like anyone
you know, or would *care* to know, JUST LEAVE!")
One of the nastier things about the movie is the way it treats lesbianism
not as an integral part of someone's life, but as a kind of kink --
something to thrill men with. I despair whenever I encounter this kind of
stupidity in mainstream entertainment; are we still so culturally
Neanderthal that the only way to include something like that in a
big-budget Hollywood film is as a Hefnerism?

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
CAPSULE: A love story hidden inside a half-serious thriller, and the love
story comes out on top.
A friend of my mother's is a compulsive collector of odd trivia. One night
she came back after a cab ride with six photocopied pages of closely-packed
conspiracy theory gibberish, which the cabdriver had apparently foisted off
on her after lecturing her about the evils of technology. I guess both she
and screenwriter Brian Helgeland must've ridden in the same cab, because
CONSPIRACY THEORY takes that kernel of an idea, wraps a love story around
it, and milks it quite nicely.
The cabbie in the movie is named Jerry Fletcher, and is played by Mel
Gibson. So many of his previous roles featured him playing intensely
masculine and assertive roles, so it comes as a shock when we see him
gibbering and waving his fingers around like squid's tentacles and
motormouthing his way through the opening credits about everything from what
they put into the water to who killed JFK. He's a nut.
He's also a nut with a case of puppy-dog erotomania, and the object of his
affection is a woman who works in the Justice Department -- Alice Sutton,
whose father, a judge, died under bizarre circumstances. Fletcher and Sutton
know each other: he comes to her office with another wacko theory every
week, and she tolerates his presence, if only because he saved her from some
muggers once. But she's clearly only going to take so much of him at a time,
and she's not charmed by him. At least at first.
One day Fletcher comes under the attention of some shadowy characters, and
is abducted and put through a serio-comic chamber of horrors that makes the
"dentist's chair" scene in MARATHON MAN look positively comforting. After
that, he's no longer just kooky -- he's charged with the convinction that
someone really IS after him. Convincing Alice, on the other hand, is another
story.
The plot unspools in several directions at once, but it doesn't come up with
anything that leaves us tearing out the cushions of our seats in amazement:
the movie isn't working in that direction. The timing in every scene is
comic, and the relationship between Jerry and Alice is like a mutant version
of a screwball comedy where the society dame is pestered by the resourceful
grocery boy. It is, at heart, a relatively sweet-natured story. Sounds
strange considering that a good deal of the plot concerns stuff which almost
any other movie would have made X-FILES-bleak and BLADE RUNNER-black, but
the movie tries something neat and for the most part makes it. Who'd've
thunk it: a date movie about MK-ULTRA?

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
I admire Tim Burton as a director, even if I don't always enjoy his movies.
THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS is a beautiful example of what can happen
when his imagination is given free rein. MARS ATTACKS! on the other hand,
feels like a dry run -- a $50,000 cheapie that someone decided to make for
$50 million. 
See, if MARS *had* been one of the cheapies it pretends to send up,
it would at least have camp value. But this is a) an expensive Hollywood
production by a director whose last project was a dramatization of the life
and times of a director who made just such movies, so the results seem
curiously dadaistic in a way, and b) an attempt to send up camp -- which is
basically bringing coals to Newcastle. Campy movies aren't worth sending up
because they have already done the job for you.
MARS is supposed to be campy, but it only manages to be a shaky
imitation of camp. It also tries to be funny -- tries too hard, in my
opinion, and is only funny in moments. As a whole, it's not funny, it's
irritating, because it blows so many of its best moments by not bothering
to develop them. For a movie that cost *that* much to make, it's
astonishingly lazy.
One of the first things we see is lots of Martian flying saucers
approaching Earth -- LOTS of them, in a nicely done CGI job. What struck me
is that someone went to great, loving lengths to make the saucers look as
much like a mid-50's bad-SF movie flying saucer as possible. It reminded me
of Warhol's soup can paintings, somehow: we are at a point where just
presenting an icon is supposed to evoke something: laughs. In this case,
it's camp, but as I said before, sending up camp is something of a fool's
errand. You can't kid a kidder.
The plot is about what you'd expect. The aliens come, there is some
kind of diplomatic misuderstanding no thanks to a screwed-up translation
machine, and the war is on. Actually, the movie is so clumsy in its
handling of its plot that it's never clear if the Martians were just
playing with our heads from the beginning, or if in fact the translation
machine is screwed up, etc. Purists would no doubt insist that it's sort of
beside the point, but the movie makes such a big deal out of some of these
things in the first place that afterwards we wonder why they even bothered
talking about them in the first place. To get laughs, of course, but the
usual cliches about how the machine is "almost ready this time" aren't
funny; they're hardly even groundwork for a good joke.
The biggest problem with the movie is the story, or lack of one.
Any one thing that's funny in a movie is even funnier when it's given a
context, and the contexts in MARS ATTACKS! were skimmed over, skimped on,
or handled with a clumsiness that made me wonder if the movie had received
some kind of major editing-room surgery at the last minute. Some of the
scenes just drift off into space, or are so jarringly contrasted with
others, that it almost feels like we're channel-surfing.
The Martians aren't interesting as villains, and the Earthlings
that we get to see aren't that interesting as heroes. (An example: Rod
Steiger plays a bullet-headed warmongering general. Period. No attempt is
made to make his character *functionally* interesting: he's just an excuse
for Steiger to indulge in the usual actor's business.) This is not the same
as the DR. STRANGELOVE approach, in which everyone is more or less equally
buffoonish; here, they're too dull, really, to be buffoonish. We don't see
why the movie is wasting time with them.
I mentioned the effects are clearly expensive and very well-done,
but they don't serve much more of a purpose than to frantically kick the
movie in the ass and drive it along. Subplots come up, are re-examined in
cursory and unsatisfying ways, and many of the scenes play out to no real
purpose. As a result, every joke becomes a throwaway. The movie quickly
reduces itself to a pattern where lots of cameo characters are set up in
walk-ons, reappear to deliver one-liners, and then get annihilated when
they meet Martians.
One good example of how the script wastes its time is a scene in
which one of the alien bodies is being dissected. The entire punch line of
the scene has the scientist character (played by Pierce Brosnan) sticking
his hand into the alien's skull and coming away with a fistful of green
slime. "Curious," he mutters. End of scene. This scene could have been a
great source of laughs -- for instance, why didn't they take the chance to
make fun of the recent "Alien Autopsy Footage!" scam? Now right there is
one more funny idea, I bet, than most of the ones you could find in the
movie.

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
I don't know what I was expecting from "Pitch Black", but certainly not an
extraordinarily slick and well-made little SF action movie.  Made for less
than the catering costs of some big-budget films, "Pitch Black" has the same
flavor of "The Terminator" or "The Hidden", other indie SF adventures that
made good on little resources.
The premise: A spacecraft with human cargo in deep-freeze gets blasted by a
meteor shower. Many of the passengers die, and the female second-in-command
(Radha Mitchell) jettisons many of the other passengers as a way of trying
to stabilize the craft for a crash landing.  The crash, by the way, is
spectacularly well staged, and shows how much can be accomplished on a small
budget these days with good computer graphics.
The planet itself is a sun-scorched wasteland -- actually, three suns, each
keeping the planet bathed in perpetual daytime.  The survivors salvage what
they can from the wreck (there are the usual Robinson Crusoe cliches, but
they're done with style) -- and then people start vanishing, and then
turning up dead in grisly ways.
Turns out one of the passengers is Raddick (Vin Diesel), a multiple murderer
and sociopath who has had his eyes surgically altered so that he can see in
darkness.  He is adamant, though, that he's not the one who's been
slaughtering people.  "You got a lot more to be afraid of than me around
here," he says enigmatically.  He is right. Do the captain and the killer
band together to fight off what's worse than either of them?  Do bears shine
their shoes in the woods?
There's a lot more to the film, of course, a good deal of which is not to be
spoiled, and some of which is painfully obvious.  What struck me, though,
was not the plot (which isn't particularly original,and frankly has holes
you could drive the Death Star through), but the level of craftsmanship on a
small budget and the smartly-written script.  Part of the production was
Australian; there's an edge and a wit to the lines that a wholly American
movie wouldn't have. At one point one of the younger passengers shows off
his knife skills and his intended victim retorts, "Did you run away from
your parents when they were younger, or did they run away from you?"
I appreciate the effort it takes to make a good, entertaining film.  "Pitch
Black" is not a work of art and will not live forever, but it is fun to
watch and is several notches above the usual level of SF-themed junk that
Hollywood grinds out anually.  And probably cost a lot less.

Title
Review for Sorcerer (1977)
CAPSULE: A haunting remake of the French classic THE WAGES OF FEAR, which
takes on a vicious life of its own.
In principle I'm against remakes. Rare is the remake that is not a pallid
carbon copy of its predecessor, as was the case with the wretched DIABOLIQUE
(which, ironically enough, was created by the same man who also created
WAGES, Henri-Georges Clouzot). SORCERER is by William Friedkin and manages
to escape that trap through a show of surreal visual power. The movie
lingers in the mind long after others have evaporated, if for no other
reason than because it presents us with some really astonishing things to
look at.
Unlike the previous movie, which confined itself more or less to one locale,
SORCERER spends its first forty-five minutes globe-hopping and setting up
its four main characters. Nilo (Francisco Rabal) is a cold and dispassionate
killer of international repute. Kassem (Anidou) is a Palestinian terrorist.
Victor Manzon (Bruno Cremer), a French financial whiz, has a wife he loves
dearly, but he is forced to abandon her when a business deal goes south and
a partner kills himself. Finally, Scanlon (Roy Scheider) is a smalltime
Jersey hood who has to flee the country when he offends a mob boss by
knocking over the poor box in his church.
Three of them flee to an unidentified Central American country -- with all
the globehopping, it's the only locale that's not announced with a title
card -- and hide out as menial laborers for an oil company. The country is
overseen by a military junta; life is meager and hateful. There's no way out
-- until a well accident forces the company to scrounge for suicide drivers.
They need someone who can drive four cases of *sweating* dynamite (which
could explode for no reason at all) across 218 miles of jungle. The fourth,
the assassin, shows up later (he's been sent after Scanlon) and is roped
into the mission after a disaster forces them to get another man.
The movie quickly sets itself up as a case study in desperation. All of them
want out: the money promised by the company for the job will set them free,
but there's a good chance they'll blow themselves up in the attempt. They
have to build two trucks to haul the stuff more or less from scratch. The
odds they face are sickening: outdated maps, bad weather, and a rope bridge
they have to drive BOTH trucks across. (This last scene is most astonishing
for a number of reasons, not the least of which being that it appears to
have been totally unfaked.) At one point they are stopped cold by a fallen
tree; at another, they are held at gunpoint by soldiers. There's no easy way
out of anything -- not even death, which comes all too easy for the wrong
reasons. All of this is set to a mesmerizing and eerie Tangerine Dream score
that is well worth seeking out.
SORCERER is agonizing and draining, and in the end, highly existential. It's
not a movie you feel like celebrating life with, but it stays with you long
after it vanishes from your eyes. Comparing it with its original isn't
really the best thing to do -- better to see it as a brother. A very twisted
and ugly brother, but a brother nonetheless.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
"The Sixth Sense" absolutely blind-sided me.  I don't know what I was
expecting, in retrospect -- maybe something along the lines
of "Poltergeist", with the spirits of the dead tormenting children in a
special effects showdown.  What I got was an absolutely breath-stopping
story that probably ranks as one of the best movies of the whole year.
"The Sixth Sense" could be considered the antithesis of "The
Haunting".  That movie, with its gum-wrapper screenplay and gobs of
CGI, inspired more audiences to laugh and sneer than to be scared or
even thrilled.  "The Sixth Sense" has the most minimal of surfaces
concealing one of the most remarkable of stories, and needs no CGI to
make its magic work.
Bruce Willis, in an atypically restrained and gentle role, plays Malcom
Crowe, a gifted child psychologist.  As the movie opens, he is
confronted by one of his ex-patients, who rants that Crowe has failed
him, and to punctuate this point turns a gun on himself.  One year
later, we find Crowe, humbled and sinking down into himself, estranged
from his wife, and working on a new case: a young boy named Cole (Haley
Joel Osment), who is withdrawn and fearful.
One of the most shameless things that happened during the marketing of
this movie was how several key secrets were revealed during the
promotions.  I don't want to make the same mistakes again, so allow me
to tread very carefully here.  Cole's terror comes from a peculiar gift
he has, one which makes him very much a pariah and an outcast, but for
reasons which become clearer later on.  Crowe isn't sure what to make
of the gift -- is the boy lying to get attention? -- but slowly casts
more and more of his beliefs with the boy.
A description like this does not do this movie justice.  On the
surface, this is a fantastically well-made film: the timing and
presentation of every scene is flawless.  The director and
screenwriter, M. Night Shyamalan, was responsible for the enjoyable but
slight "Wide Awake" last year; nothing in that movie seemed to presage
what "The Sixth Sense" would offer.  Shyamalan has managed to infuse
every scene in this movie with a primal dread that most other films
can't even come close to.
Volumes have been written about Hale Joel Osment, as Cole.  He is half
the reason the film works as well as he does: his hollowed-out eyes,
creaky voice, and disturbing visual tics let him steal every scene he's
in.  What's better is that it's not simply a gimmick performance; it's
all inserted into the movie for a reason.
One of the most astounding things about this movie -- and again, I'm
trying hard not to ruin anything -- is the way it plays on assumed
knowledge.  There is a revelation at the end, which I will not discuss
here, that forces us to COMPLETELY re-evaluate everything we have seen
and take it in a new light.  Even better, it doesn't come off as a
gratuitous gimmick, but as something that needs to happen to allow the
characters their final moment of peace.
"The Sixth Sense" is the kind of rare movie that makes up for a whole
season's worth of mediocrities and disappointments.  See it, and for
God's sake, don't ruin it for your friends.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
What an offensive and repellent movie this is.  "Patch Adams" has garnered
praise from audiences everywhere, but that only underscores the idea that no
one ever went broke underestimating the taste of the American public.
Drawn to some extent from a true story, it tells us about a fellow named,
yes, Patch Adams (Robin Williams), who checks into a mental hospital as the
movie starts.  He's suicidal, but he quickly finds that the patients are more
help to him than the doctors are.  A more cynical, knowing movie would have
addressed this by making Patch think, gee, maybe there are people worse off
than me, but instead we're subjected to the dishonest fiction that in the
asylum, it's the doctors who are really the sick ones.
Patch enrolls in medical school and is given the hardline about medicine by
Dean Walcott (Bob Gunton): "We are going to take the humanity out of you and
make you into something BETTER," he intones ominously.        Anyone who has seen
more than two movies in their lifetime will instantly realize that the
Walcott character is being set up for us as a strawman, and that this film is
a stacked deck.
Patch fights back against the "impersonality" of medicine by trying to be
every patient's best friend, a Holy Fool to the invalids.  The only problem
is that he does this by being an unholy pain in the ass.  He puts bedpans on
his feet and tapdances; he cuts off the ends of enema bulbs and sticks them
on his nose; he straps himself to a motorized bed and feigns being thrown
around on it. It's not that any of this stuff is unfunny, but that it's
wrongheaded.  Any doctor started jollying me up like this, I'd phone my HMO.
I said the movie was a stacked deck, and there isn't a scene that doesn't go
towards reinforcing that.  Adams is the free-spirited rebel, the
nonconformist, and everyone who stands in his way is just a stuffed-shirt
with no blood in their veins.  This is neither true nor convincing.  If the
movie had an ounce of honesty, it would show that people who assume the role
of the rebel or nonconformist do not often do it out of altruism or
benevolence, but out of immaturity or the need for attention.  Break a
window, and poof! you're a rebel.
The film's gears are loud and persistent.  Patch has (no!) a Love Interest
(Monica Potter), who serves no purpose in the story except to die at the worst
possible time and throw Patch into a (manufactured) pit of despair from which
he must climb out.  And once he does climb out, there's a giant piece of
speechmaking for him at the end of the movie, where Patch cries out against
modern medicine's cold heart, etc., etc.
This I could have tolerated, but there is one additional piece of shameless
manipulation that left me speechless.  On cue, the doors open, and in come a
whole slew of sick children, chemotherapy patients that Patch gave enema-ball
noses to earlier.  The scene is horribly false in so many ways that I can
barely count them.  One, if those children are as ill as we have been led to
believe, what are they doing out of bed?  And two, isn't this a blatant
ripoff of the equally bogus scene in the equally bogus "Dead Poets Society"
(also a Robin Williams vehicle) where all those kids stand on their desks in
"protest"?
It's one thing to be sentimental, but it's another thing entirely to use
sentimentality in the service of a foolish, exploitive story.  "Patch Adams"
is not a three-hanky movie -- it's a subsidy plan for a Kleenex factory.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mishima: A Life in Four Chapters (1985)
CAPSULE: A magnificent and appropriately disturbing treatment of the life
and times of Japan's most famous and controversial writer.
Yukio Mishima is the man Japan wants to forget, but cannot, and most of that
may be due to the way he chose to live -- and end -- his life. On November
25, 1970, he occupied an army garrison with several comrades-in-arms, took a
general hostage, and demanded to address the soldiers. After a
nearly-inaudible harangue in which he tried to exhort the men to reinstate
the Emperor as the absolute authority (instead of the prime minister), he
went back inside amid jeering and insults. There, he committed seppuku, and
was beheaded by one of his followers. What appalled his countrymen so much
was not that he had killed himself, but that he had done so in a manner
which had been considered gauche and tasteless -- and for something which
most of his fellow Japanese no longer considered important.
But it was important to him, and MISHIMA, a complex and beautifully-mounted
movie by Paul Schrader, works inside-out from the man's mind to show how he
came to end his life in so theatrical and obsessive a fashion.
The movie opens on the day of his death and interleaves the action during
that time with the rest of his life: his insecure, highly cloistered
childhood (during which the seeds of his death-obsession and homosexuality
sprouted); his confused youth (he was not drafted due to health reasons and
never forgave himself for not being able to serve his country); and his
meteoric rise to literary success. His own writings, which were often highly
autobiographical in tone if not in fact, are spoken on the soundtrack by Roy
Scheider. Mishima was an absorbing and highly skilled writer, and that is
demonstrated to tremendous effect.
The movie's look deserves to be brought back in widescreen glory; the only
prints available are on a panned-and-scanned VHS tape. Mishima's life is
presented in crisp black-and-white; the scenes from his novels, which are
used to comment on his own life and his perceptions of his country, are
filmed in stylized, theatrical Technicolor, and shrouded in a pulsating and
eerie Philip Glass score. The film is mostly in Japanese (Paul Schrader's
script was translated)  which provokes the question of whether a Japanese
filmmaker could have treated this material at all.
If the movie has any failings, it's only because of the material's focus,
and possibly because of restrictions on the subject matter imposed by his
estate. Mishima's adult homosexuality is treated very quietly, and there's
no mention of his wife and children. But none of these things detract from
the movie's ultimate purpose: to show us a man, tortured and divided against
himself, who chose to act on his beliefs to a degree that few men dared
consider -- and to give us a sense of empathy for him, rather than scorn.

Title
Review for When We Were Kings (1996)
CAPSULE: A perfect evocation of a defining moment in time for two men and
two nations.
I was just old enough to remember the adoration and respect that Muhammad
Ali commanded -- not just from blacks, but from everyone. He was an artist,
and boxing was his medium. He *was* The Greatest: he embodied his ambitions
perfectly. He had come out of exile, as it were, to fight a fresh young
contender (George Foreman), and he won.
WHEN WE WERE KINGS is a documentary -- one of the best ever made, quite
frankly -- that takes that moment in time, the "Rumble in the Jungle", and
makes it feel like it's happening to us now.
Most of the footage in WHEN WE WERE KINGS had been stranded in limbo for
decades, the victim of an ugly legal entanglement. Having it brought back to
the light of day is important, because there are so many people today --
black, white, young, old -- who either don't remember Ali's impact, or have
forgotten. The movie's power is in that it takes mere images of Ali and the
men who remembered him and were near him at the time and makes them feel as
though they are entering the room with us. In a curious way, this movie may
actually work better on TV than in a theater, because of the intimacy
factor.
The one thing that the movie makes clear, almost without trying: Ali
commanded respect just by being there. Even his speech had the rhythm of his
body and his movements: "I fought a rock. I punished a brick. I'm so bad I
make medicine sick!" In print, the words lose their life; hearing them come
out of his mouth, you understand how so many found him charismatic --
especially the Africans in Zaire, who saw in him a brother in arms.
George Foreman, on the other hand, couldn't have been more of an opposite.
When George Foreman arrived in Zaire, he was seen as an outsider in many
ways: he brought his dogs with him, which reminded the people of the
brutality under colonial rule. (Even more shocking: few in Africa knew he
was black until he arrived.) Foreman was a punishingly brutal fighter: when
he finished with a punching bag, there was a dent in it that could have held
water. (One rather cruelly apt joke, courtesy of Richard Pryor, summed up
his approach: "Foreman's got the most unique boxing style... None. The bell
ring, and he come out -- 'Which one the referee? 'Cos I 'mo *kill* the other
motherf___er.'")
In private, Ali sensed that others were certain he could not win -- he was,
after all, 33, while Foreman was young and fresh. But he was in it for the
challenge, not for the winning -- while Foreman approached the whole thing
as a fait accompli. The more you see of the two of them, the starker the
contrast: Ali was privately reflective and publicly brash; Foreman was
nearly subverbal everywhere.
The fight itself takes up very little of the movie's running time, and
that's an intelligent decision, because we instead get the context we need
to understand what happened. Foreman used up so much of his energy in trying
to punish Ali into instant submission, that Ali was able to unleash his
energy in reserve and KO Foreman almost at once. A frightening theory, but
everything we see supports it.
The most wonderful thing about the movie is how it makes everything it
discusses seem immediate and real. Documentaries tend to deal with the past
as a closed chapter, over and done. This one approaches a story of legendary
proportions like it's news. I can't think of a better way to do it.

Title
Review for Top o Nerae! (1989) (V)
Gunbuster / Toppu o nerae! ("Aim for the Top!") (1989)
A movie review by Serdar Yegulalp
Copyright 1997 by Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Transcends its juvenile source material to become a really unique
and powerful anime about love, growth and loss.
GUNBUSTER started silly, then grew and grew until it reached a climax that
knocked the wind out of me. The audience I was with expected a lightweight
girls-and-big-robots story, but they got seriously rocked back on their
psychic heels during the three-plus hour course of this remarkable anime.
GUNBUSTER tells the story of Noriko, a young girl hellbent on piloting mecha
for Earth's space navy. From the opening scenes, she has a long way to go:
she barely even knows the controls -- it's like one of those war-movie
sequences where the novice pilot has a crib sheep taped to the windscreen).
But the coach -- named, appropriately enough, Coach -- sees that she has
determination, and nourishes that thoroughly. Noriko eventually befriends
two other pilots: Yuriko, who plays a "big sister" role to her, and Jung
Freud, a Russian girl who is at first a rival, and then an incredible pillar
of strength in the later part of the movie.
As they get into the thick of combat, a new element comes into play: time
dilation. A mission which takes only five minutes subjectively causes six
months to elapse on Earth. This isn't new, but the way the movie handles it
is unique: the time-dilation effect causes Noriko to remain the same age
while the others, especially "big siser" Yuriko, age relativistically.
Ultimately it's Noriko who becomes the big sister, in a perversely brilliant
set of psychological twists, and has to summon her own strength to save the
ones who helped her before. This is the movie's greatest asset: it takes
cliched notions and then slowly turns them inside out over time, revealing a
genuine core of emotion we didn't suspect was even possible.
The long, drawn-out final chapter of the movie is some of the most
emotionally harrowing time I've spent in front of a screen. The filmmakers
letterboxed the final third and filmed it in *black and white* -- extremely
unusual for anime, of course, and with the net effect that we concentrate on
the characters and their climaxing dilemma, and not the pretty scenery.
And then we come to the coda scene, which is almost as jaw-dropping as the
closing shots of 2001 or PLANET OF THE APES. I will not describe it -- but I
will say that it must be seen in context, after the agony and anguish of the
previous segments and the cosmic upping of the ante have come and gone.

Title
Review for Blade Runner (1982)
CAPSULE: The godfather of modern science fiction films earns every bit of
its culthood, its influence, its longevity, and even its pretensions.
There is something very intimidating in the way BLADE RUNNER has so
completely lionized the sphere of the imagination in sf, in movies, in
culture, in futureology, in a whole heap of things that would previously
not seemed to have much potential to inform each other. But they have.
BLADE RUNNER is not just a movie -- and a remarkable one at that -- but a
cultural reference point, a landmark.
When movies like CITIZEN KANE, 2001, LAWRENCE OF ARABIA and GONE WITH THE
WIND were released, they changed how movies of their kind -- and many other
kinds -- were thought about, conceived, executed, and dealt with. BLADE
RUNNER did the same, not only with sf movies in general, but with the whole
*act* of looking into the future. The hokey glittering utopias of movies
like LOGAN'S RUN had been replaced with a perpetually extended now, a world
in which one layer of jury-rigging on top of another was "progress". This
was what the future as we knew it *felt* like.
The plot is basic noir, given a techno-injection. Harrison Ford plays Rick
Deckard, a "blade runner" -- a police assassin whose specialty is hunting
down "replicants", or androids that have gone renegade. He retired, but is
now being dragged back in for one last job that involves several extremely
advanced and dangerous "skin jobs", as replicants are snidely termed. The
irony of the replicants' plight is plain: the motto of the company that
makes them is "More Human Than Human", but their inherent lack of dignity
and their built-in obsolescence -- a calculated four-year life span --
renders them pitiful. Deckard has pity for them, and cannot own up to it.
There is also Rachel, a replicant who is the prototype for the models he
has been sent to destroy, who was given false memories as a way of making
her more credibly human, and it works so well that Deckard finds himself
drawn to her. And then there is Roy, the vicious but also angrily
philosophical ringleader of the replicants, who rages against the dying of
his light -- a noble enemy who has a lesson for Rick in the end.
Ford's acting is monotonous; deliberately so. He is playing a character, as
we soon see, who either does not have emotions to begin with, or has
systematically cut himself off from them. (In which case, what's the
difference?) And in that light, the hokey narration that was slathered on
top of the original release to "clarify" the movie's substance seems
weirdly appropriate. The acting, both in his case and throughout the movie,
works through the accumulation of details -- it's never any one thing, but
everything: the way he says "Kiss me", the way he tries to drink and gets
blood in his glass, the way he bluffs his way into an exotic dancer's
dressing room.
And then there is the movie's look, which has been copied and slavishly
imitated in comics, in other movies, books, advertising, and God knows what
else. In other movies, we felt like we were looking at sets; BLADE RUNNER
makes us feel like we're peeking *into* the future, it's so closed-ended,
total, and convincing. The haunting Vangelis score makes the already-wide
scope of the movie seem even broader, almost operatic -- especially in
scenes like the one where Roy confronts his maker and doesn't like what he
finds.
BLADE RUNNER had a difficult production history -- much of the budget and
production value for the movie was supplied by the Shaw Brothers kung-fu
filmmaking house -- and was critically rejected and commerically
unsuccessful on its first release. Audiences who were used to Ford's
Indiana Jones / Han Solo schtick were turned off by the brooding,
introspective Rick Deckard. The brutal violence and overall atmosphere of
gloom didn't help things either - and still make the movie overwhelming on
first viewing.
In fact, BLADE RUNNER is a movie that demands being seen at least twice --
once to get the spectacle and shock value of the movie assimilated, and
another time to let the story unwind and present itself. Beyond the look
and feel, the story and theme of BLADE RUNNER show great promise of
withstanding the test of time and making the film not only prophetic, but
deep and true.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
THE SWEET HEREAFTER is not the first film I have cried in, but certainly one
of the few where I felt unashamed of what I was being invited to weep over.
This is one of the best films ever made about the uncertainty of how to live
in the face of death and tragedy.  it is not a tearjerker that works with
dumb gimmicks like a terminal disease or a cute animal; it simply states a
condition, with merciless detail, and asks that we empathize.  We do.  It is
one of the best films about "the human condition" -- what a weatherbeaten
way to talk about life and death! -- since Kurosawa's IKIRU.
Somewhere in Canada, a township has suffered a terrible accident.  A busload
of fourteen schoolchildren went off the road, and all of them save two --
one student and the driver -- were killed.  A lawyer, Mitchell Stephens (Ian
Holm, in easily the best performance he has ever given), comes to this town
to represent the citizens in a class action suit.  Maybe they can get
something back -- not their children, certainly (and one of the citizens
tells him, bluntly, that there's nothing Stephens can do for him unless he
can raise the dead), but something is better than nothing, yes?
Stephens is himself in mourning for his own child.  His daughter is not
dead, but a drug addict, and in a way that's worse -- he gets to hear her
voice without being able to do anything to really help her, since she's
proven time and again that she's not trustable.  The first time we see him,
he's locked in a car wash, talking to his daughter on the cell phone.  She
is stuck in some unnamed city, trying to hustle him for more drug money.  He
mouths one nicety after another mechanically.  Holm's performance is fearful
and excellent, and only one of several excellent ones in this film.
The movie is not a formula legal thriller where everything hinges on some
plot twist or piece of hidden evidence, but rather a story about pain that
cannot be healed or dispelled with social mechanisms like lawsuits.  The
parents of some of the surviving children are depicted in spare, carefully
assembled scenes.  Some of them are hungry for any chance at redemption at
all, like the parents of the adopted Indian boy (Earl Pastko and Arsinee
Khanjian).  Some are bitter and numb, like the father who witnessed the
accident (Bruce Greenwood).  Some have lost just enough to know they are not
the only ones suffering, like the parents (Tom McCamus and Brooke Johnson)
whose talented daughter is now confined to a wheelchair for life.
Nicole (Sarah Polley), the girl singer, is a pivotal character, but for
reasons that sneak up on us gradually.  At first we think her character is
just going to be another meditation on soldiering on through life, no matter
what we're given, but the accident has done more than cripple her -- it's
starved her of a whole group of friends and peers.  (The movie uses the poem
"The Pied Piper" to great and tragic effect here -- a device that sounds
corny, but strikes like a hammer blow when its real meaning surfaces.)  She
is lonely, and wounded because of that.  Her performance, too, is excellent
-- she's not so emotionally distant that we feel annoyed for wanting to
empathize with her in the first place.
The story is drawn from a novel by Russell Banks, who had four of the main
characters tell the story in separate monologues.  The director, the gifted
Atom Egoyan, has chosen to take the book apart and reassemble it in a way
that jumps back and forth through time, but he does not use black and white
vs. color or other cheap cinematographic tricks to discern the past from the
present.  He simply lets each scene dictate its presence in the story's
whole through its emotional resonances, through what is shown and what is
only implied, and the result is incredibly nuanced and rich.
One of the ways we see the movie expose itself piece by piece is in a series
of scenes that take place on the flight back from the town.  Here, Holm's
character confesses a great deal about his daughter to a friend -- and in a
scene of utterly astounding emotional power, talks about when his daughter
almost died of an insect bite when she was a baby, and how he was confronted
with the possibility of having to perform an emergency tracheotomy on her
with a pocketknife.  The way this scene is deployed and the way Ian Holm's
voice ties it together and pushes it forward is masterful and heartbreaking,
not the least of which because he has saved her life before and now finds
himself saying about her, "I gave her all the love the father of a drug
addict could spare."
The film is also startlingly lovely.  I had the chance to read the script
before seeing the movie, and wondered: Would this just be a movie where the
characters sit around and talk to each other?  No; the town is seen in
elegantly composed shots that are like Wyeth paintings.  Egoyan has filmed
everything in a way that makes the events stand out starkly and brilliantly
on the screen, and has managed to find the colors in everything he points
the camera at without being flashy or distracting.  The only indulgence he
permits himself is in the very last shot, and by that time he's earned it.
And then there are those final scenes, in which we see the whole sad affair
of the lawsuit disintegrating as a key witness apparently falsifies a
testimony.  Why?  Since this is not a movie with a lockstep, closed-ended
plot, it's almost unfair to ask a question like that.  Some things cannot be
healed, the movie seems to be saying, and must simply be turned away from.
But some of us, sadly, cannot turn away, and are blinded as we look on.

Title
Review for Dangan ranna (1996)
"Dangan Runner" -- the word "Dangan" means "bullet" -- is one big chase
scene played for comic revelation.  Like a lot of action movies, there's a
climax where everyone's shooting at everyone else -- but in this case, it's
played as a tongue-in-cheek piece of black comedy instead of a serious
contest of strength.
"Dangan Runner" takes three people whose lives have bottomed out and
intertwines them in bizarre ways.  Tomoroh Taguchi (the quintessential
Japanese cult actor), as Yasuda, is a schlub who can't even hold down a
short-order cook job.  He tries to rob a bank, but even that collapses when
he realizes he's left his face mask at hime -- and the only mask he can find
at the corner convenience store (in a hilarious piece of montage) is a
children's-sized job.  In despair, he tries robbing the place, and winds up
shooting the store clerk, Aizawa (Daimond Yukai).
Aizawa has his own problems.  He's got a band (and judging from the brief
clip we see, where Yukai himself performs, they're pretty good), but he's
got a yakuza boss squeezing him for cash, a girlfriend who he doesn't care
for, and a drug addiction.  When Yasuda shoots him (it isn't much of a
wound, actually), Aizawa takes off after him, and they collide with Takeda.
Takeda is a yakuza protector, walking around in a funk because despite his
oaths of fealty, he chickened out when someone tried to attack his boss (and
let the man get stabbed to death).  Aizawa and Yasuda collide with him, and
an innocent bystander gets shot as well -- and now Takeda is after *them*.
And they run, run, run -- for something like 80% of the running time (pardon
the pun) of "Dangan Runner", in a crazy marathon of self-determination.
Each of them has a reason to keep going, and pretty soon it becomes all
that's holding them together.  (There are moments where the "marathon"
aspect is explicitly parodied, like when each of them grab free drinks being
offered at a promotional stand.  But the joke doesn't end there.)
Astute viewers will probably no doubt find similarities between this and
"Lola Rennt [Run Lola Run]", but "Dangan Runner" is its own animal, funny
and fast-moving.  There is a kind of a nod to the parallel-reality jaunting
of "Lola" -- in one screamingly funny scene, the three runners jog past a
pretty young woman, and each of them entertains varied pornographic
fantasies about her.  They're not alone in their dreaming, either: the cops
and the yakuza have their own hilariously-realized fantasies about how
they'd like things to unfold as well.
"Dangan Runner" is not the greatest movie ever made, but at 82 minutes it's
tight and fresh.  I understand that director Hiroyuki Tanaka is something of
a Great White Hope for Japanese film right now, and seeing this movie it's
not hard to see why.

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
CAPSULE: Big, stupid B-movie that would have been more fun if we could have
seen the strings from which the UFO models were hanging.
I waited a long time before codifying my feelings about INDEPENDENCE DAY, a
big, stupid movie that commanded a massive audience mostly by sheer
audacity. The trailers and promotional material for ID4 sold the flick on
one point: "In this movie, the world blows up. Come and see!"
Putting aside the basically reprehensible nature of this kind of hard sell,
what's left? An extremely expensive B picture that, because of its cost and
size and pretentiousness (yes, pretentiousness), isn't nearly as much fun
as it could have been. It's a surefire perpetual rental hit and frat-party
MST3K-style video keeper, but it's still incredibly dumb. (One of the
surest signs that Hollywood is losing its grip: MARS ATTACKS! which
post-dated ID4 and could have parodied that movie brilliantly, couldn't
even do *that* well. Figures.)
The plot is old, old, old. Big alien ships arrive and hover over our major
cities ("in exactly the same way that bricks don't" -- Douglas Adams). They
eventually start blowing everything up. (A very sarcastic underground-press
poster showed the shot of the White House getting blasted and the caption
PROOF OF ALIEN INTELLIGENCE.) Mankind finds a way to fight back. Everything
that hasn't been blown up in the first half of the movie is blown up in the
second half. The end. (At least until they decide to write "ID5".)
There are some moments throughout the movie, individual touches, that
garner a laugh or a shock. Will Smith's performance as a hot-dog pilot who
apparently seems to know how to fly alien spacecraft from having looked at
them is funny (and his monologue with an unconscious alien in the desert is
destined to become bumper-sticker material); he's probably the best thing
in the movie. But the movie as a whole is just impossibly stupid, a total
failure of real imagination. The effects are impressive, but they're
monolithic and unimaginative. (White House blows up. Empire State Building
blows up. And the picture of Lady Liberty, trashed, is more or less ripped
from PLANET OF THE APES. Et any number of ceteras.)
I mentioned pretentiousness. At various points during the flick, we're
allegedly supposed to have our sympathies enlisted for some sort of
patriotic revival, a feeling that good ole Ammurrican ingenuity will rise
up and remake the world once again. Give me a break. The low point of the
movie, in this vein, is a speech by Bill Pullman (playing a Clintonesque
[i.e., spineless?] president) which rather clumsily ties in the movie's
title with a rallying cry. I waited for someone to clobber him with a brick
and get on with it.
(Actually, maybe the real nadir was reached when the video game tie-in was
released a couple of weeks ago -- which is more enjoyable than anything the
*movie* has to offer.)
>From what I understand, a three-hour extended version of the movie will be
appearing sometime later this year on LaserDisc. I've been on trips to the
DMV that were shorter and less dimwitted.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
CAPSULE: Big, not nearly as bad as everyone had feared. Or hoped. But it's
still a showcase of missed opportunities.
BATMAN AND ROBIN is hardly the worst film I've seen -- that honor right now
goes to the insufferable MONEY TRAIN -- but it's like an anthology of
everything that's currently wrong with popular movies. It's sprawling,
expensive-looking (but fundamentally cheap), pretentiously silly, and,
strangely, not a whole lot of fun. It's also easily the worst of the Batman
movies in general, but that probably went without saying.
George Clooney has been cast as Batman this time around, and he feels
exactly right in the role. This was something I had to work to understand,
because the dialogue he's given and the situations he's forced to sleepwalk
through bury him so badly. The whole movie is like a contest to see which
actor or actress can do the most with the least, and there are a lot of
losers: to name two, Arnold Schwartzenegger is downright embarrasing as Mr.
Freeze; and Uma Thurman doesn't show any visible talent as Poison Ivy.
There's an effort to give both of them deeper shades of character, but they
both fall flat and are lost in the movie's explosion-in-a-prop-factory look.
Come to think of it, the movie is great to look at: the city of Gotham is
rendered in an over-the-top style that could be blown up and hung on the
wall as posters. There's one chase down the arm of a huge statue that stays
in the memory, and the big climax is a whang-dang of a production number
where Mr. Freeze uses a gigantic telescope to ice over Gotham City. (The
freeze-ray effects are worth some kind of technical award.)
The bad news is that all the enjoyment we could have gotten from the lavish
production design is killed, dead, by the movie's abortion of a screenplay.
We spend so much time cringing at the movie's worst excesses, we don't have
time to enjoy the best ones. The movie just isn't very enjoyable: it's like
a desperate birthday party for little kids, where everyone runs around with
forced smiles on their faces and tries to ignore the fact that nobody here
really seems to be having much fun at all.
A friend once asked, "What do you expect from a movie, anyway?" Two things,
I said: either that they show me something I haven't seen before, or amaze
me. This movie tries to do both, and fails.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Few movies in 1999 polarized audiences like "Fight Club", which showed Gen-X
men beating on each other as a way of attempting to reclaim their
masculinity, or something.  Three camps seem to have sprung up around the
film: hose who love it, those who hate it, and those who find the other two
camps wasting their time with a red herring.  I'm in the third camp.
"Fight Club", at the very least, opens brilliantly, with an unnamed narrator
(Edward Norton) going stir crazy in a homogenized job.  The film gets a lot
of good mileage out of Norton's disgust with his brand-name existence; I was
reminded of Willy Loman ranting, "How can they whip cheese?".  In this film,
Norton paces through his apartment, obssing over housewares catalogues,
while his Ikea-bought furniture all handily display closed-captioned
pricetags and manufacturer's descriptions.
Norton is an insomniac, and winds up going to terminal-disease support
groups as a coping mechanism.  For what, we may ask?  For the fact that his
life is terminally pallid?  How bad can his life be when there are people
dying of brain cancer?  That's the way he thinks about it, anyway, and for a
while it works, until he meets another faker, Marla Singer (Helena Bonham
Carter).  Marla and the Norton character wind up involved in a tempestuous
relationship, which in this movie is a little like saying the Eiffel Tower
is tall and pointy.
Things get complicated further by the presence of the handsome and engimatic
soap salesman Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), whom Norton meets on one of his
unending business trips.  Durden seems to have a knack for telling people
what they've always wanted to hear but could never find anyone else to say.
This is exactly what Norton thinks he needs, and when he comes back one day
to find his apartment blown up, he shacks up with Durden in a house that
could only remain standing in the movies and starts plowing through his back
copies of "Reader's Digest".
So far the film has been funny and knowing, and made with great skill.  Then
it takes a left turn that sends everything barrelling over the cliff.
Durden, as it turns out, is the mastermind of an underground boxing circle
known as Fight Club, where the male disenfranchised can come and feel like
gods while beating the tar out of each other.  The logic of this will be
lost on anyone who has actually been in a fistfight, of course, but the
movie is not about logic.  "Fight Club" has the peculiar, subterranean
arrogance of a precocious writer's first draft, where screwy little details
are defended to death over massive plot holes.
Before long Fight Club is running completely out of control, and Durden and
Norton are at each other's throats when they're not raiding liposuction
clinics for human fat.  The parallels with the Nazis are of course not going
to be lost on a knowing audience, but by the time we get to such things,
they no longer matter.
I suspect "Fight Club" worked better on paper, because what's on film veers
between the nauseating and the ridiculous.  It's one thing to write about
how great it felt to smash your fists into the concrete over and over again,
and quite another to actually SEE it.  Film has a way of literalizing
everything, even things that are designed to be fanciful, and perhaps this
story (from a novel by Chuck Palahniuk) just didn't survive the translation
intact.
People will say (and have said) that the film is actually "about the nature
of violence", but that is approximately as honest as saying that "ID4" was
"about" the value of raising funding for SETI.  The movie isn't genuinely
smart enough to be ABOUT that stuff -- it uses Tyler Durden and his
nihilistic burpings as an excuse to show things that are by turns shocking,
funny, outrageous, repellent, stupid, and then finally just tiresome.  By
the time we get to the "about" part, the movie's already betrayed itself,
and smirks at us with its trick third act that doesn't even really explain
anything.  What's worse, a movie that deals ineptly with a good subject, or
one which uses flashy plot mechanisms to tapdance around really dealing with
it at all?
The problem isn't with David ("Seven") Fincher's extraordinary direction or
the above-average performances by the cast.  Let's face it, there are good
people at work here: Norton's splendid; Pitt is funny when not being jerked
around by the plot; Carter is unexpectedly brassy and scene-stealing.  Her
weirdo monologues could have been torn out and used as the centerpiece for
another, better movie all by themselves.
I wanted to like "Fight Club", or at least appreciate its sardonic flashes
of wit, but I could not.  It's a cold, crass joke at the expense of its
audience; a two-and-a-half-hour red herring that winds up being nothing at
all by pretending to be about a lot of things it doesn't really understand.

Title
Review for Eraserhead (1977)
"A Dream of dark and troubling things." -- David Lynch
There are those who say "Eraserhead" makes little sense, and then there are
those who say that "Eraserhead" isn't supposed to make sense.  I'm with the
second camp: if "Eraserhead" made any sense at all, it wouldn't be nearly as
interesting.  "Eraserhead" is allegedly a horror movie, but I put it instead
on that small shelf of films that abandon all pretense at being entertainment
and just give you an experience: "Begotten", "The Reflecting Skin" and
Alejandro Jodorowsky's head-trips ("El Topo", "The Magic Mountain") are close
cousins in spirit to this film.
There is a story, sort of.  Henry Spencer (Lynch regular John Nance) is a
nerdish, creepy-looking man living in a squalid little apartment.  He's
accidentally impregnated his girlfriend, and the baby turns out to be a vile
little creature that looks something like E.T. after thalidomide.  The news
about the pregnancy, by the way, comes out during a dinner where the main
course consists of chickens the size of one's fist that still move and spurt
blood when sliced into.  There's also a strangely deformed woman who seems to
live in Henry's radiator... and by this point you're either shaking your head
in dismay or wondering where to find the movie.  I guess that means I've done
my job.
"Eraserhead" needs to be seen on the big screen to work properly.  On TV, the
black-on-black photography -- this is the single darkest movie ever made, and
I don't just mean in terms of subject matter! -- reproduces very poorly. 
Also, on TV, the black and white images don't saturate the senses the way
they do in a theater.  There's also the most creative use of sound in almost
any movie I've ever seen: not a single scene in the film is silent.  There's
always something rumbling, hissing, clattering, bubbling, booming away in
either the background or the next room over, and it has the same effect on
the audience's nerves as a dentist's drill.
Before David Lynch started screwing with America's mind via "Blue Velvet"
and "Twin Peaks", he spent five years, on and off, making "Eraserhead".  It
shows.  There is a level of obsessive care in every frame of this film that
many movies costing hundreds of times more don't show at all.
People may wonder: If this thing's so weird and so repulsive, why did I give
it three and a half stars?  Because it dares to be different and succeeds.  I
don't automatically reward every movie that's "experimental" with a positive
review, but they sure deserve the benefit of the doubt.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Assignment, The (1997)
CAPSULE: Smart and compulsively watchable, if fanciful, thriller that employs
the story of the Jackal to good psychological effect. Aidan Quinn is worth
admission.
Before the terrible Bruce Willis thriller THE JACKAL hit theaters, a
modestly-budgeted and far superior treatment of the same basic material came
and went, with nary a whisper of promotion or even acclaim. Too bad. THE
ASSIGNMENT is a far better movie -- not a classic, but it entertains and
engrosses aptly -- which were two things the other movie couldn't do.
The facts behind the story are now history: The Jackal was the moniker used by
a man named Carlos, who apparently masterminded or at least spearheaded many
of the most (in)famous terrorist actions in recent history. He, among others,
ransomed the members of OPEC at gunpoint -- an incident which is recapped in
the early minutes of this film. One of the CIA men, Henry Fields (Donald
Sutherland), tries to get close enough to Carlos to liquidate him with a "lead
handshake" (a gun in the sleeve), but his advisors collar him before he can
pull it off. Carlos vanishes with his captives.
Flash-forward. An American soldier, Annibal Ramirez (Aidan Quinn), is yanked
into custody by a Mossad agent, Amos (Ben Kingsley). Ramirez is a ringer for
Carlos; there is some mountingly funny byplay when we realize that it's not
Carlos playing dumb, or even Carlos playing the hotheaded American bit. This
guy really is an American soldier, and he really is gonna sue Amos into next
Wednesday when he gets home.
Fields introduces himself to Annibal and ingratiates himself with him. They
want Carlos, and Annibal is a great way for them to trap him. Annibal wants
nothing to do with any spy games, but after some unpleasant manipulation, they
take him under their wing and begin remaking him into a) a spy and b) a
psychological twin for Carlos. They do a frighteningly good job. This is one
of the best parts of the movie, where we see Annibal's straight-arrow military
persona being strip-mined and replaced with a grasping, selfish and amoral
one -- all the better for him to pass for Carlos.
The movie has a smartness to it that I don't see much of in American
thrillers -- more of a feel for the way spy games really are conducted,
complete with double-crosses and screw-ups the way they probably do go down.
Maybe that has something to do with this being a Canadian/French
co-production, rather than a wholly American one, and it's reflected in the
way the story plays out. We don't get an ending where everything is settled
with the right guy getting shot, although we do get an extra,
tacked-on epilogue that's a bit more gratuitous than we really needed.
What is best here is the acting. Here we have three actors doing a great job
-- Sutherland, Quinn, and Kingsley, all in a three-way psychic fencing match.
One of them is trying to trap a monster; one is trying to create one. And one
is becoming more of one than he ever dreamed. It's neat to watch.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Alien (1979)
CAPSULE: THE trend-setter for crossbreeds of horror and SF; still retains
all of its original power and vision. Indispensible.
ALIEN is a "haunted house movie in space" the way CASABLANCA was "a WWII
movie about a cabaret in Morocco". Categorizing it doesn't come close to
describing its power and unrelentingly near-sadistic psychic pressure. It is
easily the best movie of its kind, and has yet to be surpassed in its
capacity for creating giant, silent spaces of horror in viewer's minds.
The plot is direct and unadorned. A group of space pilots who're on the way
home -- "truckers in space" was the way the press kit described them -- get
pulled out of suspended animation because of a distress beacon. The company
they work for stipulates that they have to respond to any such call "on
penalty of total forfeiture of shares", as one of the crew members icily
explains it. They're not scientists or adventurers; they're just a gang of
ordinary beer-drinking Joes who wanna go home.
The signal turns out to be emanating from a derelict craft on a lifeless
planet. On closer inspection, they find what they believe to be the pilot --
in a shot that is by itself immortal -- and something... more correctly a
whole mess of somethings... in the cargo hold. And beyond that I will not
go, if only for the sake of the ones lucky enough to have not seen the movie
yet. See it in widescreen if you can manage it: much of the film's
remarkable Panavision photography loses a lot when cropped by almost fifty
percent for a TV screen.
Director Ridley Scott -- this was only his second feature-length film, after
THE DUELLISTS! -- keeps the movie fluid and calm for the most part. He has
eschewed using too many obvious horror-movie cliches: the false alarm, the
having-someone-jump-suddenly-into-the-frame shock, etc. When he does, he
turns them on his ear -- such as the scene with Dallas (Tom Skerritt) in the
tunnel, or the scene with Harry Dean Stanton in the bowels of the ship. Both
end with a shock, but take their time to deploy the shock properly, with
surgically-precise timing. He also keeps the acting toned way down -- no
one's reaching for effect here, except near the end when sweat and whites of
the eyes and flat-out hysteria are required. Sigourney Weaver, of course, is
most often remembered, but look also at the other actors, even in the
quietest moments.
And then there is the alien itself, which is a slithering anthology of
everything we ever imagined lived under our beds and in our closets as
scared children. H.R. Giger, the artist responsible for the movie's
cliche-shattering look, once told an interviewer that while brushing his
teeth one night on the ALIEN set, he bumped into a light bulb and sent it
swinging. This caused shadows to move, and made the alin sculpture in the
corner appear animated. He screamed.
The reason a movie like ALIEN still scares us -- REALLY scares us, not just
gives us cleverly gory barf-em-up shots -- isn't due to any one thing, but
an amalgam of elements. Films are collaborative; the best films are the
product of many great minds, not just one, and ALIEN had a truly golden
collection of people working together to bring us something that not only
entertains, not only scares, but that has defined a place in our collective
minds for many others to follow.

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
Miscellaneous thoughts noted down during the running time of "The
Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas":
1. According to the movie's press material, four writers received credit for
this film.  Why any of them were needed, or what they contributed, is a
mystery to me.  Collectively they don't even add up to one good one.
2. Jokes about dinosaurs passing gas are not funny.  The only time I have
seen anything remotely amusing about a giant creature passing gas was when
its name was Gamera.
3. Names which are plays on words, which was most of the stock-in-trade with
the Flintstones animated cartoon, are only funny up to a point.  In this
film we get "Mick Jagged and the..." -- are you holding your breath? --
"...Stones."  Chortle, chortle.  Even children, the primary audience for
this film, are going to find this movie tiresome.
4. Ann-Margaret embarrassed herself badly enough as a singer in "Tommy".
History repeats itself in this film.
5. Mark Addy (of "The Full Monty") isn't bad as Fred Flintstone, but he is
faced with the hopeless task of being interesting in a movie that defies
interest.  Barney, played by Stephen Baldwin, looks as though he would be
more at home playing his trigger-happy character from "The Usual Suspects".
6. Live-action movies made from cartoons are often painfully bad, for one
very simple reason.  What we see in animation we can forgive a great deal
of; what we see in live-action is utterly unsparing.  "Inspector Gadget" was
an object lesson this movie has not learned a thing from.
7. A sure measure of desperation on the part of the filmmakers: a subplot
about an alien who has no purpose in the film other than to eat up running
time.  I never imagined 90 minutes would be so difficult to burn.
8. A good movie makes you forget you're watching a movie.  A bad movie never
lets you forget this.  "The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas" is a very bad
movie.

Title
Review for Most Wanted (1997)
CAPSULE: Trashy, insanely stupid Keenan Ivory Wayans vehicle. The title is
exactly the obverse of what it should be.
MOST WANTED is a stupid and incompetent movie that ineptly mixes-and-matches
several other genres, and come up with cold porridge. We get political
conspiracy, the Death Row Secret Team, a journalist looking for a hot story,
and God knows what else. Jon Voight in a general's outfit, too, but the
movie is inept on so many levels that I was snickering at the sight of him
by the twenty-minute mark.
The movie makes its foolishness plain right away. Sgt. James Dunn (Wayans),
court-martialed for a bit of Gulf War righteousness that would not have even
made it to court-martial in any other movie, is sentenced to die. He's
yanked off death row at the behest of Lt. Col. Grant Casey (Voight), who
wants to assemble a top-secret special ops squad. Since Dunn is legally
dead, he makes a perfect candidate. Unfortunately, the first mission he's on
turns out to be a covert assassination of the First Lady, and he's framed
for the murder. However, there's a videotape of the whole thing, and so off
he goes after it. All of this is over- and under-scored by a conspiracy plot
that's both implausible and painfully convoluted. We also get yet another
confirmation of the character-economy law -- the one person who just seems
to be standing around with his thumb in his ear, isn't.
I shy at having to discuss a film this painfully bad in detail, but I'll
try. Let's see. Among the ridiculous scenes: a moment where Dunn confronts
the woman with the tape, then moves closer to her, murmuring, "Man, I
haven't had a piece of *that* in years..." and then reaches for a pizza box
behind her. Groan, groan. Even worse is a chase scene -- is that the right
word? -- where everyone and his brother recognizes Dunn on the street and
starts following him (much to the dismay of traffic all across the city). I
wondered if we were looking at an outtake from IT'S A MAD, MAD, MAD, MAD
WORLD.
There is *one* good thing in the movie. Exactly one -- no more, no less. It
is Paul Sorvino's performance as a CIA man (although they give him an
opening scene where he's feeding the ducks, and they have him mouth dialogue
that's an utter embarrasement to an actor as good as him). Sorvino has a
scene which so far outshines the rest of the movie, in fact, they could have
built a whole new story around it. It turns out one of his men is a traitor,
and when he learns this, he gives the man a talking-to that has real truth
in it, and which almost makes the movie worth sticking it out for to hear.
Almost.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
John Carpenter is a mainstream director who has made some of the most
gleefully subversive big-budget movies around.  He made the original
HALLOWEEN, which all by itself is redemption enough, but he also made THE
THING, THEY LIVE, BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA, and ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK --
all films I enjoyed immensely.  He also misfires, as he did with his
senseless remake of VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED and the incoherent IN THE MOUTH OF
MADNESS.  VAMPIRES is another of his misfires, and it's a big one.
The film stars James Woods, playing one of his more repellent characters, a
vampire-hunting mercenary named Jack Crow.  He's being retained by the
Catholic Church to rout out and destroy vampire nests for money (although of
course HIS reasons are personal).  He and his team of hunters go in like the
Gangbusters, using a weirdly elaborate harpoon-gun scheme to drag vampires
out into the open, where they burst into flames like they have magnesium
flares in their shirt pockets.
The movie doesn't convince us that the team(s) are terribly competent: they
act like rookie cops and don't have any clear overall strategy.  One night
they get torn to shreds by some kind of super-vampire, and Crow is
practically the only one left alive.  He staggers off into the night and
tries to fit the pieces together: was he set up?  Are there more vamps like
this one?
For the most part the movie sets itself up as a macho teen-oriented
entertainment, but then there are severe deviations from that pattern that
wreck the movie.  Part of the plot involves a prostitute who is bitten by a
vampire and who is useful to Crow, since she has a telepathic link to the
master vampire.  This woman is forced to do things on camera -- maybe better
to say forced to suffer through things on camera -- that do not belong in a
big-budget entertainment like this.  She's humiliated, beaten, cursed at,
and smacked around like a rag doll.  Worse, the movie lingers on those
details in ways that confounded me completely: they're not that important,
but the movie stays with them regardless.
Woods plays Crow to the hilt, which is both good and bad.  The man is
unrepentantly out for his own revenge, a self-important scumbag.  Fine,
except the movie has not earned the right to show his excessive behavior in
gross detail.  We see him beat a priest senseless with the receiver of a
telephone.  Later, he stuffs a washcloth in the same priest's mouth and
slashes his hand open.  And then he says things like, "Hey, when I was
kicking your ass back there -- did that give you a woody?"  He also uses the
word "fuck" as often as the first person singular, which in this movie is
just that much more spice for the stew.  In a movie that took itself more
seriously, in a more intelligent movie, Crow's acts MIGHT have the context
they needed.  They do not in this one.
On a technical level, the movie's impressive, I guess, but the film leaves
such a wretched taste in the mouth that it's impossible to enjoy.  It also
terminates on the stupidest possible note.  If you knew your buddy was
infected with vampiric blood and was going to turn, would you give him the
van that had all your weapons in it and send him on his way?  But I guess
complaints like that are pointless here.  VAMPIRES really only exists to
show gruesome action a-plenty, and that it has -- but at the cost of
watching a lot of other stuff that's downright repellent and stupid.

Title
Review for Bad Boys (1995)
CAPSULE: Annoyingly unentertaining, obvious and paper-thin
buddy/cop/drug/sexy-witness movie. Presence of director Michael Bay shows
none of the talent he demonstrated in THE ROCK.
I've seen this movie already, I said, as I looked at the box art. No, I
haven't even seen a trailer for the movie; I don't even know what it's
about, but I can look at the way they're promoting it, and I know I've seen
it already.
I thought: It's about these two cops. And they're buddies, sort of. They're
at each other's throats a lot, but they really do like each other. And
everyone else in their department hates them 'cause they're hot-shots. And
they have some kind of diametric opposition in their relationship. And one
day they're in the middle of cop business as usual when they get mixed up in
this plot that involves a really sadistic bad guy with lots of henchmen who
can never hit anything with the billions of rounds of ammo they are always
carrying. And the bad guy is a drug lord. And there's a witness, and she's
this sexy thing who rubs both of them the wrong way. And their supervisor
wants their badges for breakfast when they blow up half the town bringing
this guy down.
I only missed the bit about the badges. The rest I got dead-on. And I hadn't
even left the video store yet.
The cops in this movie are Will Smith and Martin Lawrence, and the bad guy
is the immensely underutilized Tcheky Karyo. Smith plays a cop who has a
trust fund and is thus not a cop for the money; Martin L. is a family man
(shades of the now-tired LETHAL WEAPON dynamic here) whose wife and he are
at total odds. This leads to some strained scenes about Lawrence's "not
getting any", and some totally unneccesary bits with him skulking around his
own house, thinking his partner is now his wife's "back door man". Not
funny; tiresome.
BAD BOYS gets some of its incredibly meager selling points from the presence
of Will Smith and Martin Lawrence. Will Smith is a natural, and I'm happy to
see him in movies like SIX DEGREES... and MEN IN BLACK. He's funny and
charming without trying to be; he really does seem to be enjoying himself.
Martin Lawrence is a different story; he's so uptight and verbally
constipated that sitting through his improvised riffs are a trial.
Movies like this are not about originality. I know this. They are about
style and energy and synergy between actors. I know this, too. And yet,
while watching BAD BOYS, which its glamorous photography and impossibly
exact stunt choreography, I felt fed up. I'd seen CON AIR, which despite
being completely implausible, was still great fun, because it tried however
feebly to put some new life into the mix. BAD BOYS is a dry run -- and
overlong, too, clocking in at just over two hours with a lot more by-play
than I felt could be justified.
I could write this movie. You could write this movie. Many people have. Many
people will continue to write this movie, over and over again. Other people
will buy it from them, and make it, and we will pay money to see it. More
the fools we all.
In a terrifyingly prescient line from his book A SCANNER DARKLY, Phil K.
Dick once mused that the McDonaldburger (as he called it) would eventually
eclipse money as the token of cultural and financial exchange. One day we
will all just sit in our living rooms and sell the same burger back and
forth to each other. The same could be said about this movie. I have the
sinking feeling we're going to see it again. Soon.

Title
Review for Cable Guy, The (1996)
CAPSULE: Strangely unfunny Jim Carrey comedy that starts off on an
interesting note, but goes flat-footed in a muddled comic commentary on the
power of the media.
I watched two Jim Carrey movies back to back: one was the hysterical LIAR
LIAR, which I nearly watched from the inside of an oxygen tent from gasping
for air, and the other was the oddball CABLE GUY, which has the hints of a
far better movie inside of it somewhere. Maybe even three or four.
Matthew Broderick stars as a fellow who has broken up with his girlfriend
and is now in a bachelor pad. He calls to get cable TV installed, and the
installer who shows up -- Carrey, predictably -- turns out to be a
hyperthyroid weirdo who insists on insinuating himself in the guy's life. At
first this works -- Carrey's character is strange, but seems to have a weird
grain or three of common sense rattling around in his head somewhere. Or is
it all a sham?
The movie isn't interested in questions like that. It quickly busies itself
with a background subplot about a big-headline "tabloid TV" murder trial,
and we also soon learn that most of the Carrey character's outlook has been
shaped -- mutated? -- by TV. I thought about the splendid BEING THERE, which
started from roughly the same premise, but wasn't nearly as labored or
contrived as this movie. And in this movie, that's just one of many, many
confused and conflicting ingredients.
The single biggest problem is a failure of tone. At first the movie is just
goofy and offbeat, but then it gets dark. Dark and unpleasant, too, which is
not what a comedy needs. The Carrey characters turns out not to be a cable
company employee at all, and then freaks out, goes on a rampage, steals the
girl, etc.... in short, the movie indulges in developments that are just out
of desperation on the part of the screenwriters.
Broderick is fine in his role. Carrey is actually not bad, either, but he
has not been given a character to play, but a gimmick, and a thin one at
that. I was hoping that the movie would define itself quickly and stay with
it -- maybe the cable guy is going to help this fellow get back together
with his girl? maybe something really wonderful and unpredictable would
happen? -- but nothing of the kind turned out.
Even the big climax is wrong, and I'll happily ruin it because there's not
much else to talk about here. The Carrey character winds up falling onto a
microwave satellite dish just as the verdict in the big murder trial is
about to hit the air. The signal goes dead. And in what the filmmakers
probably thought was an intelligent touch, one of the TV viewers reaches for
a book instead. All it said to me was that these people have damned short
attention spans. The rest of the movie is flawed in the same way.

Title
Review for Pelican Brief, The (1993)
CAPSULE: Good, workmanlike adaptation of Grisham's novel, but the joy of
discovery is gone.
John Grisham writes solid, workmanlike novels which get translated into
movies of dizzyingly varied quality. THE PELICAN BRIEF, directed by Alan
Pakula, is one of the better ones, but it's limited by the strangely
one-sided screenplay. A thriller should allow us to participate in the
puzzle being unscrambled onscreen; this one shuts us out, and instead gives
us too much manufactured suspense.
Darby Shaw (Julia Roberts) is a legal student down south, and her mentor and
lover Tom Callahan (Sam Shepard, very nice) are both confused about the
assassinations of two Supreme Court justices. On a lark, Shaw tries to
figure out why two men of such disparate persuasions were killed -- but the
more she uncovers, the more serious she gets, and soon she's assembled an
amateur legal brief that purports to have the answers. Then the brief falls
into the wrong hands, and she's targeted for death. She runs -- one of the
nice things in the movie is that she is not stupid, and knows better than to
do things that leave a trail, like use credit cards -- and winds up crossing
paths with Gray Grantham (Denzel Washington), a journalist who has done jail
time for not jeopardizing his sources.
This leads us to the movie's big problem, which is that up until about the
halfway mark, we're almost totally in the dark about what the mystery is.
Then we get it -- all in one gigantic, clumsy expositional lump. This tactic
irritated me, because I could see no end of opportunities earlier on to
deploy the same information in small daubs -- and allow us to fit everything
together.
The movie is not stupid, though . There are many good touches, especially
whenever Grantham's journalistic ethics and his boss (a wonderful John
Lithgow) are concerned. One of my pet peeves is the way journalism (or
computer techonlogy, or the military) are represented in the movies, and
this one gets it mostly right: one scene with Washington and Lithgow arguing
about the factuality of a source has enough tension in it to propel a movie
all by itself. The thriller plot is well-oiled and unfolds nicely, even if
it is jury-rigged. And we get a gallery of good-to-excellent performances. I
don't normally think much of Julia Roberts, but she did well by me in this
one, and Denzel Washington is never less than great. There's also one piece
of cinematography -- a scene of someone being gunned down by a sniper --
that I will not soon forget.
But because we're not allowed to participate in any of the assembly of the
evidence from the start, we get only to watch passively, and instead get the
contrivances of an assassin (Stanley Tucci, really creepy) and many other
scenes that don't add up to much. I wanted THE PELICAN BRIEF to add up to a
lot more, but it worked against itself in far too many ways.
syegul@cablehouse.dyn.ml.org                 EFNet IRC: GinRei / ICQ: 934998
http://cablehouse.dyn.ml.org/serdar                another worldly device...
you can crush me as I speak/write on rocks what you feel/now feel this truth

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
"The Siege" does the one thing in a movie that I find inexcusable: it
stacks its deck.  Meaning that it is contrived to have an easy way out
of a problem where there isn't one.  Instead of taking their very
interesting basic idea and following it through to its logical
conclusion, the filmmakers cheated.  They gave us an easy, disposable
bad guy where there should not have been one.
The film's premise is if nothing else timely.  It features Denzel
Washington as an FBI agent who grapples with the presence of a set of
terrorist cells in New York City.  These guys mean business: they thumb
their nose at negotiations, blowing up a bus midway through what looks
like a possible end of a standoff.  They want the release of an Iraqi
cleric, kidnapped covertly by the U.S. and being held in secret by the
army.
Denzel almost immediately runs into "Elise" (Annette Bening), a CIA
operative who either knows a lot more or a lot less than she actually
does, and the two of them engage in a very tough-minded tug of war over
possible leads and sources of information.  The scenes between them are
sharp and convincing; someone did their homework about how the
Palestinians wind up being the middlemen in everyone's intelligence
game.  Bening in particular is very good, always smiling when she
shouldn't.
But then the movie begins to step wrong with the introduction of
General Deveraux (Bruce Willis), who is brought in when martial law is
invoked, and proceeds to set up internment centers for suspected
terrorists.  The parallels are obvious: they're trying to invoke the
same sense of shame as when the U.S. interred Japanese- and German-
Americans.  But it doesn't work this time, because the movie attempts
to switch tracks on us and have the Willis character be the obvious
villain: Get rid of him and the story's over, and in fact that's more
or less what happens.
Why did this annoy me?  Because it's dishonest: if the movie had simply
been a procedural along the lines of "The Peacemaker", it would have
been a more than passable thriller.  But instead it mixes its
messages.  The Willis character is supposed to be, I guess, a warning
about how America is often its own worst enemy, but that gets buried by
the lockstep plotting that demands he be an off-the-shelf bad guy.
There's a lot of good things in the movie.  They're just short-
circuited.  Tony Shalhoub, for instance, is fine as a Palestinian-
American FBI agent, but the movie tries to force points when his son is
thrown in the internment centers.  And I mentioned Bening, and
Washington is always watchable, even in a movie like this, and there's
plenty of glossy-looking photography and production design.  But by the
fatally rushed ending, I couldn't concede that all this did much more
than make a deeply flawed movie into a merely bearable two hours.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
CAPSULE: A roaring behemoth of an action movie that manages to be great fun
and totally ridiculous at the same time. All that's missing is Jackie Chan.
Somehow this movie works. CON AIR is totally ridiculous and over-the-top;
there's not a moment in it that could be believed. And yet there it is, and
it's great fun. Hong Kong ultraviolence comes to Hollywood, sort of.
Nicholas Cage stars as Cameron Poe, a Gulf War veteran. After coming home
from the front to his sweetheart, he gets into a vicious fight with a bunch
of rednecks for threatening his wife and kills one of them. For this he's
sent to jail for seven years, and while nobody in the audience believed that
such a thing would ever go to trial (self-defense? hello?), we bought it and
went on, because the movie proceeded to set up Poe as an interesting fellow.
He spends his time in jail educating himself, keeping himself together, and
forming a rapport with other inmates. And now that he's being let out on
parole, he's preparing to see his daughter in the flesh for the first time.
Something has to go wrong, of course, and it does. Bigtime. The plane that
Poe's being put on is also being used to transport a gang of brutally
hard-core lifers and death-row criminals to a newly-built max-security
prison. One of them, the charmingly named "Cyrus the Virus" (played by John
Malkovitch with the sleazy charm of a mass murderer turned talk show host),
has hatched a plan that involves clockwork timing, the help of several other
inmates, and hostage-taking. On top of *that*, one of the other prisoners is
a plant -- a DEA agent with a hideout gun who's been put on board to get
information from one of the conspirators about a Central American drug lord.
Everything goes wrong at once. I will not spoil too many of the details,
because part of the fun of the movie is watching how the well-oiled machine
of the prisoner transport goes horribly wrong. Ultimately, Poe is put into a
very sticky situation -- a whole web of them, in fact, where he has to try
to survive as well as help out a newly-made friend or three. Poe, muscular
and graceful, looks both very in and out of place amongst the neo-Nazis and
mass murderers that make up the rest of the crew, and he does everything he
can to distance himself from them. The criminals themselves are not too
smart, but the Virus is clever and resourceful, and makes up for it. They
supply the deadly, anarchic energy that the crazy plan he's dreamed up needs
to succeed, and there's a weird, perverse pleasure in seeing them get away
with so much of what they do.
Also in the bubbling pot of the plot are John Cusack, as the supervisor of
the flight, who startles everyone around him by whipping out one piece of
remarkable improvisation after another. He locks horns hard with the DEA man
(a very enjoyable Colm Meaney), and takes a peculiarly delicious form of
revenge on the man -- and his sports car.
The movie doesn't stop once it gets into high gear. I've hardly seen another
movie that creates the level of non-stop tension and forward motion that
this one does. It also sustains it against all odds -- logical,
intellectual, whatever. The movie just doesn't look back, and when the
audience walked out, they were drained and exhilarated. Not one single
believable thing had happened, but the movie creates such a strong sense of
personalities and character, that we ignore the silliness of it all and have
a great time watching things blow up. And that happens *in extremis*. There
is one stunt that, even if it was faked, had most of the audience on the
floor -- involving the plane, its mooring line, gunfire, a shed, a control
tower and a car. You'll see what I mean.
All the actors do a fine job: Malkovitch is disturbing and twisted; Cage is
solemn and also with a twinkle of smarts in his eye; Cusack is
irrepressible; Meaney is hilarious. Steve Buscemi also pokes his head in, as
a disturbed serial killer, although his role feels as though it should
either have been cut out completely or expanded on further. I love him as an
actor, but he needed to have his material brought to fruition for his role
to really work here.
CON AIR will no doubt live on in the hearts of action/stunt/explosion fans
everywhere, and is destined to be a fratboy action favorite alongside HARD
BOILED, LETHAL WEAPON and DIE HARD. I suspect a sequel won't be long in
coming; any bets?

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Less than a full day after posting my review of David Lynch's LOST HIGHWAY,
I got a flood of mail from people who insisted I was deluded, mistaken, a
snob, or some combination of those three. Since I've never gotten such a
violent reaction from any other review I posted, I decided I owed a more
detailed and public explanation of my stance.
I've grown to dislike David Lynch's movies. I didn't initially; I found
ERASERHEAD, THE ELEPHANT MAN and even BLUE VELVET interesting and unique.
After that he's grown hopelessly self-conscious and self-important, but
those are not the worst of his problems as a director. Because my primary
reaction to his movies is emotional, I need to sit down and take apart the
reasons *why* I think he provokes these reactions in me.
First, I have grown tired of the way he takes potentially interesting
material and then smothers it with his "style" -- really just a strategy, a
way of taking the edge off ugly material by calling it all a big pop-culture
joke. This is not the same as satire of the DR. STRANGELOVE variety. There,
we have at least a sense of WHY we should feel contempt for a given figure.
Lynch's approach is like pointing and laughing, and inviting for us to do so
when we really don't want to. The noxious opening scene in WILD AT HEART is
a good example of this. Lynch gives us Nicholas Cage beating a black man to
death, but instead of trying to deal with the consequences of including such
a stomach-turning scene of violence in his movie, he laughs it off. Roger
Ebert felt the same way about BLUE VELVET, and while I disagree with his
take on that particular movie, I agree with his comment at large: "I didn't
need the director prancing on every ten minutes in top hat and tails,
whispering that it was all in fun."
I'm also tired of being told that the symbolism in Lynch's movies are the
key to understanding them. Symbolism is private. Your interpretation of the
name "Henry Long" might differ totally from mine. Because of that, it's no
accident that the movies which have their symbolism debated the most
fiercely are the ones which already tell an engaging and absorbing story:
because we've already had our interested enlisted on one level, we can then
move to dissect what the director really "meant" by this line of dialogue or
that image.
A movie that isn't interesting from the beginning, that has "symbolism"
forcibly injected into it -- in the same way that many dull Hollywood
comedies are pepped up by the gratuitous inclusion of a car crash or a man
getting kicked in the groin -- is hardly worth taking apart. It's like the
boy who cut his drum open to see what made it go bang. If Lynch sits there
with long lists of carefully-mapped symbolisms to write into his movies,
he's kind of missing the point.
As far as non-linear technique, or just technique in general, I keep
thinking of CITIZEN KANE. That movie was non-linear and experimental, but
told a strong and absorbing story BECAUSE of those things instead of IN
SPITE of them. The technique served the story. In LOST HIGHWAY, the
technique doesn't evolve out of the material, but is slapped on top of it as
a way of jazzing it up.
There's one line which was pointed out to me as being a "key" to the movie:
Fred Madison's statement, "I like to remember things my own way." This is
presumably supposed to be a sign that the whole movie's disjointedness is
because it is the rememberances of a dissasociative mind. Fine, but if
they'd actually written a movie ABOUT that, instead of just CONTAINING it,
it would probably have been watchable. As it stands, it just uses that as a
showcase for Lynch's various obsessions, which aren't interesting because
they aren't hooked into anything.
Other people have argued that Lynch's movies are not really about plot, but
emotions. Fine. Scott Renshaw, another rec.arts.movies.reviews regular whose
writings I respect, had this to say in his review: "A linear narrative is
not a pre-requisite for the evocation of an emotional response." Maybe not,
but it's a good way to insure that the odds of *spurious* emotional
responses are cut down. If *all* Lynch wanted out of me was an emotional
response, that's fine, because I had one: Boredom. It's not that his movies
don't make any sense or are "weird", it's that I can see all too clearly why
they're like that. They're part of a strategy to help him deflect criticism
of a story which at its core has not been given any real thought.
I am not a person who demands that every movie follow the mapped-out
genre-dictated requirements of every movie before it. I do not walk into a
theater expecting to have my hand held and my ego stroked. I admire
experimentation in the movies. I *liked* ERASERHEAD and BLUE VELVET, but
those seemed to have been made before Lynch became hyper-conscious of what
he was doing and started to one-up his audience.
Art critic and historian Jacques Barzun once said that one of the
prerequisites of labeling anything an experiment is the willingness to
concede that the experiment may be a failure. I like the fact that Lynch is
trying to do something different, but I can't pretend to enjoy the results.

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
CAPSULE: Not the narrative juggernaut that SE7EN was, but a smart and
well-wired thriller nonetheless, with sterling performances all around.
KISS THE GIRLS had many people muttering "SE7EN knock-off" when the trailers
ran for it. It's understandable: Both films feature Morgan Freeman on the
trail of a serial killer of fiendish intelligence and cleverness. There, the
similarities end. KISS THE GIRLS is not the monster that SE7EN was, but is a
well-made and intelligently assembled movie that packs a good deal of power.
>From the moment Morgan Freeman appeared on the screen, no convincing is
needed to tell us that Alex Cross, his character in GIRLS, is not Detective
Somerset from SE7EN. He is not rehashing the role; this is a new character
built from the ground up, and it's a testament to Freeman's skill as an
actor that we can sense this instantly, just from the way he sizes up a
roomful of evidence and talks down a suicidal woman.
Cross's niece has gone missing, and he journeys to North Carolina, fearful
that the girl may have become the victim of a serial killer who bills
himself as "Casanova". He is right, and he also makes a slew of educated
guesses as to the killer's m.o.: Casanova isn't so much a killer as a
collector, and is hard at work throwing the cops off the trail with
deceptive murders.
Then there's a huge break in the case: a doctor, Kate McTiernan (Ashley
Judd, her best role so far), manages to escape from the lair where she and
several other kidnapped girls are being held. She is full of guilt over not
having been able to free the other girls, but Cross is determined to find
Casanova as well. They're a nice team; they break out of the one-up/one-down
dynamic that so many movies like this set up.
There's a great deal more to the plot than would be fair to reveal in a
review. I will say that the movie has one piece of deception in store that
seems out of keeping with its ambitions. For most of the way, KISS THE GIRLS
is content to give us a solid story that springs out of the motivations of
the characters, known or unknown -- in other words, it's not critical that
we know who the killer is. Then in the final act, we find out that it's
someone we've already been introduced to, and that slightly undermines what
came before. It's not a fatal mistake, and there are probably many people
who won't object to it, but it seems somewhat tacked-on.
Despite this, KISS THE GIRLS makes a fine addition to a small list of movies
that intelligently explore the concept of obsessives and serial murder, and
that do it with characters that are no less compelling and interesting than
the one being chased.

Title
Review for Shichinin no samurai (1954)
CAPSULE: One of the ten best movies ever made.
A movie this sprawling and astonishing is easy to summarize -- I could do it
in two sentences -- but impossible to describe.
THE SEVEN SAMURAI is, more than anything else, a totally enthralling and
entertaining movie -- fun *and* profound. It is three hours and ten minutes
long, never lags, and feels too short by half. It creates a world -- or more
accurately, takes us to another world -- populates it convincingly, gives us
motives and needs that are totally uncontrived and direct, and then lets it
loose on us. Many have argued that this is Kurosawa's best film; I would
also add that it's his most entertaining and direct, even more so than THE
HIDDEN FORTRESS. It is, quite simply, perfect.
The story is uncomplicated, but not simpleminded. A small village of
Japanese rice farmers are being menaced by a gang of brigands headquartered
out in the forest somewhere. The villagers know they're doomed -- they have
no weapons, no training, and they probably won't even have enough of a
harvest to bribe the brigands to keep away. The wise man of the village
tells them to hire samurai -- preferably hungry ones, since they'll be
cheaper. And so several of the farmers go off to try and find men to fit the
bill.
They are not terribly successful at first. History remembers the samurai as
a haughty bunch, and the few they talk to at first are impossible. Then they
run into Kanbei (played by the great, fatherly-looking Japanese actor
Takashi Shimura), an older samurai who's survived many battles. Mostly by
fleeing from them, as he laughingly confesses. He's not a warlord, but a
smart, canny tactician who knows better than to try and confront thirty
warlords face-to-face, and he's eventually compelled to work for the
farmers, for nothing more than three meals of white rice a day. Kanbei
assembles several other samurai, including Katsushiro (Ko Kimura), a boyish
young man who idolizes most of the other warriors, and has a longer way to
go than he thinks. He winds up falling for one of the village girls, but the
price he and the other woman have to pay for their closeness is ruinous and
heartbreaking.
The other samurai are delineated quickly and charmingly. One of them is a
cold and surgically precise swordsman, but who has a strange side of
humanity to him. He doesn't like being idolized for his skill -- how much
depth can there be to a killer? Others are more happy-go-lucky, but still
relatively competent fighters. Another is an old war buddy of Kanbei's, who
from the git-go knows Kanbei is trying to trick him into something (again).
They make an intriguing crew, each complementing the other and filling in
where others fall short. We may have seen this before, but never this
well-done and rarely with this much energy and spirit.
They also acquire a tagalong, a drunken roustabout who calls himself
Kikuchiyou (the incomparable Toshiro Mifune). Kikuchiyou is undisciplined
and slovenly, but also has the element of confrontation that Kanbei and the
others don't really possess. In a wonderful scene, the villagers cower in
fear from the newly-arrived samurai... until Kikuchiyou beats the alarm as a
prank to get everyone out in the open, screaming for help -- and then mocks
the way they've done an about-face when they realize they're in trouble. He
does this throughout the movie, pushing every situation he gets into to the
limit. This tendency comes to a climax in a scene, possibly one of the best
monologues ever put on film, where Kikuchiyou alternately blasts and pities
the samurai and farmers for the horrible parasitic relationships they
inflict on each other in wartime. The scene is not just self-indulgent
acting, but puts much of the conflict in the movie into perspective. Who's
preying on whom here? Even more important is that the questions remain open
at the movie's end.
The pace never flags. Even when the characters are simply standing around
talking about the next thing they need to do, the tension is always there:
tension between farmers and samurai, between man and woman, youth and old
age, discipline and unrestrained passion, all embodied in different
characters. (The movie introduces at least twenty speaking roles and stays
with them, but never loses us or becomes confusing.) There are many little
plots grinding away in the corners, each coming to their own conclusion, but
none of them feel contrived or manufactured. The movie understands that life
itself is far too messy to conclude patly.
With the amount of emotional and thematic territory it covers, the movie
runs the risk of becoming muddled or defocused. It doesn't. In plain
non-movie English, it's a hell of a ride. One scene is broad comedy; the
next moving human drama. And because all of them are hitched around the same
core story, nothing is out of place or gratuitous. For a movie that runs as
long as it does, there's not a dead spot in it, not a moment where we sit
there tapping our fingers and waiting for the director to impress us with
something else.
The final hour of the movie is one giant, prolonged combat scene that spans
days and nights as wave after wave of marauders come charging into the
village, and are repulsed with a combination of tactics, quick
improvisation, and sheer sweat, blood and loss of life. Nothing like it has
ever been put on film elsewhere. The age of high-tech chases and shootouts
with digital graphics doesn't dilute the power of the movie's final stretch
-- not only because it's so unpretentiously violent, but because it's played
so raw and so close, emotionally, that it's impossible to sit back and
merely admire it on a technical level.
The film also finds the perfect way to end -- on a note of triumph that's
bittersweet and exhausted, nothing like the glitzy smile-fests that conclude
most movies of action. Unflinching honesty is not something one would
normally associate with a movie of action and grand entertainment, but there
you go. THE SEVEN SAMURAI breaks and exceeds all expectations.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
CAPSULE: Ecstatic and elegiac mini-saga of a slice of time in the porn
industry. Fascinating, and not just voyeuristically.
I love movies that dive into a universe of their own and examine it
exhaustively. There's a short but growing list of American movies that work
like that, which Roger Ebert once called "experimental epics": THE GODFATHER,
THE RIGHT STUFF, GOODFELLAS, NASHVILLE.
Now add BOOGIE NIGHTS to the list --a funny, enthralling movie about what
many people might not think to be a compelling subject -- the birth of the
American porn-movie industry as we now know it. But it's not a chronology;
it's about how things felt at the time, about a sense of community and shared
life, both good and bad. It's also not sensationalistic or sleazy -- two ways
this movie could have collapsed in on itself. It's an intelligent and knowing
movie that seems to have been put together with a fair amount of insider
knowledge. (I had a friend who worked in a low-rent porn magazine for some
time, and I imagined him nodding furiously in agreement to a lot of what
appeared on screen.)
BOOGIE NIGHTS gives us Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds, in a role that shows he
can play more than beer-drinking good ol' boys), director of "exotic, adult
films". He catches sight of a gangly seventeen-year-old, Eddie Adams (Mark
Wahlberg), bussing tables in a nightclub, and heads back into the kitchen to
talk to him. Adams unblinkingly thinks he's being picked up by a gay man, and
responds appropriately: "It's five bucks if you just want to look at it. Ten
if you want to watch me jerk off." Curiously, this scene -- which is
perfectly observed and played out -- sets a pattern for the movie: Sex is
business, and business happens to be damned good.
Horner is gentle and empathic, and offers to put Adams into his movies. Adams
cheerfully agrees, and soon tosses over his wretched life with his mother (a
frightening Joanna Gleason). Sure enough, the kid's a natural, and after a
very funny name-change / re-christening in a hot tub ("Dirk Diggler"), he's
in one top-flight porn production after another. He's having fun, and is
enjoying the admiration he gets over his outsized talents. (One of the single
funniest moments in any movie this year comes here, when The Colonel asks
Diggler to whip it out for inspection; the shot is played entirely off of The
Colonel's face and is all the funnier for it.)
What is best about the movie is the way it portrays the porn-film crew as an
extended family. There's Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), Horner's beau and
major female lead "actress", who mothers and pampers Dirk unceasingly --
almost certainly as a substitute for her own son. (One truly agonizing scene
has a trying and failing to regain custody of the boy.) Little Bill, the
lighting director (William H. Macy) and Kurt Longjohn, the cinematographer
(Ricky Jay) take their work seriously; they like making movies, even if
they're "dirty" movies. Rollergirl (Heather Graham), a high-school dropout,
gives Dirk his first crash course in on-camera sex -- and whose apparently
unremovable roller skates become her other on-screen trademark. Scotty
(Philip Hoffman), the gaffer, has a confused, possibly homosexual attraction
to Dirk that more likely stems out of his sense of being sidelined in the
middle of the action. Reed Rothchild (John C. Reilly), Dirk's co-star in a
series of Bond-style spoof porn flicks, also becomes his confederate and
close friend; instead of the predictable one-upsmanship and jealousy, there's
a sense that they've toughed it out together. They make a nice team. And Buck
Swope (Don Cheadle) is the one member of the porn crew who tries to go back
to the real world and re-open a stereo store, with hilarious and unnerving
results.
Then there are the people who wander into this circle and make life tougher.
Philip Baker Hall shows up as Floyd Gondolli, a "connections man" who tries t
convince Horner of the future of porn: "Videotape." (Unfortunately, Horner
takes a lot of convincing.) The Colonel (Robert Ridgeley), Horner's main
connection, winds up getting busted for messnig with an underage girl.
Pushers, creeps, and drug-crazed weirdos begin to hang around in the corners,
pop out of the woodwork, and it isn't long before Diggler himself is a coked-
up mess. One truly saddening sequence has him trying to prime himself for a
scene, only to discover that his major asset isn't on its best behavior that
day.
Porn in the Seventies was once considered a halfway artistic and serious
venture, and there's a sense of how that could be true in BOOGIE NIGHTS.
Horner has one great scene about how to keep people in their seats (even
after they've probably got no reason to say). And for a while we sense how
that's possible as well, but the bubble is slowly disintegrating around them,
and soon Diggler and his friends are trying to pull off a drug burn that
could get them either very killed or sorta rich.
The acting is superb, and depends on more than a little typecasting. Despite
many familiar faces, even "stars" like Wahlberg and Reynolds relax and let
the material absorb them. They're not only credible, they seem almost
familiar. The movie also never stops for breath. Two and a half hours feel
like half that length -- it's amazing how much character and drama and
information we get, all of it incredibly absorbing.
The director, Paul Thomas Anderson, also did the memorable HARD EIGHT, which
was unjustly relegated to video and deserves to be seen by anyone reading
this review. Now BOOGIE NIGHTS, which is a giant quantum leap of moviemaking
for a 27-year-old director. This was one of the best movies of 1997, hands
down.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Title
Review for Talk Radio (1988)
CAPSULE: Unforgiving and bleak, but exacting portrait of a man drunk on the
power of his own words.
The biggest mistake would be to compare Barry Champlain (Eric Bogosian), the
non-hero of Oliver Stone's black-as-volcanic-glass TALK RADIO, to a specific
real-life radio personality such as Rush Limbaugh or Howard Stern. He has
the worst tendencies of *both* of them, to the point where politics and even
audience are irrelevant. He will do anything to get people to listen to him,
even though they're already his captive audience. And what do you think that
does to him, in the dark?
Expanded slightly from a stage play that Bogosian himself wrote, TALK RADIO
is not so much an analysis of the title subject but a character portrait.
Bogosian plays Champlain with machine-gun nastiness, getting mileage from
his cruel eagerness to rip up callers to his late-night talkfest. He is not
interested in actually *communicating* with anyone; he's like a verbal slam
dancer, abusing his audience to see if they really will come back for more.
He's convinced that 9/10ths of the world is stupider and crueler than he
could ever be, so he's obviously not going to be anywhere nearly as bad as
the jerk-offs who call him now, is he? Even if he tries to pander to their
worst instincts, how's he any worse off than the guy who beats his kids and
brags about it on-air?
We learn a bit more about Champlain outside of the studio -- his marriage,
his younger years, etc. They aren't dwelled on excessively; there's just
enough for us to get the picture. Champlain is smart, but has absolutely no
idea what to do with his smarts, other than test other people's limits and
see if they'll indulge him because he constantly astonishes them with his
verbal excesses. And how far does he go? At one point someone mails him
something that might be a bomb, and Champlain, smirking, rattles it next to
the microphone. This is not a man with his feet on the ground.
There are other things he does that are not as explicitly disturbing, but
that give unsettling clues to his personality. A foaming anti-Semite calls
in, and Champlain tries a bizarre psychological tactic on him -- trying to
play on his sympathy. But the guy doesn't have any, and there's a strong
hint that Champlain may be one of those people who will literally say
*anything* to get someone to stop hassling him. Which one's worse? Maybe
they're both examples of the same kind of scum -- people who live to goad
others and get intemperate reactions?
TALK RADIO is as intense and claustrophobic a movie as there might
conceivably be. It is also excellently written and directed, and for that
reason alone is worth seeing. The camera lives inside the studio, and the
movie operates more like the stage play than we might expect -- we have to
imagine the guy at the other end of the wire, and in Champlain's fetid,
vicious universe, that's something that makes us cringe. We already know
what Champlain himself his like -- what about his callers? And then the
movie decides to settle *that* question, once and for all.

Title
Review for Angel Cop (1989) (V)
CAPSULE: Repugnant, overlong anime that makes it clear how the genre
sometimes gets its bad name.
Anime, like any other genre or group, gets an undeservedly bad reputation
from its worst members. Aside from the wretched and overrated OVERFIEND,
there's other culprits: the insanely dull ODIN, for one. And ANGEL COP,
which is just plain vile. What can you say about a story where the title
cards are spelled out in splattered blood to the sound of machine-gun fire,
and then goes downhill from there?
ANGEL COP is like a bad version of Sylvester Stallone's COBRA fused with a
really low-rent rip-off of THE FIRST POWER and some ROBOCOP thrown in for
good measure -- which is really saying something, since FIRST POWER and
COBRA were wretched to begin with. Any association with ROBOCOP is a slur on
that fine movie. The whole thing clocks in at slightly under two and a half
hours -- edited together from five half-hour pieces, but while they were
doing that, they could certainly have brought the story down to a less
painful length.
The plot: An avowedly communist cell named the Red May are trying to
destabilize Japan through acts of terrorism. To combat this threat, the
police have created a black-bag ops group who work above the law. (Yes, I'm
quoting pretty much word-for-word.) Their leader's so macho he doesn't
bother wearing a shirt, but this has to be the first anime where I've seen a
normal guy who looked like he had more scar tissue than healthy flesh. Oh,
I'm sorry -- that's chest hair, combined with particularly bad character
animation.
He is assigned a new partner, a female cop named Angel who's probably even
more violent and undisciplined than he is. In a scene where the partner's
got a gun to her head, she blows away one of the other terrorists in the
room, splattering brains and bone all over the wall. In detail. Part of the
story ostensibly concerns how Angel goes from an unfeeling bitch to someone
with a bit more heart, but the way ANGEL COP plays that point off is by
giving her the nerve to ultimately blow her partner's brains out (and all
over their enemy). Oh.
Angel is, as are the rest of the characters, mostly nonentities who do what
the plot and the screenplay tell them to do -- which is shoot people, blow
things up, fall out of windows, and karate-chop people to death. Their
enemies are not much better, although they get a few allies who are
marginally interesting (before they get killed rather unceremoniously). I
wish there was more to leave out, but I'll sum by saying ANGEL COP is a good
way not to introduce someone to anime.

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
SPAWN is the kind of movie they used to pass out scratch 'n sniff
cards for -- "to enhance the sensory experience". It's not the
greatest film ever made -- not by a mile -- but it's ambitious as all
hell, pardon the pun, and is so over the top that it actually
works. It's about a man who's been chosen to lead the Devil's armies
on earth (and eventually, in heaven), and it slams this comic-book
story home with gobbets of gory special effects and eye-searing
computer graphics. If this isn't your cup of Diet Pepsi, I say pick
another review. If it is, read on.
The man who we come to know as Spawn (Michael Jai White) starts off in
life as an assassin for a secret government bureau. He's sick of it
and wants out, but his boss (Martin Sheen, looking weirdly like
Stephen King with that beard and hair) double-crosses him. Instead of
dying, however, our hero is whisked down to hell and drafted into the
service of Satan (named Malebolgia in this movie): if he leads Satan's
armies, he will get to see his wife and children once more. He's also
given a controller, of sorts, a vile bucket of suet and four-letter
words with a clown's face (played, incredibly, by John Leguizamo), who
turns out to be another stab in the back.
The movie quickly turns into a high-tech special effects ride, with
the usual obligatory nods towads a plot and theme. Movies like this
succeed or fail largely based on the level of energy and inventiveness
they possess, not the originality of their plots, and SPAWN is if
nothing else energetic. Spawn's suit (done with CGI) sprouts horns,
fangs, claws, chains, and a giant undulating cape that reminded me of
a sentient glob of bubble gum. The soundtrack's a loud, unending roar
of industrial-strength drumbeats and guitars; the acting rapid-fire
and goofy. There's always something weird to look at or listen to.
The movie's sole ambition is to be brassily entertaining, and it does
that well.  The worst thing you can say about SPAWN, I guess -- beyond
it being very silly frat-boy level fun -- is that it sets itself up
for a sequel.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
ARMAGEDDON is a one-hundred-and-fifty-minute migraine headache. It classifies
less as a form of entertainment than as a new kind of corporal punishment.
It's so meat-headedly macho it should come with its own brand of deodorant.
People have chided me for being so put off by this movie. I know, I know;
they're trying to achieve a heroic level of proportions with their characters
and their material. Fine, it's over-the-top, but it's still a crummy movie:
loud, clichd, dramatically uninteresting, and just plain painful to sit
through. Here is a movie that employed NINE writers, who collectively didn't
even add up to one good one. Maybe they should have improvised?
After an opening scene where the planet gets peppered with cosmic hail (which
somehow manage to unerringly obliterate nothing but national monuments and a
satellite), NASA specialist Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) gets the facts
together: an asteroid -- or a comet, even the movie's promotional material
seemed confused about that part -- the size of Texas is headed for Earth. To
save the planet, Truman eventually decides to recruit a deep-core drilling
team to plant a nuke in the heart of the asteroid/comet/whatever and blow it
to pieces. The head of the team, Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis) gets yanked off
his rig while chasing around one of his co-workers, A.J.  (Ben Affleck) with
a pump-action shotgun. See, A.J. was sleeping with his daughter (Liv Tyler),
and, see, Dad's still real protective of her despite the fact she's grown up,
and are you squirming in your chair yet?
I mentioned macho. Not just in the script, either (since Liv Tyler is one of
the two, maybe three women in the movie who get any dialogue at all).
EVERYTHING in this movie comes accompanied with gut-rupturing sub-bass audio
effects. At one point we get treated to a closeup of a DIGITAL READOUT, and
each "tick" of the clock is "realized" on the soundtrack with the sound of a
thousand car doors slamming. Idiotic. There's more slow motion in this film
than in a *dozen* John Woo movies. Helicopters, police cruisers, spaceships,
and human figures are perpetually stamped out against a setting sun. Every
outdoor shot is steeped in golds and yellows. It's like a goddamn Marlboro ad
on mescaline. (And oh yeah, there's a cheap shot at Godzilla they probably
threw in at the last possible second.)
It gets worse. Michael Bay has taken all of this and clipped it together with
an editing style so nervous and unsettled that we don't look at anything for
more than three seconds at a time. After a few minutes, I remembered that the
original cut had clocked in at something like over three hours (God help us
all), and that the frantic, first-here-now-there editing may have been less a
strategy than a salvage job, a way to pull an even more bloated and unwieldy
whole into something vaguely resembling a digestible product. It doesn't
work.
Thornton is the best thing in the movie. He plays a character who is
interesting to watch and listen to, but most importantly, he keeps a stright
face during scenes where the only one keeping a straight face would have been
a corpse. Tyler plays the movie like a good sport, weeping and giggling on
cue -- like in a "romantic" scene where Affleck tickles Tyler with animal
crackers. Willis does his usual steely-eyed job, which made me all the more
nostalgic for his hurt-and-alone performance in 12 MONKEYS. I still insist
that no actor, however skilled, can survive lines like "Mom didn't leave you
-- she left both of us!"
And then we have the effects. This is, I believe, the third time in a row
this year I've seen the Chrysler building trashed. Many of the effects are
impressive (albeit moronically conceived and staged), but there are only so
many ways you can nuke New York -- or Paris, or Singapore, or the whole of
the globe. Also, many of the images are informed by moronic sensibilities --
the material with the space-dock, for instance, or the vast majority of the
shuttle flight, which has the ships flitting around like the paper airplaines
over Mom's bedspread in a student sci-fi film. Or a space station that takes
way too long to blow up. Or an asteroid that conveniently has gravity when
the heroes need it and doesn't when they don't. And so on.
John Waters once said he would have loved to do a movie where everything was
fake -- grass, trees, flowers, sun, everything. This is that movie. Too bad he
didn't direct it.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Title
Review for Harmagedon: Genma taisen (1982)
CAPSULE: Mediocre movie-length anime that aims for more than it can achieve.
Keith Emerson's score is a gigantic defecit.
HARMAGEDON, or GENMA TAISEN (The Genma War) as it was originally named in
Japan, has become a staple object of ridicule among anime fans. They deride
the movie for its lethargic pacing, its cliched characters, its landlocked
plotting, and especially its execreable musical score. Seen from the
outside, it's not all that bad -- but it's not all that good, either. It
promises far more than it can ever deliver.
Stripped naked, the premise is pretty good. A monstrous entity named Genma
is making its way across the universe, devouring everything in its path
(pace "The Nothing" from THE NEVERENDING STORY). A cyborg soldier named
Vega, who tangled with the monster before and failed, has been preserved
inside an asteroid headed for Earth. There, he seeks out as many humans as
he can find who are psionically active. He's going to need them, because
Genma is headed for Earth, and has proved so far unstoppable.
He finds two key characters: Luna, a Transylvanian princess, and Joh, a
young Japanese man who lives in emotional isolation but has a wellspring of
emotion for his sister. Luna and Vega work together to activate Joh's
powers, but aren't prepared for the emotional anguish that comes out of him
at the same time. They have to battle both Genma's force and Joh's emotional
irrationality at the same time.
Parts of the story are very well done indeed. The whole subplot about Joh is
done with great care and feeling -- it almost feels like it came from a
different movie. But the rest of the story, with its turgid plot-twists and
lockstep revelations, doesn't quite live up to it. The single biggest
problem with the movie is the music -- by Keith Emerson, no less! -- which
is by turns superfluous, distracting, dated, emotionally inappropriate, and
just plain cheesy. The right music can make a movie that much more
interesting; this music makes the movie nearly unwatchable. We also get far
more of the movie spelled out for us in speeches and lectures -- painfully,
laborously -- than we do demonstrated. Another big strike against it.
It's all a shame, because this story had terrific potential. There are some
top-notch credits here: the character designs were produced by Katsushiro
Otomo (of AKIRA fame). I understand that it was adapted (with some license)
from a manga series with the same premises. Given how badly this kind of
thing has been botched before, I'm compelled to find what I missed.

Title
Review for Battle Arena Toshinden (1997)
A dirty secret must come out of the closet for this one: I own a
PlayStation, and I own the series of videogames that BATTLE ARENA TOSHINDEN
takes its cues from. The games are as addictive and visually seductive as
anything you could ask for. They're perfect fodder for being translated
into an animated feature, or a live-action one. At least so I thought. 
Movies based on videogames are almost always a waste of time, but they can
be fun. MORTAL KOMBAT seemed to have been about the best of the bunch, and
it was as dim-domed a movie as one could have hoped for, or feared for. It
was lively and well-photographed and entertaining. BAT is none of these
things: a confused wreck of a story that doesn't handle any of its
ingredients well, sports lackluster character design and animation, and
also has one of the most unforgiveable dubbing jobs in recent history (if
you watch the dubbed version).
BAT even stumbles in the setup for its thin-ice plot. One year ago, a crew
of fighters were assembled from around the world to battle for supremacy by
a mysterious organization. The match ended with no winners, and now all of
the contestants have gone back to their lives. But one of the contestants
turns up, apparently now possessed of superhuman strength and speed, and
begins either kidnapping or dispatching the other fighters, and causing a
good deal of havoc on the side. One of the other contestants, apparently
the brother of this shadowy figure, tries to fit the pieces together.
The plot gets distressingly static very quickly. Things happen, but they
don't make the story any the more interesting. There are attempts to make
us care, but they fall flat. What's worse, I asked myself, a movie that
doesn't have those ingredients or that includes them clumsily?
Even though it's only an hour long, this clocks in as one of the most
annoyingly underweight anime I've had the displeasure of being subjected
to. It's not fun to watch, it's not enthralling, and oh dear God that
dubbing is enough to make you hang yourself from a shower curtain. Rent
GHOST IN THE SHELL and just pretend this mess never existed.

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi III: Chao ji jing cha (1992)
CAPSULE: The best place to start if you're a Jackie Chan newcomer. Roars
along, never stops for breath, and frequently hilarious.
To talk about Jackie Chan as a "stuntman" is to miss a million things.
Jackie is not only one of the most accomplished and fearsomely unafraid
physical adepts on the screen today, but also a very funny guy. He reminds
me of the way Arnold Schwartzenegger *used* to make me laugh -- he's funny
just standing there, copping a look.
SUPERCOP has Jackie making us laugh, scream, duck, root, and gasp for
breath, often all in the same scene. It's actually the third in a loosely
related series of movies, each with Jackie playing Kevin Chan, a Hong Kong
policeman who has a knack for getting neck-deep into trouble and then
karate-kicking his way out of it. (The others are also worth seeing.) It's a
little slow to start, but once it gets moving, it's a field day.
The movie has a fairly sophisticated plot for movies of this kind. Kevin is
tapped for a dangerous DEA assignment to be accomplished in mainland China,
which requires him to collaborate with the attractive (and ass-kicking)
chief fo Chinese security (played here by the ever-enjoyable Michelle Yeoh).
There's a fun chemistry between the two of them, especially in an early
scene where she tries to brief him and he keeps making wondering comments
about how great she looks in that uniform.
Kevin is assigned to help spring a known gangster from jail -- all
undercover, of course -- and have him lead the two of them to a noted drug
boss. The drug boss, however, has problems of his own: his wife's on trial
for many of his own crimes, and she's got the key to an account with all of
his drug funds. This means, of course, endless trouble -- not the least of
which is that Kevin bumps into his girlfriend while he's out in the field,
and she sees him with this other woman, and... but that's one of the movie's
unique pleasures: the way it crosses from action to comedy effortlessly.
Action. There is, of course, non-stop action in this movie -- everything
from one-on-one kung fu to all-out gun battles to a sppedboat with eight
engines (!) outrunning the Hong Kong coast guard. There is also a virtuoso
climax, which features, among other things, Jackie danging from a ladder
tied to a helicopter, a wrong-way freeway chase (which requires Michelle to
do an awesomely difficult handstand stunt), a fight on top of a moving train
that also involves the 'copter as well as a motorcycle. You get the idea.
This is to action movies what a burger with everything on it is to fast
food: quick, enjoyable, filling. Watch it with friends. When they stop
making movies like this, the world will be a tad greyer.

Title
Review for Trees Lounge (1996)
CAPSULE: Steve Buscemi's excellent directorial debut, mapping the territory
of a career drinker whose life has gone off the rails. Wry and intelligent,
and not more than a little sad.
The first time we see Tommy, he's zonked in a booth at closing time in the
bar that he lives above. The barmaid gives him a kick -- hard enough to wake
him up, not hard enough to actually hurt the guy. We somehow sense they have
done this before. Tommy (an excellent Steve Buscemi) is a career drinker, a
man whose life has turned bit by bit into applied research on the effects of
inebriation. Only natural since everything else in his life has failed him.
Anyone who thinks barflys are romantic, somehow, need to meet a few.
Tommy, like many career drinkers, is determined not to let himself be blamed
for anything. Sure enough, the next day, he's scoping out his former boss
and girlfriend. Sure he embezzled from the guy and blew the wad in Atlantic
City, but he made his girl dump him and then married her, the bastard! And
the more we watch Tommy, the more we despair of him ever really shifting out
of neutral and doing anything genuine with his life.
All of this may make TREES LOUNGE sound impossibly depressing. It's not.
Buscemi, as director and screenwriter, has found just the right tone for
this story -- a kind of wryness, a deadpan humor that's not without a little
sadness. Another director would film this kind of material as all-out
melodrama, with D.T.s and hysterics and God knows what else. Buscemi has
apparently lived through a good deal of what he puts on the screen, and so
keeps everything on a firmly realistic level. He knows what fits and what
doesn't.
I love movies like this. They take a gallery of sharply defined characters
and let them be themselves, instead of dropping them into a stupid prefab
plot. There is a plot in the movie, but it comes as a natural outgrowth of
what the characters do, not as a way of forcing something to happen. Mike
Leigh is another director who has this kind of approach; his NAKED worked in
roughly the same way, but was far less forgiving. TREES LOUNGE is more
careful and sad than bitter, but is still good at showing us why some people
just never seem to get a toehold.
Tommy solves his problem of a job by driving an ice cream truck, taking the
route that belonged to a beloved relative (just before he dropped dead of a
heart attack). He meets a precocious young girl named Debbie (Chloe Sevigny,
also in KIDS), and they seem to hit it off well, but Tommy is
pathologically incapable of accepting any responsibility.
We've known people like Tommy. God knows I have, and that's the key to the
movie's success. Tommy's answer to life is to get another drink -- not even
as a kind of oblivion, the way one of his septuagenarian bar buddies does
throughout the movie, but just as a way of finding a familiar piece of
terrain. He's more at home with the bottle than he is with another human
being, and he's not alone -- there are other denizens of the Trees who are
no less screwed-up, but that doesn't mean Tommy has a support structure or
anything. In the end, it's just him and his bottle of beer and bourbon.
Again. And it's his own damn fault.

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
CAPSULE: A ham-handed and over/underwritten morality play masquerading as
entertainment, so muddled it doesn't even know what it's really advocating,
if anything.
A TIME TO KILL has been hailed as the best of the Grisham adaptations, and
it's easy to see why: it presents a strong, almost rancorously so, story;
it is full of good actors (Samuel L. Jackson, Matthew McConaughey, Sandra
Bullock, Kevin Spacey, Charles Dutton); and it's ostensibly about some
important social issue that we're all tangling with. It is not, however, a
good movie, and all of the reasons I've listed above have something to do
with why.
Right from the beginning, the movie is dead-set on stacking its deck as
thoroughly and unrepentantly as possible. A pair of redneck whites, boozed
and drugged out of their minds, kidnap a young black girl, abuse and rape
her horribly, and leave her for dead. After their arrest, their father
(Jackson) takes an assault rifle and guns them down on the way to trial.
McConaughey is then drafted in as his lawyer, and the rest is somehow
strangely predictable courtoom movie dramatics.
The acting is not quite what it should be, given the cast we have. Sandra
Bullock (who is a good actress but not a serious one) looks clueless;
Spacey's accent switches itself on and off at random (and he's given a
totally thankless role to play as well, a role without an iota of depth);
and McConaughey's role is stamped from the cardboard back of a cereal box.
The most memorable role is Donald Sutherland's, and his is a bit part.
I always consider it an index of a movie's desperation when it is able to
present shocking and outlandish events, and somehow not have them generate
an ounce of impact. There is one scene -- a riot outside the courtroom --
that should have created incredible tension, but winds up playing out like
a textbook exercise on how not to deploy a scene like this. Because the
movie doesn't know what it's really about, it *can't* generate any genuine
tension, and so it has to artifically inject tension through clumsy
plotting. One of the ways it does this is by throwing in a whole subplot
about a bunch of vicious KKK cross-burners -- which is tidied up so neatly
that it borders on the nihilistic. I was reminded of the despicable
BETRAYED, which tried to tart up a fundamentally empty story by injecting
vile, graphic acts of racism as little more than an attention-getter.
The movie immolates an enormous amount of its potential by making a few
critical mistakes. First of all, the Jackson character is not hard to
judge; there's no tension in his dilemma. He's self-admittedly guilty and
should be sent to jail, no matter how moral his crusade. The old saw about
how no court in the land would convict him, if he was white, is supposed to
be the underlying theme of the movie, but it's never developed into an
organic component of the story. It just sort of floats around on top while
the movie grinds away furiously with its plot mechanics.
Another mistake is in motivational logic: By not having the two white thugs
arraigned FIRST -- or maybe tried and then dismissed from lack of evidence,
say -- we have that much less empathy for Jackson's character. I'm probably
supposed to think that just because he had his daughter raped, we are
*automatically* supposed to feel empathy for him, but that's precisely the
kind of facile thinking that makes real justice impossible. (See THE VIRGIN
SPRING for more on that note.) Is Jackson's character then simply insane?
That prospect isn't given terribly serious treatment either.
One of the most aggravating things about coutroom movies is how little they
seem to know about how the law works, or how lawyers get their information.
McConaughey's character makes an important slipup late in the movie, when
one of his witnesses turns out to have been convicted of a capital offense.
How did the prosecution get this information? How come HE didn't get it?
The whole way these questions get handled are symptomatic of the movie's
way of dealing with complex legal and moral questions in cheap
screenwriterly slam-bang fashion.
This is the biggest problem: the movie isn't ABOUT Jackson's character, or
his dilemma, or this case, or any of its (frequently interesting despite
the porcine writing and direction) characters. It's not ultimately about
anything at all, except its stupid geared-down plot, which inches onwards
in one unremarkable scene after another towards a totally contrived ending.
At two and a half hours, the movie is overlong and drastically overwritten:
there's endless stuff about things which ultimately add up to nothing, and
no writing about the material that should really matter. It's all
handwaving. The closing argument are also sneaky and underhanded, and
underscored my suspicion that the movie is manipulative and unfair.
It's not easy to make a movie ABOUT something. The other day I saw
Kurosawa's phenomenal RASHOMON, a movie that is really ABOUT the way people
deal with truth and reality (or don't). A TIME TO KILL is as empty and
ponderous a movie as I've seen in a long time.

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
CAPSULE: Fiendishly smart mutation of the slasher genre, in which the
awareness of the genre's exploitations by the characters is a main point.
"Do you like SCARY movies?" oozes the voice on the phone.
"Yeah, sure," says the bored girl who's getting real sick of this persistent
wrong-number weirdo. She gets fed up with him calling her and pestering her
about scary movies. So she hangs up. And in he comes with a knife the size
of a hatchet.
And with that we are off and running with SCREAM, Wes Craven's best movie
since NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET -- quite possibly his best movie ever. After
NIGHTMARE, Craven went on to make a string of muddled and disappointing
movies -- DEADLY FRIEND and SHOCKER stand out as two of the worst. But then
he came out of nowhere with SCREAM (working title: "Scary Movie"), which
takes the whole
how-come-people-in-a-horror-movie-don't-ever-do-the-SMART-thing? notion,
feeds it back into a fiendishly constructed story about a madman on the
loose, and lets the whole thing fly. It isn't a parody -- it's too intense
and genuinely scary to be one -- and it isn't a straight playback of slasher
cliches. It's more like a neat new mutation of the genre, a crossbreeding of
ideas to create something really new and creative.
The killer's m.o. is set up in the first scene: he calls someone, taunts
them with sneering jibes about scary movies, and then come in and stabs them
to death. A lot. To hide his identity, he goes running about with a black
cloak and a "Father Death" mask on. (Be forewarned that there is a good deal
of on-camera bloodshed in this movie -- nothing that a seasoned horror
veteran can't take, but those expecting a lightearted parody a la HAUNTED
HONEYMOON are advised to stand clear.) He (?) is stalking and murdering the
friends and relatives of a young girl whose mother was raped and murdered by
a serial killer almost exactly one year ago. Her friends -- some witty, some
boorish, some hilariously insensitive -- have various theories about who,
how and why. None of them are correct.
The killer continues his rampage, drawing attention from the media. One of
the folks who gets interested is a tabloid-style journalist who dashed off a
bestselling book about the mother's murderer -- only she's convinced that
the killer was framed, and that the real perp is still on the loose. Nobody
buys the theory... at first. But as the clues and bodies pile up, it's plain
that something even more bizarre than what we can see is afoot.
SCREAM knows its territory. (If it didn't, I'd worry about Mr. Craven's
right to his throne.) It's loaded with in-jokes about horror movies (see how
many you can rack up) -- but most importantly, it's populated by people who
are perfectly aware of how horror-movieish the whole thing is. Also, they
don't just lie down when the killer storms in: they throw everything that
isn't nailed down at the guy. Slam doors in his face. Trip him up. Smash
bottles over his head. Do everything except shove him into a meat grinder
(and believe me, I was expecting something along such Grand Guignol
proportions). But like all good slasher villains, he does the Timex thing
and keeps ticking.
The final 40 minutes of the movie is one giant blood-soaked war zone that's
reminiscent of the hair-raising ending of another, quite dissimilar movie --
BLOOD SIMPLE -- which used bizarre plot mechanics and double-backs to keep
the audience shrieking. By the time you get to the final act, the tables
have been turned so many times you'd think they were on Lazy Susans. It's
both funny and horrific, and I will not reveal a single thing about how it
gets tied up, except that a couple of people have *some* of their theories
about who dies and who lives in horror movies proved quite correct.
Last note: SCREAM seems to have revitalized b.o. interest in horror movies
-- a waning genre since the 80s, poisoned by endless and lame sequels and
hordes of uninteresting ripoffs. I anticipate a wave of imitations in the
wake of this one -- and, unfortunately, another case of hardening of the
arteries. SCREAM 2 is already in the works.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
After all of the rumors, the negative press, the calamity on the set
and the endlessly upward-spiraling budget, the executive nail-biting
and the snip-and-fret editing, James Cameron's TITANIC is nothing
short of a total success. It does not enhance Cameron's reputation to
the status of a Kurosawa -- which I don't discount, it just hasn't
happened here -- but he's certainly on the level of a D.W. Griffith.
It's the fastest-moving three hours you're likely to spend in a movie
theater, and some of the best.
Why this project? I asked myself that -- at first with dismay, and
then with mounting anticipation -- when Cameron first announced his
intentions to go down there and film the hulk of the ship itself. Now
I have a theory: Cameron's TERMINATOR movies were, in a way, about a
gigantic paradigm shift. the sinking of Titanic was the beginning of
the end of an era, the era of total social stability, of man's
certainty of his domination over nature. Now we are a little more
cautious, if no less ambitious; just more aware that we can be smashed
down quite easily when we're not looking in the right direction. But
neither Skynet nor Titanic are themselves to blame -- they're just the
agents of man's shortsightedness writ large. (There are various
apocalyptic overtones which I'll save for another essay.)
But if the movie's wrapper is Titanic's hulk at the bottom of the
Atlantic, the core is a buoyant love story which unfolds during the
course of Titanic's one voyage partway across the ocean. And to make
the whole thing work, Cameron made some fairly hard storytelling and
directorial decisions early on. He could have opted for a more
"Altmanesque" approach, in which a whole congeries of lives
intertwined and wove through each other on that day, but he shirked
that device in favor of a fistful of tightly colliding
characters. Everyone wants something from everyone else, and they are
going to have a hell of a time getting it: your basic ingredients for
good drama.
Winslet's character, both in the past and future, is a solid addition
to the roster of Cameron heroines: a stubborn woman with a mind, who's
often despised by the men around her. When she first begins to speak
of the ship, Cameron very wisely holds back on showing us exactly what
she's talking about. "The sheets had never been slept in," she says;
"the china never eaten from. The paint was still fresh." Her words in
our minds evoke images by themselves -- and then Cameron takes over
and shows us what images her words are evoking in the minds of the
salvage crew. This is just a tiny example of the movie's directorial
genius.
The characters themselves are Damon Runyan stock figures, but again,
they're ennobled and made interesting through a unique marriage of
writing, acting and direction. They're interesting to watch, just to
see what happens next. Jack Dawson (Leonardo Di Caprio) is a young
roustabout who wins a ticket onboard in a poker match, and Kate
Winslet plays the younger Rose as an upper-class beauty who is never
less than uncomfortable in a whalebone corset. Billy Zane is greasy
and hateful as her husband-to-be (his love for her seems to be an
unholy cocktail of equal parts sadism, masochism, and desperation),
and the supporting players (especially the proverbial Titanic deck
band) fill out the story's hollow corners and give the movie the
feeling of an ongoing slice of life.
Both floating and sinking, we are never less than convinced that
Titanic is there, on screen, in front of us. The movie earns such a
total suspension of disbelief from the audience that we feel we could
walk around the ship in our minds after leaving the theater. There's a
requisite amount of repetitiveness in the final hour of the movie --
the ship is sinking, sinking, *still* sinking, etc. -- but all of that
is underscored with the terrible tensions of the main
characters. We've come to give a damn about them; they make the hoary
cliche of the sinking ship into something new.
There is no end of wonderful moments: The part where Jack shows Rose
how to spit -- and how to fly. The scene in the car in steerage. The
elderly couple on the bed.  The aforementioned deck band, playing
until the bitter end. And the incredible sight of that ship snapping
in half like a stepped-on twig.
It's hard to speak modestly of a movie like TITANIC, which has ungodly
huge ambitions. It wants to entertain; it wants to be romantic and
moving; it wants to thrill. It does all of those magnificently. Not
only that, but it was definitely all worth waiting this long for.

Title
Review for Claire of the Moon (1992)
CAPSULE: Lesbianism examined in the same hushed and reverential tones
reserved for a terminal illness. Potentially interesting idea made stagy
and boring.
CLAIRE OF THE MOON is such an impossibly serious and sober movie that I was
waiting for someone to sneeze, just to break the ice. It's a perfect
example of what my wife calls an S.F.E. movie, where S.F.E. means So
F***ing Earnest. Movies like this need wit and brashness to be absorbing.
CLAIRE is one strained speech after another, written delivered with all of
the energy and spontenaity of a DMV clerk.
CLAIRE takes two women, Claire and Noel, both writers, and throws them
together in the same cabin at a women-only writer's retreat. Claire wrights
light comedy, while Noel is a scholarly authority on porn and sexual
behavior. Obviously, the two of them are going to have plenty to talk
about, and for the entire one hundred and twelve insufferable minutes of
this movie, that's all they do: talk.
The movie sets up its (microscopic) plot with beat-a-dead-horse-into-glue
obviousness. The evening talks at the camp are chaired by a motherly type
named Maggie, a self-professed lesbian, and when Noel owns up to also being
a lesbian, Claire looks like she's been hit with a sockful of wet sand. The
movie then quickly degenerates into lots of scenes where Noel Glances At
Claire With Significance, and Claire Looks Out Over The Water Reflectively.
(Ugh!) The most amazing thing about the movie is how people so intelligent
can talk so much and yet get so little through their thick heads.
All of this, of course, leads up to a scene of complete inevitability:
Claire and Noel, in a scene that should have come an hour earlier, because
then the movie ends without even the benefit of reflection about what's
just happened. We never get a hint about how any of this has changed
anyone, only how they felt about things that didn't even happen yet.
The problem with CLAIRE... is not lesbianism as such, but the leaden way
it's handled. Why is it that any "serious" (a better word would be adult or
at least thoughtful) examination of sex in a movie almost always winds up
producing a movie that's unwatchably boring? The way this movie deals with
lesbianism, we might as well be watching an overheated docudrama about
AIDS.
Many other movies have used the same subject in ways that are a thousand
times better -- more engaging, more creative, more intellectually and
artistically interesting. Look at John Sayles' LIANNA, or the interesting
and little-seen DESERT BLOOM; both of them have more life and vibrancy than
CLAIRE. What this movie needed was a good swift kick in the pants.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Let me start by stating the obvious.  "Star Wars, Episode 1: The
Phantom Menace" is wonderful to look at.  Every scene is littered with
activity: ships flitting across the horizon, people and creatures
scurrying from hither to thither.  One of the major characters, the
splendidly-goofy-bordering-on-annoying Jar Jar Binks, is entirely a
creation of computer graphics, and we're never less than convinced that
he's there in front of us at all times.  This is one of the hallmarks
of the "Star Wars" universe: things that would be the centerpiece of
another movie will simply insert themselves casually into the frame.
The movie is exploding with sights and sounds.
And that's the problem. Here is a film that was created with the most
magnificent of panoramas, and one of the most flimsy of screenplays.
It's full, but not fulfilling.  It does everything... except tell a
story that engages us emotionally.  Friends of mine have said that the
movie improves on repeat viewings -- but shouldn't a movie like this
just work the first time around, period?
Twenty years, it seems, have made all the difference, in both us and
George Lucas.  "Star Wars" exploded out of nowhere and changed the
level of expectations for moviegoers everywhere, permanently. "The
Phantom Menace" is evolutionary, not revolutionary, and for that reason
is not as remarkable a movie. But it's also hampered by a muddled, one-
dimensional drama and a gallery of characters who engage everything
except our sympathies.  "Star Wars" was about adventure; this movie is
about people talking at each other and occasionally fighting. No one is
REALLY put to the test. The movie is worse than soulless -- it is
gutless.
In the abstract, there's plenty of story to work with: a brutal
blockade of a planet that could turn into a full-out war; light-saber
duels; closed-chamber politicking; a forbidden attraction between a
queen and a young slave; a father-and-son apprenticeship; a deadly and
mysterious assassin with vicious weapons. But somehow, Lucas and his
team of compatriots haven't spun these elements together in a
compelling fashion.  The film drags.  There are far too many scenes of
people explaining everything to each other, again and again; there are
endless moments where we HEAR about what's going on instead of SEEING
it, or its consequences.  For a "kid's movie", as Lucas has billed it,
it's distressingly complex, static and talky.  There is no one person
we are carried through the whole of the story with -- and no suspense.
Nothing ever really seems to be at stake; it all just seems to be a
rather large inconvenience.
Some examples. Part of the movie's major lack of empathy is found with
Natalie Portman's character, Queen Padme. Her planet is being blockaded
by the Trade Federation, and she has to go undercover (in a sense) to
save her planet. Lucas goes to great effort to present her to us as a
queen, but all of her sympathy for her people is verbal, not tangible.
We admire her, but we don't care about her. (PLOT SPOILER!) There's
some tedious bait-and-switchery with one of her handmaidens that's less
fun than it should be -- probably because we're not privy to it until
it's too late to delight in the subversion.
Then there are our two Jedi, who feel obligatory without feeling
neccesary. Ewan McGregor is excellent as the young Obi-Wan Kenobi; he
inhabits the part with great grace and unforced style. He is fun to
watch. Liam Neeson, as Qui-Gon Jinn, however, seems vaguely bored and
dissatisfied with the whole thing; his expression always seems to be
saying, "As soon as I can get out of here and have me a Guinness..."
I also mentioned Jar-Jar Binks, who is so convincing as a digital
creation that it only makes him all the more insufferable. He is a
comic relief whose lifespan was extended far beyond any reasonable
amount. And then there is Jake Lloyd, as the young Anakin Skywalker. He
is possibly one of the few totally unproblematic things in the movie --
he is simply nine years old, nothing more than that, and we accept that
on face value.  The problem is the movie often exploits that for
developments that aren't even internally consistent -- such as when he
strikes a blow for the heroes by accident... again and again.
Another problem is that watching all these characters deal with each
other is a chore. Lucas has written his own script, and the dialogue is
cheesy without ever being enjoyably so. It doesn't have the fun and
frolic of a high-camp adventure. Instead, it's just pained and forced.
There's none of that kidding by-play we all loved. When Leia
said, "Will someone get this big walking carpet out of my way?" we all
laughed. Nothing is that spontaneous and unforced here.
The high points, of course, are when the movie's set-pieces kick in.
Here is the only time "The Phantom Menace" actually feels like a "Star
Wars" movie.  The action centerpiece of the movie is a high-tech race
sequence that borrows freely from "Ben Hur", "Bullitt", and even the
speeder chase from "Return of the Jedi"; apparently Lucas's creative
exhaustion has extended to the point of autocannibalization.  Yes, the
chase is exhilarating and excellently done -- but because it's not
hooked into anything we really care about, it's disposable.  It's just
another random something to look at.
My criticism of "The Phantom Menace" is not with its surfaces, but with
its core. The original "Star Wars" movies possessed a kind of cultural
telepathy, a power to tap directly into a silent sense of wonder and
possibilities.  Yes, it WAS possible for a farm boy from Tatooine to
become a Jedi knight (and have Darth Vader for a father), and for a
band of rebels to strike a blow for freedom against the all-powerful
Empire.  Goofy and hokey as it was, we bought it.
The new trilogy, judging from its opening chapter, is full of images,
but somehow none of the wonder and the narrative gravity.  In place of
wonder, we have comings and goings, explanations and justifications,
and never a quiet moment when we are allowed to have it all sink in. In
place of narrative, we have picaresqueness without impact. We go a lot
of places, but we never really get out of the bus.
Roger Ebert reported in his own review of the movie: "We are standing
at the threshold of a new age of epic cinema, I think, in which digital
techniques mean that budgets will no longer limit the scope of scenes;
filmmakers will be able to show us just about anything they can
imagine."  True.  But digital filmmaking technology is like the movie
camera itself.  Point it at something and all of its attributes are
magnified, good and bad.  "The Phantom Menace"'s visual splendor
explodes tenfold when given a CGI treatment, but so does the thinness
of its underlying story.
Epic movies like "Lawrence of Arabia" were full of intriguing people
and conflicts; "The Phantom Menace" is little more than a glossy tour
booklet, all setup and no payoff.  Presumably, that's by design, but
the original "Star Wars" movies also worked magnificently as
standalones. I re-watched them before seeing "The Phantom Menace" and
felt like I was revisiting old friends at a party. "The Phantom Menace"
plays more like a noisy Shriner's convention where nobody really wants
to talk to anyone else.
One more thing. There is a single moment in the original "Star Wars"
where Luke Skywalker stands outside his house and watches a dual
sunset.  The suns bathe Luke's face in red; the music swells; we feel
his need to escape.  It's an elementally simple moment, unadorned and
moving, and it works.  "The Phantom Menace", too perpetually busy to be
really interesting, never lets itself have a moment like that.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Working Girl (1988)
CAPSULE: One of the best American comedies of recent years.
Pity the plight of the modern personal assistant. Tess McGill (Melanie
Griffith) is a smart cookie who would probably be a good player in the
financial world, if it weren't for the fact that she's landlocked. Nobody
listens to a secretary for tips on mergers and acquisitions, even if she
does know what she's talking about. Especially with that hair, and those
bracelets, and that squeaky voice that charms her loutish boyfriend and
absolutely no one else.
One day, Tess gets a job as an assistant to a new boss in the mergers and
acquisitions department of the financial firm she works in. Katharine
Parker (played deliciously by Sigourney Weaver) is Serious with the cap S.
Everything about this woman bespeaks of authority, and it starts to rub off
on Tess. Not only that, but Ms. Parker likes to hear Tess's ideas. She's
got an idol. One great scene has Tess listening to Dictaphone recordings of
her idol and trying to modulate her voice.
Then Ms. Parker breaks her leg on a skiing trip and is laid up for some
time, giving Tess access to Katharine's home (someone has to let the
cleaning lady in, right?), personal computer, and phone logs. And there she
discovers that Katharine has stolen one of her best ideas and passed it off
as her own. (As if this wasn't bad enough, she returns home from this
humiliation to find her boyfriend being unfaithful. It never rains...)
Tess steams for a bit, and then decides to turn things around. Apparently
Katharine was going to get in touch with a fellow named Jack Trainer about
this idea. Tess dresses up in some of Katharine's own finery and presents
herself to Jack as an associate of Katharine's (not Katharine herself,
mercifully!)... and then things really go wild.
I hope from this description the movie doesn't sound like a dumb comedy of
impersonation. It is not. WORKING GIRL is a smart, intelligent and
incredibly well-written movie that takes all of its characters seriously,
including Katharine. Another movie would have made Katharine unpalatable
from start to finish; Katharine is very likeable when she's on screen --
she's just doing the wrong thing, and sees it as being business as usual.
The movie also features one of Harrison Ford's best performances. With a
name like "Jack Trainer", we're expecting a wolf -- instead, we get a man
who's got a sense of class and a sense of humor about himself. Tess and
Jack like each other immediately -- each sees the other as a wonderful
relief from the run of the mill they've grown accustomed to. Ford is
incredibly funny when let loose in a story like this (so unlike the dismal
SABRINA), and is one of the best things in the movie.
Mike Nichols' direction is smooth and unobtrusive, and lets all the best
moments in the screenplay come out unobscured -- a critical thing in a
comedy, since bad timing or a break in the mood would have ruined
everything. Even the ending, which could have been a complete gimmee, is on
just the right note, with everyone getting precisely what they deserve.
Even those of us who have never seen the inside of a corporate boardroom
will empathize -- and laugh.
